
ALSO BY COLSON WHITEHEAD
The Intuitionist
John Henry Days
The Colossus of New York
Apex Hides the Hurt
Sag Harbor
Zone One
The Noble Hustle
The Underground Railroad
OceanofPDF.com
OceanofPDF.com
This is a work of fiction. All incidents and dialogue and all
characters, with the exception of some well-known historical
figures, are products of the author’s imagination and are not
to be construed as real. In all other respects, any
resemblance to persons living or dead is entirely coincidental.
Copyright © 2019 by Colson Whitehead
All rights reserved. Published in the United States by
Doubleday, a division of Penguin Random House LLC, New
York.
www.doubleday.com
DOUBLEDAY and the portrayal of an anchor with a dolphin
are registered trademarks of Penguin Random House LLC.
Cover design by Oliver Munday
Cover photograph: Reflection, Harlem, New York, 1964
(detail) © Neil Libbert/Bridgeman Images
LIBRARY OF CONGRESS CATALOGING-IN-PUBLICATION
DATA
Names: Whitehead, Colson, 1969– author.
Title: The nickel boys : a novel / Colson Whitehead.
Description: First edition. | New York : Doubleday, [2019]
Identifiers: LCCN 2018042961| ISBN 9780385537070
(hardcover) | ISBN 9780385537087 (ebook) | ISBN
9780385545440 (open market)
Classification: LCC PS3573.H4768 N53 2019 | DDC 813/.54—
dc23 LC record available at https://lccn.loc.gov/2018042961
Ebook ISBN 9780385537087
v5.4
ep
OceanofPDF.com
Contents
Cover
Also by Colson Whitehead
Title Page
Copyright
Dedication
Prologue
Part One
Chapter One
Chapter Two
Chapter Three
Part Two
Chapter Four
Chapter Five
Chapter Six
Chapter Seven
Chapter Eight
Chapter Nine
Chapter Ten
Part Three
Chapter Eleven
Chapter Twelve
Chapter Thirteen
Chapter Fourteen
Chapter Fifteen
Chapter Sixteen
Epilogue
Acknowledgments
About the Author
OceanofPDF.com
For Richard Nash
OceanofPDF.com
E
PROLOGUE
ven in death the boys were trouble.
The secret graveyard lay on the north
side of the Nickel campus, in a patchy
acre of wild grass between the old work barn and the
school dump. The field had been a grazing pasture when
the school operated a dairy, selling milk to local customers
—one of the state of Florida’s schemes to relieve the
taxpayer burden of the boys’ upkeep. The developers of the
office park had earmarked the field for a lunch plaza, with
four water features and a concrete bandstand for the
occasional event. The discovery of the bodies was an
expensive complication for the real estate company
awaiting the all clear from the environmental study, and for
the state’s attorney, which had recently closed an
investigation into the abuse stories. Now they had to start a
new inquiry, establish the identities of the deceased and the
manner of death, and there was no telling when the whole
damned place could be razed, cleared, and neatly erased
from history, which everyone agreed was long overdue.
All the boys knew about that rotten spot. It took a
student from the University of South Florida to bring it to
the rest of the world, decades after the first boy was tied
up in a potato sack and dumped there. When asked how
she spotted the graves, Jody said, “The dirt looked wrong.”
The sunken earth, the scrabbly weeds. Jody and the rest of
the archaeology students from the university had been
excavating the school’s official cemetery for months. The
state couldn’t dispose of the property until the remains
were properly resettled, and the archaeology students
needed field credits. With stakes and wire they divided the
area into search grids, dug with hand shovels and heavy
equipment. After sifting the soil, bones and belt buckles
and soda bottles lay scattered on their trays in an
inscrutable exhibit.
The Nickel Boys called the official cemetery Boot Hill,
from the Saturday matinees they had enjoyed before they
were sent to the school and exiled from such pastimes. The
name stuck, generations later, with the South Florida
students who’d never seen a Western in their lives. Boot
Hill was just over the big slope on the north campus. The
white concrete X’s that marked the graves caught the
sunlight on bright afternoons. Names were carved into twothirds of the crosses; the rest were blank. Identification
was difficult, but competition between the young
archaeologists made for constant progress. The school
records, though incomplete and haphazard, narrowed down
who WILLIE 1954 had been. The burned remains accounted
for those who perished in the dormitory fire of 1921. DNA
matches with surviving family members—the ones the
university students were able to track down—reconnected
the dead to the living world that proceeded without them.
Of the forty-three bodies, seven remained unnamed.
The students piled the white concrete crosses in a
mound next to the excavation site. When they returned to
work one morning, someone had smashed them into chunks
and dust.
Boot Hill released its boys one by one. Jody was excited
when she hosed down some artifacts from one of the
trenches and came across her first remains. Professor
Carmine told her that the little flute of bone in her hand
most likely belonged to a raccoon or other small animal.
The secret graveyard redeemed her. Jody found it while
wandering the grounds in search of a cell signal. Her
professor backed up her hunch, on account of the
irregularities at the Boot Hill site: all those fractures and
cratered skulls, the rib cages riddled with buckshot. If the
remains from the official cemetery were suspicious, what
had befallen those in the unmarked burial ground? Two
days later cadaver-sniffing dogs and radar imaging
confirmed matters. No white crosses, no names. Just bones
waiting for someone to find them.
“They called this a school,” Professor Carmine said. You
can hide a lot in an acre, in the dirt.
One of the boys or one of their relatives tipped off the
media. The students had a relationship with some of the
boys at that point, after all the interviews. The boys
reminded them of crotchety uncles and flinty characters
from their old neighborhoods, men who might soften once
you got to know them but never lost that hard center. The
archaeology students told the boys about the second burial
site, told the family members of the dead kids they’d dug
up, and then a local Tallahassee station dispatched a
reporter. Plenty of boys had talked of the secret graveyard
before, but as it had ever been with Nickel, no one believed
them until someone else said it.
The national press picked up the story and people got
their first real look at the reform school. Nickel had been
closed for three years, which explained the savagery of the
grounds and the standard teenage vandalism. Even the
most innocent scene—a mess hall or the football field—
came out sinister, no photographic trickery necessary. The
footage was unsettling. Shadows crept and trembled at the
corners and each stain or mark looked like dried blood. As
if every image caught by the video rig emerged with its
dark nature exposed, the Nickel you could see going in and
then the Nickel you couldn’t see coming out.
If that happened to the harmless places, what do you
think the haunted places looked like?
Nickel Boys were cheaper than a dime-a-dance and you
got more for your money, or so they used to say. In recent
years, some of the former students organized support
groups, reuniting over the internet and meeting in diners
and McDonald’s. Around someone’s kitchen table after an
hour’s drive. Together they performed their own phantom
archaeology, digging through decades and restoring to
human eyes the shards and artifacts of those days. Each
man with his own pieces. He used to say, I’ll pay you a visit
later. The wobbly stairs to the schoolhouse basement. The
blood squished between my toes in my tennis shoes.
Reassembling those fragments into confirmation of a
shared darkness: If it is true for you, it is true for someone
else, and you are no longer alone.
Big John Hardy, a retired carpet salesman from Omaha,
maintained a website for the Nickel Boys with the latest
news. He kept the others apprised on the petition for
another investigation and how the statement of apology
from the government was coming along. A blinking digital
widget kept track of the fund-raising for the proposed
memorial. E-mail Big John the story of your Nickel days and
he’d post it with your picture. Sharing a link with your
family was a way of saying, This is where I was made. An
explanation and an apology.
The annual reunion, now in its fifth year, was strange
and necessary. The boys were old men now, with wives and
ex-wives and children they did or didn’t talk to, with wary
grandchildren who were brought around sometimes and
those whom they were prevented from seeing. They had
managed to scrape up a life after leaving Nickel or had
never fit in at all with normal people. The last smokers of
cigarette brands you never see, late to the self-help
regimens, always on the verge of disappearing. Dead in
prison, or decomposing in rooms they rented by the week,
frozen to death in the woods after drinking turpentine. The
men met in the conference room of the Eleanor Garden Inn
to catch up before caravaning out to Nickel for the solemn
tour. Some years you felt strong enough to head down that
concrete walkway, knowing that it led to one of your bad
places, and some years you didn’t. Avoid a building or stare
it in the face, depending on your reserves that morning. Big
John posted a report after each reunion for those who
couldn’t make it.
In New York City there lived a Nickel Boy who went by
the name of Elwood Curtis. He’d do a web search on the
old reform school now and then, see if there were any
developments, but he stayed away from the reunions and
didn’t add his name to the lists, for many reasons. What
was the point? Grown men. What, you take turns handing
each other Kleenex? One of the others posted a story about
the night he parked outside Spencer’s house, watching the
windows for hours, the silhouette figures inside, until he
talked himself out of revenge. He’d made his own leather
strap to use on the superintendent. Elwood didn’t get it. Go
all that way, might as well follow through.
When they found the secret graveyard, he knew he’d
have to return. The clutch of cedars over the TV reporter’s
shoulder brought back the heat on his skin, the screech of
the dry flies. It wasn’t far off at all. Never will be.
OceanofPDF.com
PART
One
OceanofPDF.com
E
CHAPTER ONE
lwood received the best gift of his life on
Christmas Day 1962, even if the ideas it
put in his head were his undoing. Martin
Luther King at Zion Hill was the only album he owned and
it never left the turntable. His grandmother Harriet had a
few gospel records, which she only played when the world
discovered a new mean way to work on her, and Elwood
wasn’t allowed to listen to the Motown groups or popular
songs like that on account of their licentious nature. The
rest of his presents that year were clothes—a new red
sweater, socks—and he certainly wore those out, but
nothing endured such good and constant use as the record.
Every scratch and pop it gathered over the months was a
mark of his enlightenment, tracking each time he entered
into a new understanding of the reverend’s words. The
crackle of truth.
They didn’t have a TV set but Dr. King’s speeches were
such a vivid chronicle—containing all that the Negro had
been and all that he would be—that the record was almost
as good as television. Maybe even better, grander, like the
towering screen at the Davis Drive-In, which he’d been to
twice. Elwood saw it all: Africans persecuted by the white
sin of slavery, Negroes humiliated and kept low by
segregation, and that luminous image to come, when all
those places closed to his race were opened.
The speeches had been recorded all over, Detroit and
Charlotte and Montgomery, connecting Elwood to the
rights struggle across the country. One speech even made
him feel like a member of the King family. Every kid had
heard of Fun Town, been there or envied someone who had.
In the third cut on side A, Dr.  King spoke of how his
daughter longed to visit the amusement park on Stewart
Avenue in Atlanta. Yolanda begged her parents whenever
she spotted the big sign from the expressway or the
commercials came on TV. Dr. King had to tell her in his low,
sad rumble about the segregation system that kept colored
boys and girls on the other side of the fence. Explain the
misguided thinking of some whites—not all whites, but
enough whites—that gave it force and meaning. He
counseled his daughter to resist the lure of hatred and
bitterness and assured her that “Even though you can’t go
to Fun Town, I want you to know that you are as good as
anybody who goes into Fun Town.”
That was Elwood—as good as anyone. Two hundred and
thirty miles south of Atlanta, in Tallahassee. Sometimes he
saw a Fun Town commercial while visiting his cousins in
Georgia. Lurching rides and happy music, chipper white
kids lining up for the Wild Mouse Roller Coaster, Dick’s
Mini Golf. Strap into the Atomic Rocket for a trip to the
moon. A perfect report card guaranteed free admission, the
commercials said, if your teacher stamped a red mark on it.
Elwood got all A’s and kept his stack of evidence for the day
they opened Fun Town to all God’s children, as Dr.  King
promised. “I’ll get in free every day for a month, easy,” he
told his grandmother, lying on the front-room rug and
tracing a threadbare patch with his thumb.
His grandmother Harriet had rescued the rug from the
alley behind the Richmond Hotel after the last renovation.
The bureau in her room, the tiny table next to Elwood’s
bed, and three lamps were also Richmond castoffs. Harriet
had worked at the hotel since she was fourteen, when she
had joined her mother on the cleaning staff. Once Elwood
entered high school, the hotel manager Mr. Parker made it
clear he’d hire him as a porter whenever he wanted, smart
kid like him, and the white man was disappointed when the
boy began working at Marconi’s Tobacco & Cigars.
Mr. Parker was always kind to the family, even after he had
to fire Elwood’s mother for stealing.
Elwood liked the Richmond and he liked Mr. Parker, but
adding a fourth generation to the hotel’s accounts made
him uneasy in a way he found difficult to describe. Even
before the encyclopedias. When he was younger, he sat on
a crate in the hotel kitchen after school, reading comic
books and Hardy Boys while his grandmother straightened
and scrubbed upstairs. With both his parents gone, she
preferred to have her nine-year-old grandson nearby
instead of alone in the house. Seeing Elwood with the
kitchen men made her think those afternoons were a kind
of school in their own right, that it was good for him to be
around men. The cooks and waiters took the boy for a
mascot, playing hide-and-seek with him and peddling
creaky wisdom on various topics: the white man’s ways,
how to treat a good-time gal, strategies for hiding money
around the house. Elwood didn’t understand what the older
men talked about most of the time, but he nodded gamely
before returning to his adventure stories.
After rushes, Elwood sometimes challenged the
dishwashers to plate-drying races and they made a goodnatured show of being disappointed by his superior skills.
They liked seeing his smile and his odd delight at each win.
Then the staff turned over. The new downtown hotels
poached personnel, cooks came and went, a few of the
waiters didn’t return after the kitchen reopened from flood
damage. With the change in staff, Elwood’s races changed
from endearing novelty to mean-spirited hustle; the latest
dishwashers were tipped off that the grandson of one of the
cleaning girls did your work for you if you told him it was a
game, keep on the lookout. Who was this serious boy who
loitered around while the rest of them busted their asses,
getting little pats on the head from Mr. Parker like he was a
damn puppy, nose in a comic book like he hadn’t a care?
The new men in the kitchen had different kinds of lessons
to impart to a young mind. Stuff they’d learned about the
world. Elwood remained unaware that the premise of the
competition had changed. When he issued a challenge,
everybody in the kitchen tried not to smirk.
Elwood was twelve when the encyclopedias appeared.
One of the busboys dragged a stack of boxes into the
kitchen and called for a powwow. Elwood squeezed in—it
was a set of encyclopedias that a traveling salesman had
left behind in one of the rooms upstairs. There were
legends about the valuables that rich white people left in
their rooms, but it was rare that this kind of plunder made
it down to their domain. Barney the cook opened the top
box and held up the leather-bound volume of Fisher’s
Universal Encyclopedia, Aa–Be. He handed it to Elwood,
who was surprised at how heavy it was, a brick with pages
edged in red. The boy flipped through, squinting at the tiny
words—Aegean, Archimedes, Argonaut—and had a picture
of himself on the front-room couch copying words he liked.
Words that looked interesting on the page or that sounded
interesting in his imagined pronunciations.
Cory the busboy offered up his find—he didn’t know how
to read and had no immediate plans to learn. Elwood made
his bid. Given the personality of the kitchen, it was hard to
think of anyone else who’d want the encyclopedias. Then
Pete, one of the new dishwashers, said he’d race him for it.
Pete was a gawky Texan who’d started working two
months prior. He was hired to bus tables, but after a few
incidents they moved him to the kitchen. He looked over
his shoulder when he worked, as if worried about being
watched, and didn’t talk much, although his gravelly
laughter made the other men in the kitchen direct their
jokes toward him over time. Pete wiped his hands on his
pants and said, “We got time before the dinner service, if
you’re up for it.”
The kitchen made a proper contest of it. The biggest yet.
A stopwatch was produced and handed to Len, the grayhaired waiter who’d worked at the hotel for more than
twenty years. He was meticulous about his black serving
uniform, and maintained that he was always the bestdressed man in the dining room, putting the white patrons
to shame. With his attention to detail, he’d make a
dedicated referee. Two fifty-plate stacks were arranged,
after a proper soaking supervised by Elwood and Pete. Two
busboys acted as seconds for this duel, ready to hand over
dry replacement rags when requested. A lookout stood at
the kitchen door in case a manager happened by.
While not prone to bravado, Elwood had never lost a
dish-drying contest in four years, and wore his confidence
on his face. Pete had a concentrated air. Elwood didn’t
perceive the Texan as a threat, having out-dried the man in
prior competitions. Pete was, in general, a good loser.
Len counted down from ten, and they began. Elwood
stuck to the method he’d perfected over the years,
mechanistic and gentle. He’d never let a wet plate slip or
chipped one by setting it on the counter too quickly. As the
kitchen men cheered them on, Pete’s mounting stack of
dried plates unnerved Elwood. The Texan had an edge on
him, displaying new reserves. The onlookers made
astonished noises. Elwood hurried, chasing after the image
of the encyclopedias in their front room.
Len said, “Stop!”
Elwood won by one plate. The men hollered and laughed
and traded glances whose meaning Elwood would interpret
later.
Harold, one of the busboys, slapped Elwood on the back.
“You were made to wash dishes, slick.” The kitchen
laughed.
Elwood returned volume Aa–Be to its box. It was a fancy
reward.
“You earned it,” Pete said. “I hope you get a lot of use
out of them.”
Elwood asked the housekeeping manager to tell his
grandmother he was going home. He couldn’t wait to see
the look on her face when she saw the encyclopedias on
their bookshelves, elegant and distinguished. Hunched, he
dragged the boxes to the bus stop on Tennessee. To see him
from across the street—the serious young lad heaving his
freight of the world’s knowledge—was to witness a scene
that might have been illustrated by Norman Rockwell, if
Elwood had had white skin.
At home, he cleared Hardy Boys and Tom Swifts from the
green bookcase in the front room and unpacked the boxes.
He paused with Ga, curious to see how the smart men at
the Fisher company handled galaxy. The pages were blank
—all of them. Every volume in the first box was blank
except for the one he’d seen in the kitchen. He opened the
other two boxes, his face getting hot. All the books were
empty.
When his grandmother came home, she shook her head
and told him maybe they were defective, or dummy copies
the salesman showed to customers as samples, so they
could see how a full set would look in their homes. That
night in bed his thoughts ticked and hummed like a
contraption. It occurred to him that the busboy, that all the
men in the kitchen had known the books were empty. That
they had put on a show.
He kept the encyclopedias in the bookcase anyway. They
looked impressive, even when the humidity peeled back the
covers. The leather was fake, too.
The next afternoon in the kitchen was his last. Everyone
paid too much attention to his face. Cory tested him with
“How’d you like those books?” and waited for a reaction.
Over by the sink Pete had a smile that looked as if it had
been hacked into his jaw with a knife. They knew. His
grandmother agreed that he was old enough to stay in the
house by himself. Through high school, he went back and
forth over the matter of whether the dishwashers had let
him win all along. He’d been so proud of his ability, dumb
and simple as it was. He never settled on one conclusion
until he got to Nickel, which made the truth of the contests
unavoidable.
OceanofPDF.com
S
CHAPTER TWO
aying goodbye to the kitchen meant
saying goodbye to his separate game, the
one he kept private: Whenever the
dining-room door swung open, he bet on whether there
were Negro patrons out there. According to Brown v. Board
of Education, schools had to desegregate—it was only a
matter of time before all the invisible walls came down. The
night the radio announced the Supreme Court’s ruling, his
grandmother shrieked as if someone had tossed hot soup in
her lap. She caught herself and straightened her dress.
“Jim Crow ain’t going to just slink off,” she said. “His
wicked self.”
The morning after the decision, the sun rose and
everything looked the same. Elwood asked his grandmother
when Negroes were going to start staying at the Richmond,
and she said it’s one thing to tell someone to do what’s
right and another thing for them to do it. She listed some of
his behavior as proof and Elwood nodded: Maybe so.
Sooner or later, though, the door would swing wide to
reveal a brown face—a dapper businessman in Tallahassee
for business or a fancy lady in town to see the sights—
enjoying the fine-smelling fare the cooks put out. He was
sure of it. The game began when he was nine, and three
years later the only colored people he saw in the dining
room carried plates or drinks or a mop. He never stopped
playing, up until his afternoons at the Richmond ended.
Whether his opponent in this game was his own foolishness
or the mulish constancy of the world was unclear.
Mr.  Parker was not the only one who saw a worthy
employee in Elwood. White men were always extending
offers of work to Elwood, recognizing his industrious
nature and steady character, or at least recognizing that he
carried himself differently than other colored boys his age
and taking this for industry. Mr. Marconi, the proprietor of
the tobacco shop on Macomb Street, had watched Elwood
since he was a baby, squealing in a noisy carriage that was
half rust. Elwood’s mother was a slim woman with dark,
tired eyes who never moved to quiet her child. She’d buy
armfuls of movie magazines and vanish into the street,
Elwood howling all the way.
Mr. Marconi left his perch by the register as seldom as
possible. Squat and perspiring, with a low pompadour and
a thin black mustache, he was inevitably disheveled by
evening. The atmosphere at the front of the store was
stringent with his hair tonic and he left an aromatic trail on
hot afternoons. From his chair, Mr.  Marconi observed
Elwood grow older and lean toward his own sun, veering
away from the neighborhood boys, who carried on and
roughhoused in the aisles and slipped Red Hots into their
dungarees when they thought Mr. Marconi wasn’t looking.
He saw everything, said nothing.
Elwood belonged to the second generation of his
Frenchtown customers. Mr. Marconi hung out his shingle a
few months after the army base opened in ’42. Negro
soldiers took the bus up from Camp Gordon Johnston or
from Dale Mabry Army Air Field, raised hell in Frenchtown
all weekend, then slumped back to train for war. He had
relatives who opened businesses downtown and thrived,
but a white man savvy to the economics of segregation
could turn a real buck. Marconi’s was a few doors down
from the Bluebell Hotel. The Tip Top Bar and Marybelle’s
Pool Hall were around the corner. He did a reliable trade in
various tobaccos and tins of Romeos prophylactics.
Once the war ended, he moved the cigars to the back of
the store, repainted the walls white, and added magazine
racks, penny candy, and a soda cooler, which did much to
improve the place’s reputation. He hired help. He didn’t
need an employee, but his wife liked telling people that he
had an employee, and he imagined it made the store more
approachable to a genteel segment of black Frenchtown.
Elwood was thirteen when Vincent, the tobacco shop’s
longtime stock boy, signed up for the army. Vincent hadn’t
been the most attentive employee, but he was prompt and
well-groomed, two qualities that Mr.  Marconi valued in
others if not in himself. On Vincent’s last day, Elwood
dawdled at the comics rack, as he did most afternoons. He
had a curious habit where he read every comic front to
back before he bought it, and he bought every one he
touched. Mr. Marconi asked why go through all that if he
was going to buy them whether they were good or not, and
Elwood said, “Just making sure.” The shopkeeper asked
him if he needed a job. Elwood closed the copy of Journey
into Mystery and said he’d have to ask his grandmother.
Harriet had a long list of rules for what was acceptable
and what was not, and sometimes the only way for Elwood
to know how it all worked was to make a mistake. He
waited until after dinner, once they’d finished the fried
catfish and the sour greens and his grandmother rose to
clear. In this case, she held no hidden reservations, despite
the fact that her uncle Abe had smoked cigars and look
what happened to him, despite Macomb Street’s history as
a laboratory of vice, and despite the fact she’d turned her
mistreatment by an Italian salesclerk decades ago into a
cherished grudge. “They’re probably not related,” she said,
wiping her hands. “Or if they are, distant cousins.”
She let Elwood work at the store after school and on
weekends, taking half his paycheck at the end of the week
for the household and half for college. He’d mentioned
going to college the summer prior, casually, with no inkling
of the momentousness of his words. Brown v. Board of
Education was an unlikely turn, but one of Harriet’s family
aspiring to higher education was an actual miracle. Any
misgivings over the tobacco shop collapsed before such a
notion.
Elwood tidied the newspapers and comic books in the
wire racks, wiped dust off the less popular sweets, and
made sure that the cigar boxes were arranged according to
Marconi’s theories about packaging and how it excited “the
happy part of the human brain.” He still hung around the
comics, reading them gingerly as if handling dynamite, but
the news magazines exerted a gravity. He fell under the
luxurious sway of Life magazine. A big white truck dropped
off a stack of Life every Thursday—Elwood came to learn
the sound of its brakes. Once he sorted the returns and
displayed the new arrivals, he hunkered on the stepladder
to follow the magazine’s latest excursions into unreckoned
corners of America.
He knew Frenchtown’s piece of the Negro’s struggle,
where his neighborhood ended and white law took over.
Life’s photo essays conveyed him to the front lines, to bus
boycotts in Baton Rouge, to counter sit-ins in Greensboro,
where young people not much older than him took up the
movement. They were beaten with metal bars, blasted by
fire hoses, spat on by white housewives with angry faces,
and frozen by the camera in tableaus of noble resistance.
The tiny details were a wonder: how the young men’s ties
remained straight black arrows in the whirl of violence,
how the curves of the young women’s perfect hairdos
floated against the squares of their protest signs.
Glamorous somehow, even when the blood flowed down
their faces. Young knights taking the fight to dragons.
Elwood was slight-shouldered, skinny as a pigeon, and he
worried about the safety of his glasses, which were
expensive and in his dreams broken in two by nightsticks,
tire irons, or baseball bats, but he wanted to enlist. He had
no choice.
Flipping pages during lulls. Elwood’s shifts at Marconi’s
provided models for the man he wished to become and
separated him from the type of Frenchtown boy he was not.
His grandmother had long steered him from hanging out
with the local kids, whom she regarded as shiftless,
clambering into rambunction. The tobacco shop, like the
hotel kitchen, was a safe preserve. Harriet raised him
strict, everyone knew, and the other parents on their
stretch of Brevard Street helped keep Elwood apart by
holding him up as an example. When the boys he used to
play cowboys and Indians with chased him down the street
every once in a while or threw rocks at him, it was less out
of mischief than resentment.
People from his block stopped in Marconi’s all the time,
and his worlds overlapped. One afternoon, the bell above
the door jangled and Mrs. Thomas walked in.
“Hello, Mrs. Thomas,” Elwood said. “There’s some cold
orange in there.”
“I think I just might, El,” she said. A connoisseur of the
latest styles, Mrs. Thomas was dressed this afternoon in a
homemade yellow polka-dot dress she’d copied from a
magazine profile of Audrey Hepburn. She was quite aware
that few women in the neighborhood could have worn it
with such confidence, and when she stood still it was hard
to escape the suspicion that she was posing, waiting for the
pop of flashbulbs.
Mrs.  Thomas had been Evelyn Curtis’s best friend
growing up. One of Elwood’s earliest memories was of
sitting on his mother’s lap on a hot day while they played
gin. He squirmed to see his mother’s cards and she told
him not to fuss, it was too hot out. When she got up to visit
the outhouse, Mrs.  Thomas snuck him sips of her orange
soda. His orange tongue gave them away and Evelyn halfheartedly scolded them while they giggled. Elwood kept
that day close.
Mrs. Thomas opened her purse to pay for her two sodas
and this week’s Jet. “You keeping up with that
schoolwork?”
“Yes, ma’am.”
“I don’t work the boy too hard,” Mr. Marconi said.
“Mmm,” Mrs.  Thomas said. Her tone was suspect.
Frenchtown ladies remembered the tobacco store from its
disreputable days and considered the Italian an accomplice
to domestic miseries. “You keep doing what you’re
supposed to, El.” She took her change and Elwood watched
her leave. His mother had left both of them; it was possible
she sent her friend postcards from this or that place, even
if she forgot to write him. One day Mrs.  Thomas might
share some news.
Mr.  Marconi carried Jet, of course, and Ebony. Elwood
got him to pick up The Crisis and The Chicago Defender,
and other black newspapers. His grandmother and her
friends subscribed, and he thought it strange that the store
didn’t sell them.
“You’re right,” Mr. Marconi said. He pinched his lip. “I
think we used to carry it. I don’t know what happened.”
“Great,” Elwood said.
Long after Mr.  Marconi had stopped minding his
regulars’ buying habits, Elwood remembered what brought
each person into the store. His predecessor, Vincent, had
occasionally livened up the place with a dirty joke, but it
couldn’t be said that he had initiative. Elwood possessed it
in spades, reminding Mr.  Marconi which tobacco vendor
had shorted them on the last delivery and which candy to
quit restocking. Mr.  Marconi struggled to tell the colored
ladies of Frenchtown apart—all of them wore a scowl when
they saw him—and Elwood made a competent ambassador.
He’d stare at the boy when he was lost in his magazines
and try to figure what made him tick. His grandmother was
firm, that was clear. The boy was intelligent and
hardworking and a credit to his race. But Elwood could be
thick-witted when it came to the simplest things. He didn’t
know when to stand back and let things be. Like the
business with the black eye.
Kids swiped candy, it didn’t matter what color their skin
was. Mr.  Marconi himself, in his untethered youth, had
engineered all sorts of foolishness. You lose a percentage
here and there, but that was in the overhead—kids steal a
candy bar today but they and their friends spend their
money in the store for years. Them and their parents.
Chase them out into the street over some little thing, word
gets around, especially in a neighborhood like this where
everybody’s in everybody’s business, and then the parents
stop coming in because they’re embarrassed. Letting the
kids steal was almost an investment, the way he looked at
it.
Elwood drifted to a different perspective during his time
in the store. Before he worked at Marconi’s, his friends
gloated over their candy heists, cackling and blowing
insolent pink bubbles of Bazooka once they got a good
distance from the store. Elwood didn’t join in but he’d
never had feelings on it. When Mr. Marconi hired him, his
boss explained his attitude toward sticky fingers, along
with where they kept the mop and what days to expect the
big deliveries. Over the months, Elwood saw sweets
disappear into boys’ pockets. Boys he knew. Maybe with a
wink to Elwood if they caught his eye. For a year, Elwood
said nothing. But the day Larry and Willie grabbed the
lemon candies when Mr. Marconi bent behind the counter,
he couldn’t restrain himself.
“Put it back.”
The boys stiffened. Larry and Willie had known Elwood
their whole lives. Played marbles and tag with him when
they were small, although that ended when Larry started a
fire in the vacant lot on Dade Street and Willie got left back
twice. Harriet struck them from the list of allowable
companions. Their three families went back in Frenchtown
for generations. Larry’s grandmother was in a church
group with Harriet, and Willie’s father had been a
childhood buddy of Elwood’s father, Percy. They shipped off
to the army together. Willie’s father spent every day on his
porch in his wheelchair, smoking a pipe, and he waved
whenever Elwood passed.
“Put it back,” Elwood said.
Mr.  Marconi tilted his head: That’s enough. The boys
returned the candy and left the store, smoldering.
They knew Elwood’s route. Sometimes jeered at him for
being a goody-two-shoes when he biked past Larry’s
window on his way home. That night they jumped him. It
was just getting dark and the smell of magnolias mingled
with the tang of fried pork. They slammed him and his bike
into the new asphalt the county had laid down that winter.
The boys tore his sweater, threw his glasses into the street.
As they beat him, Larry asked Elwood if he had any
damned sense; Willie declared that he needed to be taught
a lesson, and proceeded to do so. Elwood got a few licks in
here and there, not much to talk about. He didn’t cry. When
he came upon two little kids fighting on his block, Elwood
was the kind to intervene and cool things down. Now he
was getting his. An old man from across the street broke it
up and asked Elwood if he wanted to clean himself or have
a glass of water. Elwood declined.
The chain on his bike was popped and he walked it
home. Harriet didn’t press him when she asked about his
eye. He shook his head. By morning the livid bump
underneath was a bubble of blood.
Larry had a point, Elwood had to admit: From time to
time it appeared that he had no goddamned sense. He
couldn’t explain it, even to himself, until At Zion Hill gave
him a language. We must believe in our souls that we are
somebody, that we are significant, that we are worthful,
and we must walk the streets of life every day with this
sense of dignity and this sense of somebody-ness. The
record went around and around, like an argument that
always returned to its unassailable premise, and Dr. King’s
words filled the front room of the shotgun house. Elwood
bent to a code—Dr. King gave that code shape, articulation,
and meaning. There are big forces that want to keep the
Negro down, like Jim Crow, and there are small forces that
want to keep you down, like other people, and in the face of
all those things, the big ones and the smaller ones, you
have to stand up straight and maintain your sense of who
you are. The encyclopedias are empty. There are people
who trick you and deliver emptiness with a smile, while
others rob you of your self-respect. You need to remember
who you are.
This sense of dignity. The way the man said it, crackle
and all: an inalienable strength. Even when consequences
lay in wait on dark street corners on your way home. They
beat him up and tore his clothes and didn’t understand why
he wanted to protect a white man. How to tell them that
their transgressions against Mr.  Marconi were insults to
Elwood himself, whether it was a sucker candy or a comic
book? Not because any attack on his brother was an attack
on himself, like they said in church, but because for him to
do nothing was to undermine his own dignity. No matter
that Mr.  Marconi had told him he didn’t care, no matter
that Elwood had never said a word to his friends when they
stole in his presence. It didn’t make no sense until it made
the only sense.
That was Elwood—as good as anyone. On the day he was
arrested, just before the deputy appeared, an
advertisement for Fun Town came on the radio. He
hummed along. He remembered that Yolanda King was six
years old when her father told her the truth about the
amusement park and the white order that kept her outside
the fence looking in. Always looking into that other world.
Elwood was six when his parents took off and he thought,
that’s another thing tying him to her, because that’s when
he woke to the world.
OceanofPDF.com
O
CHAPTER THREE
n the first day of the school year, the
students of Lincoln High School
received their new secondhand
textbooks from the white high school across the way.
Knowing where the textbooks were headed, the white
students left inscriptions for the next owners: Choke,
Nigger! You Smell. Eat Shit. September was a tutorial in
the latest epithets of Tallahassee’s white youth, which, like
hemlines and haircuts, varied year to year. It was
humiliating to open a biology book, turn to the page on the
digestive system, and be confronted with Drop dead NIGGER,
but as the school year went on, the students of Lincoln
High School stopped noticing the curses and impolite
suggestions. How to get through the day if every indignity
capsized you in a ditch? One learned to focus one’s
attention.
Mr. Hill started working at the high school when Elwood
entered his junior year. He greeted Elwood and the rest of
the history class and wrote his name on the blackboard.
Then Mr.  Hill handed out black markers and told his
students that the first order of business was to strike out all
the bad words in the textbooks. “That always burned me
up,” he said, “seeing that stuff. You all are trying to get an
education—no need to get caught up with what those fools
say.” Like the rest of the class, Elwood went slow at first.
They looked at the textbooks and then at the teacher. Then
they dug in with their markers. Elwood got giddy. His heart
sped: this escapade. Why hadn’t anyone told them to do
this before?
“Make sure you don’t miss anything,” Mr. Hill said. “You
know those white kids are wily.” While the students struck
out the curses and cusses, he told them about himself. He
was new to Tallahassee, having just finished his studies at a
teaching college in Montgomery. He’d first visited Florida
the previous summer, when he stepped off a bus from
Washington, DC, in Tallahassee as a freedom rider. He had
marched. Installed himself at forbidden lunch counters and
waited for service. “I got a lot of course work done,” he
said, “sitting there waiting for my cup of coffee.” Sheriffs
threw him in jail for breach of peace. He was almost bored
as he shared these stories, as if what he had done was the
most natural thing in the world. Elwood wondered if he’d
seen him in the pages of Life or the Defender, arm in arm
with the great movement leaders, or in the background
with the anonymous ones, standing tall and proud.
Mr. Hill maintained a broad collection of bow ties: polka
dot, bright red, banana yellow. His wide, kind face was
somehow made kinder by the crescent scar over his right
eye where a white man had slugged him with a tire iron.
“Nashville,” he said when someone asked one afternoon,
and he bit into his pear. The class focused on US history
since the Civil War, but at every opportunity Mr. Hill guided
them to the present, linking what had happened a hundred
years ago to their current lives. They’d set off down one
road at the beginning of class and it always led back to
their doorsteps.
Mr. Hill caught on that Elwood had a fascination with the
rights struggle and gave the boy a wry smile when he
chimed in. The rest of the faculty of Lincoln High School
had long held the boy in high esteem, grateful for his cool
temperament. Those who’d taught his parents years ago
had a hard time squaring him—he may have carried his
father’s name but there was nothing in the boy of Percy’s
feral charm, or of Evelyn’s unnerving gloom. Grateful was
the teacher rescued by Elwood’s contributions when the
classroom fell drowsy with the afternoon heat and he
offered up Archimedes or Amsterdam at the key moment.
The boy had one usable volume of Fisher’s Universal
Encyclopedia, so he used it, what else could he do? Better
than nothing. Skipping around, wearing it down, revisiting
his favorite parts as if it were one of his adventure tales. As
a story, the encyclopedia was disjointed and incomplete,
but still exciting in its own right. Elwood filled his notebook
with the good parts, definitions and etymology. Later he’d
find this scrap-rummaging pathetic.
He had been the natural choice at the end of his
freshman year when they needed a new lead for the annual
Emancipation Day play. Playing Thomas Jackson, the man
who informs the Tallahassee slaves that they are free, was
training for the version of himself who lived up the road.
Elwood invested the character with the same earnestness
he brought to all his responsibilities. In the play, Thomas
Jackson was a cutter on a sugar plantation who ran away to
join the Union Army at the start of the war, returning home
a statesman. Every year Elwood concocted new inflections
and gestures, the speeches losing their stiffness as his own
convictions enlivened the portrait. “It is my pleasure to
inform you fine gentlemen and ladies that the time has
come to throw off the yoke of slavery and take our places
as true Americans—at long last!” The play’s author, a
teacher of biology, had attempted to summon the magic of
her one trip to Broadway years before.
In the three years Elwood played the role, the one
constant was his nervousness at the climax, when Jackson
had to kiss his best girl on the cheek. They were to be
married and, it was implied, live a happy and fertile life in
the new Tallahassee. Whether Marie-Jean was played by
Anne, with her freckles and sweet moon face, or by
Beatrice, whose buck teeth hooked into her lower lip, or in
his final performance by Gloria Taylor, a foot taller and
sending him to the tips of his toes, a knot of anxiety
tautened in his chest and he got dizzy. All the hours in
Marconi’s library had rehearsed him for heavy speeches
but left him ill-prepared for performances with the brown
beauties of Lincoln High, on the stage and off.
The movement he read and fantasized about was far off
—then it crept closer. Frenchtown had its protests, but
Elwood was too young to join in. He was ten years old when
the two girls from Florida A&M University proposed the
bus boycott. His grandmother initially didn’t understand
why they wanted to bring all that fuss to their city, but after
a few days she was carpooling to the hotel like everyone
else. “Everybody in Leon County has gone crazy,” she said,
“including me!” That winter the city finally integrated the
buses and she got on and saw a colored driver behind the
wheel. Sat where she wanted.
Four years later, when the students got it in their mind
to sit down at the lunch counter at Woolworths, Elwood
remembered his grandmother cackling with approval. She
even gave fifty cents to support their legal defense after the
sheriff jailed them. When the demonstrations trailed off,
she continued to boycott downtown stores, although it was
not clear how much of that was solidarity or her own
protest against high prices. In the spring of ’63, word
spread that the college kids were going to picket the
Florida Theatre to open its seats to Negroes. Elwood had
good reason to think that Harriet would be proud of him for
stepping up.
He was incorrect. Harriet Johnson was a slight
hummingbird of a woman who conducted herself in
everything with furious purpose. If something was worth
doing—working, eating, talking to another person—it was
worth doing seriously or not at all. She kept a sugarcane
machete under her pillow for intruders, and it was difficult
for Elwood to think that the old woman was afraid of
anything. But fear was her fuel.
Yes, Harriet had joined the bus boycott. She had to—she
couldn’t be the only woman in Frenchtown to take public
transportation. But she trembled each time Slim Harrison
pulled up in his ’57 Cadillac and she squeezed into the back
with the other downtown-bound ladies. When the sit-ins
started, she was grateful that no one expected a public
gesture on her part. Sit-ins were a young person’s game
and she didn’t have the heart. Act above your station, and
you will pay. Whether it was God angry at her for taking
more than her portion or the white man teaching her not to
ask for more crumbs than he wanted to give, Harriet would
pay. Her father had paid for not stepping out of the way of
a white lady on Tennessee Avenue. Her husband, Monty,
paid when he stepped up. Elwood’s father, Percy, got too
many ideas when he joined the army so that when he came
back there was no room in Tallahassee for everything in his
head. Now, Elwood. She’d bought that Martin Luther King
record from a salesman outside the Richmond for a dime
and it was the damnedest ten cents she’d ever handed over.
That record was nothing but ideas.
Hard work was a fundamental virtue, for hard work
didn’t allow time for marches or sit-ins. Elwood would not
make a commotion of himself by messing with that movietheater nonsense, she said. “You have made an agreement
with Mr. Marconi to work in his store after school. If your
boss can’t depend on you, you won’t be able to keep a job.”
Duty might protect him, as it had protected her.
A cricket under the house made a racket. Should’ve been
paying rent, it had been flopping with them for so long.
Elwood looked up from his science book and said, “Okay.”
The next afternoon he asked Mr.  Marconi for a day off.
Elwood had been out sick two days, but apart from that and
some visits to see family, he hadn’t missed work in those
three years at the store.
Mr.  Marconi said sure. Didn’t even look up from his
racing form.
Elwood dressed in the dark slacks from last year’s
Emancipation Day play. He’d grown a few inches, so he let
them out and they showed the barest sliver of his white
socks. A new emerald tie clip held his black tie in place and
the knot only took six attempts. His shoes glinted with
polish. He looked the part, even if he still worried for his
glasses if the police brought out nightsticks. If the whites
carried iron pipes and baseball bats. He waved off the
bloody images from newspapers and magazines and tucked
in his shirt.
Elwood heard the chants when he reached the Esso
station on Monroe. “What do we want? Freedom! When do
we want it? Now!” The A&M students marched in snaky
loops in front of the Florida, hoisting signs and rotating
slogans under the marquee. The theater was showing The
Ugly American—if you had seventy-five cents and the right
skin color, you could see Marlon Brando. The sheriff and his
deputies had installed themselves on the sidewalk in dark
sunglasses, arms crossed. A group of whites jeered and
taunted behind the policemen, and more white men trotted
down the street to join them. Elwood kept his eyes down as
he walked around the mob and slipped into the protest line
behind an older girl in a striped sweater. She grinned at
him and nodded as if she had been waiting for him.
He calmed once he joined the human chain and mouthed
the words with the others. EQUAL TREATMENT UNDER THE LAW.
Where was his sign? In his concentration on looking the
part, he’d forgotten his props. He couldn’t have matched
the older kids’ perfect stencil work. They’d had practice.
NONVIOLENCE IS OUR WATCHWORD. WE SHALL WIN BY LOVE. A short
boy with a shaved head waved one that said, ARE YOU THE
UGLY AMERICAN in a sea of cartoony question marks.
Someone grabbed Elwood’s shoulder. He thought he’d see
a monkey wrench bearing down, but it was Mr.  Hill. His
history teacher invited him into a group of Lincoln seniors.
Bill Tuddy and Alvin Tate, two guys from varsity basketball,
shook his hand. They’d never acknowledged him before.
He’d kept his movement dreams so close that it never
occurred to him that others in his school shared his need to
stand up.
The next month the sheriff arrested more than two
hundred protestors and charged them with contempt,
snatching collars in a roil of tear gas, but this first march
went off without incident. By then the FAMU students would
be joined by those from Melvin Griggs Technical. White
kids from the University of Florida and Florida State.
Skilled hands from the Congress of Racial Equality. This
day, old and young white men shouted at them, but it was
nothing Elwood hadn’t heard shouted from cars when
biking down the street. One of the red-faced white boys
looked like Cameron Parker, the son of the Richmond’s
manager, and the next circuit confirmed it. They’d traded
comic books a few years ago in the alley behind the hotel.
Cameron didn’t recognize him. A flashbulb exploded in his
face and Elwood started, but the photographer was from
the Register, which his grandmother refused to read
because their race coverage was so slanted. A college girl
in a tight blue sweater handed him a sign that said I AM A
MAN and when the protest moved to the State Theatre, he
held it over his head and lent his voice to the proud chorus.
The State was playing The Day Mars Invaded Earth and
that night he thought he’d traveled a hundred thousand
miles in one day.
Three days later Harriet confronted him—one of her
circle had seen him and that’s how long it took for the news
to get back to her. It had been years since she spanked him
with a belt and now he was much too big, so she resorted
to an old Johnson family recipe for the silent treatment, one
that dated back to Reconstruction and achieved a complete
sense of erasure in its target. She instituted a ban on the
record player and, recognizing the resiliency of this
younger generation of colored youth, moved it into her
bedroom and weighed it down with bricks. They both
suffered in the quiet.
After a week, things in the house were back to their
routine, but Elwood was changed. Closer. At the
demonstration, he had felt somehow closer to himself. For a
moment. Out there in the sun. It was enough to feed his
dreams. Once he got to college and out of their little
shotgun house on Brevard, he’d start his life. Take girls to
the movies—he was done stymieing himself on that front—
and figure out a course of study. Find his place in the busy
line of young dreamers who dedicated themselves to Negro
uplift.
That last summer in Tallahassee passed quickly. Mr. Hill
gave him a copy of James Baldwin’s Notes of a Native Son
on the last day of school, and his mind churned. Negroes
are Americans and their destiny is the country’s destiny. He
hadn’t marched on the Florida Theatre in defense of his
rights or those of the black race of which he was a part; he
had marched for everyone’s rights, even those who shouted
him down. My struggle is your struggle, your burden is my
burden. But how to tell people? He stayed up late writing
letters on the racial question to the Tallahassee Register,
which did not run them, and The Chicago Defender, which
printed one. “We ask of the older generation, Will you pick
up our challenge?” Bashful, he didn’t tell anyone and wrote
under a pseudonym: Archer Montgomery. It sounded stuffy
and smart, and he didn’t realize he’d used his grandfather’s
name until he saw it in black-and-white newsprint.
In June Mr. Marconi became a grandfather, a milestone
that exposed new facets in the Italian. He turned the shop
into a showcase for avuncular enthusiasm. The long
silences gave way to lessons from his immigrant struggles
and eccentric business advice. He took to closing the shop
an hour early to visit his granddaughter and paid Elwood
for a full shift. When this happened, Elwood strolled over to
the basketball courts to see if anyone was playing. He only
ever watched, but his excursion to the protests had made
him less shy and he made a few friends on the sidelines,
dudes from two streets over whom he’d seen for years but
never talked to. Other times he might go downtown with
Peter Coombs, a neighborhood boy Harriet approved of on
account that he played violin and shared a bookish bent
with her grandson. If Peter didn’t have practice, they
wandered the record stores and furtively checked out the
covers of LPs they were forbidden to buy.
“What’s ‘Dynasound’?” Peter asked.
A new style of music? A different way of hearing? They
were confounded.
Once in a while on hot afternoons girls from FAMU
stopped in the store for a soda, someone from the Florida
demonstration. Elwood asked for news on the protests, and
they’d brighten at the connection and pretend to recognize
him. More than one told him that they assumed he was in
college. He took their observations as compliments,
ornaments on his daydreams about leaving home. Optimism
made Elwood as malleable as the cheap taffy below the
register. He was primed when Mr.  Hill appeared in the
store that July and made his suggestion.
Elwood didn’t recognize him at first. No colorful bow tie,
an orange plaid shirt open to show his undershirt, hip
sunglasses—Mr.  Hill looked like someone who hadn’t
thought about work for months, not weeks. He greeted his
former student with the lazy ease of someone who had the
whole summer off. For the first summer in a while he
wasn’t traveling, he told Elwood. “There’s plenty here to
keep me occupied,” he said, nodding toward the sidewalk.
A young woman in a floppy straw hat waited for him, her
thin hand shading her eyes from the sunlight.
Elwood asked Mr. Hill if he needed anything.
“I came here to see you, Elwood,” he said. “A friend of
mine told me about an opportunity and I thought of you
right off the bat.”
Mr.  Hill had a comrade from the freedom riders, a
college professor who’d landed a job at Melvin Griggs
Technical, the colored college just south of Tallahassee.
Teaching English and American literature, just finished his
third year. The school had been poorly managed for some
time; the new president of the college was turning things
around. The courses at Melvin Griggs had been open to
high-achieving high-school students for some time, but
none of the local families knew about it. The president put
Mr.  Hill’s friend on it, and he reached out: Perhaps there
were a few exceptional kids at Lincoln who might be
interested?
Elwood tightened his hands on the broom. “That sounds
great, but I don’t know if we have the money for classes
like that.” Later, he’d shake his head: College classes were
exactly what he’d been saving up for, what did it matter if
he took them while still at Lincoln?
“That’s the thing, Elwood—they’re free. This fall at least,
so they can get the word out in the community.”
“I’ll have to ask my grandmother.”
“You do that, Elwood,” Mr.  Hill said. “And I can talk to
her, too.” He put his hand on Elwood’s shoulder. “The main
thing is, it’d be perfect for a young man like you. You’re the
type of student they came up with this for.”
Later that afternoon as he chased a fat, buzzing fly
around the store, Elwood thought there probably weren’t a
lot of white kids in Tallahassee who studied at the college
level. He who gets behind in a race must forever remain
behind or run faster than the man in front.
Harriet expressed no misgivings over Mr.  Hill’s offer—
the word free was a master switch. After that, Elwood’s
summer moved as slow as a mud turtle. Because Mr. Hill’s
friend taught English, he thought he had to sign up for a
literature course, but even when he found out he could take
anything he wanted, he stuck with it. The survey course on
British writers wasn’t practical, as his grandmother pointed
out, but that was its charm, the more he thought about it.
He had been exceedingly practical for a long time.
Perhaps the textbooks at the college might be new.
Unscarred. Nothing to cross out. It was possible.
The day before Elwood’s first college class, Mr. Marconi
summoned him to the cash register. Elwood had to miss his
Thursday shifts in order to attend; he assumed his boss
wanted to make sure things were in order for his absence.
The Italian cleared his throat and pushed a velvet case to
him. “For your education,” he said.
It was a midnight-blue fountain pen with brass trim. A
nice gift, even if Mr.  Marconi got a discount because the
stationers were a steady client. They shook hands in a
manly fashion.
Harriet wished him good luck. She checked his school
outfit every morning to make sure he was presentable, but
apart from plucking the occasional piece of lint never made
any corrections. This day was no different. “You look smart,
El,” she said. She kissed him on the cheek before heading
to the bus stop, hunching her shoulders in the way she did
when she was trying not to cry in front of him.
Elwood had plenty of time after school to get to the
college, but he was so eager to see Melvin Griggs for the
first time that he set out early. Two rivets in his bike chain
broke the night he got that black eye, and ever since it
tended to snap when he took it out for long rides. He’d
stick out his thumb or walk the seven miles. Step through
the gates and explore the campus, get lost in all those
buildings, or just sit on a bench off the quadrangle and
breathe it in.
He waited at the corner of Old Bainbridge for a colored
driver who headed for the state road. Two pickups passed
him by and then a brilliant-green ’61 Plymouth Fury
slowed, low and finned like a giant catfish. The driver
leaned over and opened the passenger door. “Going south,”
he said. The green-and-white vinyl seats squeaked when
Elwood slid inside.
“Rodney,” the man said. Rodney had a sprawling but
solid physique, like a Negro version of Edward G. Robinson.
His gray-and-purple pinstripe suit completed the costume.
When Rodney shook his hand, the rings on his fingers bit
and made Elwood wince.
“Elwood.” He put his satchel between his legs and
looked over the space-age dashboard of the Plymouth, all
the push buttons sticking out of the silver detailing.
They headed south toward County Road 636. Rodney
tapped vainly at the radio. “This always gives me trouble.
You try it.” Elwood stabbed the buttons and found an R&B
station. He almost turned the channel, but Harriet wasn’t
here to cluck over the double meanings in the lyrics, her
explanations of which always left him mystified and
dubious. He let the station sit, it was a doo-wop group.
Rodney wore the same hair tonic as Mr. Marconi. The air in
the car was acrid and heavy with the stuff. Even on his day
off, he couldn’t rid himself of it.
Rodney was on his way back from seeing his mother,
who lived in Valdosta. He said he hadn’t heard of Melvin
Griggs before, putting a dent in Elwood’s pride over his big
day. “College,” Rodney said. He whistled through his teeth.
“I started working in a chair factory when I was fourteen,”
he added.
“I have a job in a tobacco store,” Elwood said.
“I’m sure you do,” Rodney said.
The disc jockey rattled off the information for the
Sunday swap meet. A commercial for Fun Town came on
and Elwood hummed along.
“What’s this?” Rodney said. He exhaled loudly and
cursed. Ran his hand over his conk.
The red light of the prowl car spun in the rearview
mirror.
They were in the country and there were no other cars.
Rodney muttered and pulled over. Elwood put his satchel in
his lap and Rodney told him to keep cool.
The white deputy parked a few yards behind them. He
put his left hand on his holster and walked up. He took off
his sunglasses and put them in his chest pocket.
Rodney said, “You don’t know me, do you?”
“No,” Elwood said.
“I’ll tell him that.”
The deputy had his gun out now. “First thing I thought
when they said to keep an eye out for a Plymouth,” he said.
“Only a nigger’d steal that.”
OceanofPDF.com
PART
Two
OceanofPDF.com
A
CHAPTER FOUR
fter the judge ordered him to Nickel,
Elwood had three last nights at home.
The state car arrived at seven o’clock
Tuesday morning. The officer of the court was a good old
boy with a meaty backwoods beard and a hungover wobble
to his step. He’d outgrown his shirt and the pressure
against the buttons made him look upholstered. But he was
a white man with a pistol so despite his dishevelment he
sent a vibration. Along the street men watched from
porches and smoked and gripped the railings as if afraid of
falling overboard. The neighbors peeked through their
windows for a view, connecting the scene to events from
years before, when a boy or a man was taken away and he
was not someone who lived across the street but kin.
Brother, son.
The officer tossed a toothpick around in his mouth when
he talked, which was not often. He handcuffed Elwood to a
metal bar that ran behind the front seat and didn’t speak
for two hundred and seventy-five miles.
They got down to Tampa and five minutes later the
officer was in a fight with the clerk at the jail. There had
been a mistake: All three boys were headed for the Nickel
Academy, and the colored boy was supposed to be picked
up last, not first. Tallahassee was only an hour away from
the school after all. Didn’t he think it strange that he was
driving the boy up and down the state like a yo-yo, the clerk
asked? At this point his face was red.
“I just read what’s on the paper,” the officer said.
“It’s alphabetical,” the clerk said.
Elwood rubbed at the mark the cuffs cut into his wrists
and could have sworn the bench in the waiting room was a
church pew, it was the same shape.
Half an hour later they were on the road again.
Franklin  T. and Bill Y.: alphabetically distant and
temperamentally even farther. Elwood took the two white
boys next to him for rough characters from the first scowl.
Franklin T. had the most freckled face he’d ever seen, with
a deep suntan and crew-cut red hair. He had a downcast
look, head sunk, staring at his toes, but when he lifted his
eyes to other people they were invariably vesseled with
fury. Bill Y.’s eyes, for their part, had been punched black,
purple, and lurid. His lips were puffed and scabbed. The
brown, pear-shaped birthmark on his right cheek added
another hue to his mottled face. He snorted when he got a
look at Elwood, and whenever their legs touched on the
drive, Bill pulled back as if he’d leaned against a hot
chimney stove.
Whatever their life stories, whatever they’d done to get
sent to Nickel, the boys were chained together in the same
fashion and headed to the same destination. Franklin and
Bill exchanged notes after a while. This was Franklin’s
second visit to Nickel. The first time was for being
recalcitrant; he was back for truancy. He got a licking for
eyeballing the wife of one of the house fathers, but other
than that the place was decent, he supposed. Away from his
stepfather at least. Bill was being raised by his sister and
fell in with a bunch of bad apples, as the judge put it. They
broke the front window of a pharmacy, but Bill got off easy.
He was going to Nickel because he was only fourteen,
while the rest were heading up to Piedmont.
The officer told the white boys that they were sitting
with a car thief and Bill laughed. “Oh, I used to go joyriding
all the time,” he said. “They should have pinched me for
that, not some dumb window.”
Outside of Gainesville they drifted off the interstate. The
officer pulled over to let everyone piss and gave them
mustard sandwiches. He didn’t cuff them when they got
back in the car. The officer said he knew they weren’t going
to run. He skirted Tallahassee, taking the back road around
it like the place didn’t exist anymore. I don’t even recognize
the trees, Elwood told himself when they got to Jackson
County. Feeling low.
He got a look at the school and thought maybe Franklin
was right—Nickel wasn’t that bad. He expected tall stone
walls and barbed wire, but there were no walls at all. The
campus was kept up meticulously, a bounty of lush green
dotted with two- and three-story buildings of red brick. The
cedar trees and beeches cut out portions of shade, tall and
ancient. It was the nicest-looking property Elwood had ever
seen—a real school, a good one, not the forbidding
reformatory he’d conjured the last few weeks. In a sad joke,
it intersected with his visions of Melvin Griggs Technical,
minus a few statues and columns.
They drove up the long road to the main administration
building and Elwood caught sight of a football field where
some boys scrimmaged and yelped. In his head he’d seen
kids attached to balls and chains, something out of
cartoons, but these fellows were having a swell time out
there, thundering around the grass.
“All right,” Bill said, pleased. Elwood was not the only
one reassured.
The officer said, “Don’t get smart. If the housemen don’t
run you down, and the swamp don’t suck you up—”
“They call in those dogs from the state penitentiary,
Apalachee,” Franklin said.
“You get along and you’ll get along,” the officer said.
Inside the building the officer waved down a secretary
who took them into a yellow room whose walls were lined
with wooden filing cabinets. The chairs were in classroom
rows and the boys picked spots far apart from one another.
Elwood took a place in the front, per his custom. They all
sat up when Superintendent Spencer knocked the door
open.
Maynard Spencer was a white man in his late fifties, bits
of silver in his cropped black hair. A real “crack of dawner,”
as Harriet used to say, who moved with a deliberate air, as
if he rehearsed everything in front of a mirror. He had a
narrow raccoon face that drew Elwood’s attention to his
tiny nose and dark circles under his eyes and thick bristly
eyebrows. Spencer was fastidious with his dark blue Nickel
uniform; every crease in his clothes looked sharp enough to
cut, as if he were a living blade.
Spencer nodded at Franklin, who grabbed the corners of
his desk. The supervisor suppressed a smile, as if he’d
known the boy would be back. He leaned against the
blackboard and crossed his arms. “You got here late in the
day,” he said, “so I won’t go on too long. Everybody’s here
because they haven’t figured out how to be around decent
people. That’s okay. This is a school, and we’re teachers.
We’re going to teach you how to do things like everyone
else.
“I know you heard all this before, Franklin, but it didn’t
take, obviously. Maybe this time it will. Right now, all of you
are Grubs. We have four ranks of behavior here—start as a
Grub, work your way up to Explorer, then Pioneer, and
finally, Ace. Earn merits for acting right, and you move on
up the ladder. You work on achieving the highest rank of
Ace and then you graduate and go home to your families.”
He paused. “If they’ll have you, but that’s between y’all.”
An Ace, he said, listens to the housemen and his house
father, does his work without shirking and malingering, and
applies himself to his studies. An Ace does not roughhouse,
he does not cuss, he does not blaspheme or carry on. He
works to reform himself, from sunrise to sunset. “It’s up to
you how much time you spend with us,” Spencer said. “We
don’t mess around with idiots here. If you mess up, we have
a place for you, and you will not like it. I’ll see to it
personally.”
Spencer had a severe face, but when he touched the
enormous key ring on his belt the corners of his mouth
twitched in pleasure, it seemed, or to signal a murkier
emotion. The supervisor turned to Franklin, the boy who’d
come back for a second taste of Nickel. “Tell them,
Franklin.”
Franklin’s voice cracked and he had to fix himself before
he got out, “Yes, sir. You don’t want to step over the line in
here.”
The supervisor looked at each boy in turn, took notes in
his head, and stood. “Mr.  Loomis will finish processing
you,” he said, and walked out. The ring of keys on his belt
jangled like spurs on a sheriff in a Western.
A sullen young white man—Loomis—appeared minutes
later and led them to the basement room where they kept
the school uniforms. Denim pants, gray work shirts, and
brown brogues in different sizes filled shelves on the walls.
Loomis told the boys to find their sizes, directing Elwood to
the colored section, which contained the more-threadbare
items. They changed into their new clothes. Elwood folded
his shirt and dungarees and put them in the canvas sack
he’d brought from home. He had two sweaters in the bag,
and his suit from the Emancipation Day play, for church.
Franklin and Bill hadn’t brought anything with them.
Elwood tried not to stare at the marks on the other boys’
bodies as they dressed. Both of them had long lumpy lines
of scars and what looked like burn marks. He never saw
Franklin and Bill after that day. The school had more than
six hundred students; the white boys went down the hill
and the black boys went up the hill.
Back in the intake room, the boys waited for their house
fathers to fetch them. Elwood’s arrived first, a chubby,
white-haired man with dark skin and gray, mirthful eyes.
Where Spencer was severe and intimidating, Blakeley’s
personality was soft and pleasant. He gave Elwood a warm
handshake and told him that he was in charge of his
assigned dormitory, Cleveland.
They walked to the colored housing. Elwood’s posture
unscrewed. He was scared of a place that was run by men
like Spencer and what that meant for his time there—to be
under the eyes of men who liked to make threats and
relished the effect of their threats on people—but perhaps
the black staff looked after their own. And even if they
were just as mean as the white men, Elwood had never
permitted himself the kind of misbehavior that landed
others in trouble. He consoled himself with the notion that
he just had to keep doing what he’d always done: act right.
There weren’t many students out and about. Figures
moved in the windows of the residential buildings.
Dinnertime, Elwood supposed. The few black boys who
passed them on the concrete walkway greeted Blakeley
with respect and didn’t see Elwood at all.
Blakeley said he’d worked at the school for eleven years,
from the “bad old days up to now.” The school had a
philosophy, he explained, in that they put the boys’ fates in
their own hands. “You boys are in charge of everything,”
Blakeley said. “Burn the bricks in all these buildings you
see here, lay the concrete, take care of all this grass. Do a
good job, too, as you can see.” Work keeps the boys level,
he continued, provides skills they can use when they
graduate. Nickel’s printing press did all the publishing for
the government of Florida, from the tax regulations to the
building codes to the parking tickets. “Learn how to
execute those big orders and take your corner of
responsibility, that’s knowledge you can draw on for the
rest of your life.”
Every boy had to attend school, Blakeley said, that was a
rule. Other reformatory schools might not strike that
balance between reform and education, but Nickel made
sure that their charges did not fall behind, with classroom
instruction every other day, alternating with work details,
Sundays off.
The house father noticed the change in Elwood’s
expression. “Not what you expected?”
“I was going to take college classes this year,” Elwood
said. It was October; he would have been deep into the
semester.
“Speak to Mr.  Goodall about it,” Blakeley said. “He
teaches the older students. I’m sure you can come to an
arrangement.” He smiled. “You ever worked a field?” he
asked. They grew multiple crops on the 1,400 acres—limes,
sweet potatoes, watermelon. “I came up on a farm,”
Blakeley said. “A lot of these kids, it’s their first time taking
care of anything.”
“Yes, sir,” Elwood said. There was a tag or something in
his shirt; it kept sticking him in the neck.
Blakeley stopped. He said, “You know when to say, Yes,
sir—which is always—you’ll be okay, son.” He was familiar
with Elwood’s “situation”—his intonation swaddled the
word in euphemism. “A lot of the boys here, they got in
over their heads. This is an opportunity to take stock and
get your head right.”
Cleveland was identical to the other dormitories on the
campus: Nickel brick under a green copper roof,
surrounded by box hedges that clawed out of the red soil.
Blakeley took Elwood through the front door and it was
swiftly clear that outside was one thing and inside another.
The warped floors creaked incessantly and the yellow walls
were scuffed and scratched. Stuffing dribbled from the
couches and armchairs in the recreation room. Initials and
epithets marked the tables, gouged by a hundred
mischievous hands. Elwood fixated on the housekeeping
chores Harriet would have ticked off for his attention: the
fuzzy haloes of finger grime around every cabinet latch and
doorknob, the balls of dirt and hair in the corners.
Blakeley explained the layout. The first floor of each
dorm was taken up by a small kitchen, the administration
offices, and two large assembly rooms. On the second were
the dorm rooms, two of them for the high-school-age
students and one reserved for the younger kids. “We call
the younger students ‘chucks,’ but don’t ask me why—
nobody knows.” On the top was where Blakeley lived and
some utility rooms. The boys were heading to bed, Blakeley
told him. The dining hall was a walk and they were
wrapping up supper, but did he want something from the
kitchen before they closed for the night? Elwood couldn’t
think of food, he was too knotted up.
There was an empty bed in room 2. Three rows of bunks
stretched over the blue linoleum, each row with ten beds,
each bed with a trunk at the foot for the boy’s things. No
one had paid Elwood any attention on the walk over, but in
here each boy took his measure, some of them conferring
quietly with their buddies as Blakeley took him down the
rows and others filing away their appraisals for later. One
boy looked like a thirty-year-old man, but Elwood knew that
was impossible since they let you out when you turned
eighteen. Some of the boys carried themselves rough, like
the white boys in the car from Tampa, but he was relieved
that a lot of them looked like regular guys from his
neighborhood, just sadder. If they were regular, he’d make
it through.
Despite what he’d heard, Nickel was indeed a school and
not a grim jail for juveniles. Elwood had gotten off lucky, his
lawyer said. Stealing a car was a big-ticket offense for
Nickel. He’d learn that most of the kids had been sent here
for much lesser—and nebulous and inexplicable—offenses.
Some students were wards of the state, without family, and
there was nowhere else to put them.
Blakeley opened the trunk to show Elwood his soap and
towel, and introduced him to the boys who slept on either
side of him, Desmond and Pat. The house father instructed
them to show Elwood the ropes: “Don’t think I won’t be
watching you.” The two boys mumbled hello and returned
to their baseball cards once Blakeley disappeared.
Elwood had never been much of a crier, but he’d taken it
up since the arrest. The tears came at night, when he
imagined what Nickel held in store for him. When he heard
his grandmother sobbing in her room next door, fussing
around, opening and closing things because she didn’t
know what to do with her hands. When he tried without
success to figure out why his life had bent to this wretched
avenue. He knew he couldn’t let the boys see him weep, so
he turned over in the bunk and put his pillow over his head
and listened to the voices: the jokes and taunts, the stories
of home and distant cronies, the juvenile conjectures about
how the world worked and their naïve plans to outwit it.
He’d started the day in his old life and ended it here. The
pillowcase smelled like vinegar, and in the night the
katydids and crickets screeched in waves, soft then loud,
back and forth.
Elwood was asleep when a different roar commenced. It
came from outside, a rush and a whoosh without variation.
Forbidding and mechanical and granting no clue to its
origin. He didn’t know which book he’d picked it up from,
but the word came to him: torrential.
A voice across the room said, “Somebody’s going out for
ice cream,” and a few boys snickered.
OceanofPDF.com
E
CHAPTER FIVE
lwood met Turner his second day at
Nickel, which was also the day he
discovered the grim purpose of the noise.
“Most niggers last whole weeks before they go down,” the
boy named Turner told him later. “You got to quit that
eager-beaver shit, El.”
A bugler and his brisk reveille woke them most
mornings. Blakeley rapped on the door of room 2 and
yelled, “Time to get up!” The students saluted another
morning at Nickel with groans and cussing. They lined up
two by two for attendance, and then came the two-minute
shower where the boys furiously lathered with the chalky
soap before their time ran out. Elwood put on a good show
of acting unsurprised by the communal showers but had
less success hiding his horror at the frigid water, which was
searching and merciless. What came from the pipes
smelled of rotten eggs, as did anyone who bathed in it until
their skin dried.
“Now it’s breakfast,” Desmond said. His bunk was next
to Elwood’s and the boy made an effort to fulfill the house
father’s orders from the night before. Desmond had a
round head, chubby baby cheeks, and a voice that startled
everyone the first time they heard it, it was so gruff and full
of bass. His voice made the chucks jump when he crept up
on them, and he got a kick out of it, until one day a
supervisor with an even deeper voice crept up on him and
taught him a lesson.
Elwood told him his name again, to signal a new start to
their acquaintance.
“You told me last night,” Desmond said. He laced his
brown shoes, which were impeccably polished. “If you’ve
been here a while, you’re supposed to help out the Grubs,
so you can get points. I’m halfway to Pioneer.”
He walked with Elwood the quarter mile to the dining
hall, but they got separated in the chow line, and when
Elwood looked for a place to sit he didn’t see him. The mess
hall was loud and rowdy, full of all the Cleveland boys
serving up their morning round of nonsense. Elwood was
invisible again. He found an empty seat at one of the long
tables. When he neared, a boy slapped his hand on the
bench and said it was saved. The next table over was filled
with younger kids but when Elwood put his tray down they
looked at him like he was crazy. “Big kids aren’t allowed to
sit at a little-kids table,” one of them said.
Elwood sat down quickly at the next free spot he saw
and to head off rebuke didn’t make eye contact, just ate.
The oatmeal had a bunch of cinnamon dumped into it to
hide a lousy taste. Elwood gobbled it down. He finished
peeling his orange before he finally looked up at the boy
across the table who had been staring at him.
The first thing Elwood noticed was the notch in the boy’s
left ear, like on an alley cat that had been in scrapes. The
boy said, “You eat that oatmeal like your mama made it.”
Who was this, talking about his mother. “What?”
He said, “I didn’t mean it like that, I meant I ain’t never
seen someone eat this food like that—like they liked it.”
The second thing Elwood noticed was the boy’s eerie
sense of self. The mess hall was loud with the rumble and
roil of juvenile activity, but this boy bobbed in his own
pocket of calm. Over time, Elwood saw that he was always
simultaneously at home in whatever scene he found himself
and also seemed like he shouldn’t have been there; inside
and above at the same time; a part and apart. Like a tree
trunk that falls across a creek—it doesn’t belong and then
it’s never not been there, generating its own ripples in the
larger current.
He said his name was Turner.
“I’m Elwood. From Tallahassee. Frenchtown.”
“Frenchtown.” A boy down the line mimicked Elwood’s
voice, giving it a sissy turn, and his buddies laughed.
There were three of them. The biggest one he’d seen last
night, the boy who looked too old to attend Nickel. The
giant was named Griff; in addition to his mature
appearance, he was broad-chested and hunched like a big
brown bear. Griff’s daddy, it was said, was on a chain gang
in Alabama for murdering his mother, making his meanness
a handed-down thing. Griff’s two pals were Elwood’s size,
lean on the bone but wild and cruel in the eyes. Lonnie’s
wide bulldog face tapered into a bullet at his shaved scalp.
He’d scrounged up a patchy mustache and had a habit of
smoothing it with his thumb and index finger when
calculating brutality. The last member of the trio was called
Black Mike. He was a wiry youth from Opelousas who was
in constant battle with restless blood; this morning he
wobbled in his seat and sat on his hands to keep them from
flying off. The three of them owned the other end of the
table—the seats between were empty because everyone
else knew better.
“I don’t know why you so loud, Griff,” Turner said. “You
knew they got their eye on you this week.”
Elwood assumed he meant the housemen; there were
eight of them spread out at different tables in the mess,
eating with their charges. It was impossible he’d
overheard, but the houseman closest to them looked up and
sent everybody act-casual. Griff, the bruiser, made a
barking noise at Turner and the other two boys laughed,
the dog noises part of a running gag. The one with the
shaved head, Lonnie, winked at Elwood and then they
returned to their morning meeting.
“I’m from Houston myself,” Turner said. He sounded
bored. “That’s a real city. None of this country shit y’all got
up here.”
“Thanks for that,” Elwood said. He tipped his head
toward the bullies.
The boy picked up his tray. “I didn’t do shit.”
Then everyone was on their feet: Time for class.
Desmond tapped Elwood on the shoulder and escorted him.
The colored schoolhouse was down the hill, next to the
garage and the warehouse. “I used to hate school,”
Desmond said. “But here you can grab some shut-eye.”
“I thought this place was strict,” Elwood said.
“Back home, my daddy’d beat my ass if I missed a day of
school. Nickel, though.” Academic performance had no
bearing on one’s progress to graduation, Desmond
explained. Teachers didn’t take attendance or hand out
grades. The clever kids worked on their merits. Enough
merits and you could get an early release for good
behavior. Work, comportment, demonstrations of
compliance or docility, however—these things counted
toward your ranking and were never far from Desmond’s
attention. He had to get home. He was from Gainesville,
where his father had a shoeshine stand. Desmond took off
so many times, raising hell, that his father begged Nickel to
take him. “I was sleeping under the stars so much, he
thought I’d learn to appreciate having a roof over my
head.”
Elwood asked him if it was working.
Desmond turned away and said, “Man, I got to make it to
Pioneer.” His grown-up man’s voice, coming out of his
scrawny body, made it a poignant wish.
The colored schoolhouse was older than the dormitories,
one of the few structures that dated back to the opening of
the school. There were two classrooms upstairs for the
chucks and two on the main floor for the older kids.
Desmond steered Elwood into their homeroom, which had
fifty desks or so crammed inside. Elwood squeezed into the
second row and was swiftly appalled. The posters on the
walls featured bespectacled owls hooting out the alphabet
next to bright drawings of elementary nouns: house, cat,
barn. Little-kid stuff. Worse than the secondhand textbooks
at Lincoln High, all the Nickel textbooks were from before
he was born, earlier editions of textbooks Elwood
remembered from first grade.
The teacher Mr. Goodall appeared, but no one paid him
any mind. Goodall was a pink-skinned man in his midsixties, with thick tortoiseshell eyeglasses, a linen suit, and
a mane of white hair that gave him a learned air. His
scholarly demeanor swiftly evaporated. Only Elwood was
dismayed by the teacher’s distracted, lackluster efforts; the
other boys spent the morning goofing and joshing. Griff and
his cronies played spades at the back of the classroom, and
when Elwood caught Turner’s eye, the boy was reading a
wrinkled Superman comic. Turner saw him, shrugged, and
turned the page. Desmond was out cold, his neck cracked
at a painful angle.
Elwood, who did all of Mr. Marconi’s accounting in his
head, took the rudimentary math lesson as an insult. He
was supposed to be taking college classes—that’s why he
was in that car in the first place. He shared a primer with
the boy next to him, a fat kid who burped up breakfast in
powerful gusts, and they started a dumb game of tug-ofwar. Most of the Nickel boys couldn’t read. As each boy
picked up that morning’s story—nonsense about an
industrious hare—Mr. Goodall didn’t bother to correct them
or share the proper pronunciation. Elwood carved each
syllable with such precision that the students around him
stirred from their reveries, curious as to what kind of black
boy talked like that.
He approached Goodall at the lunch bell and the teacher
pretended to know him: “Hello, son, what can I do for you?”
Another one of his colored boys, they came and went. Up
close, Goodall’s pink cheeks and nose were lumpy and
riddled. His sweat, accented by last night’s bottle, was a
sweet vapor.
Elwood kept the indignation out of his voice when he
asked if Nickel had advanced classes for students who were
looking forward to college. He’d learned this material years
ago, he explained humbly.
Goodall was amiable enough. “Certainly! I’ll speak to the
director about it. What was your name again?”
Elwood caught up with Desmond on the path back to
Cleveland. He told Desmond about his conversation with
the teacher. Desmond said, “You believe that shit?”
After lunch, when it was time for art class and shop,
Blakeley pulled Elwood aside. The house father wanted
Elwood to work on the yard crew with some of the Grubs.
He’d be joining the other boys in the middle of their shift,
but grounds work gave you the lay of the land, so to speak.
“See it close up,” Blakeley said.
That first afternoon, Elwood and five other boys—most of
them chucks—prowled over the colored half of campus with
scythes and rakes. Their leader was a quiet-natured boy
named Jaimie, who had the spindly, undernourished frame
common to Nickel students. He bounced around Nickel a
lot—his mother was Mexican, so they didn’t know what to
do with him. On his arrival, he was put in with the white
kids, but his first day working in the lime fields he got so
dark that Spencer had him reassigned to the colored half.
Jaimie spent a month in Cleveland, but then Director
Hardee toured one day, took a look at that light face among
the dark faces, and had him sent back to the white camp.
Spencer bided his time and tossed him back a few weeks
later. “I go back and forth,” Jaimie said as he raked up pine
needles into a mound. He had the screwed-down smile of
the rickety-toothed. “One day they’ll make up their minds, I
suppose.”
Elwood got his tour as they cut their way up the hill, past
the two other colored dormitories, the red clay basketball
courts, and the big laundry building. Looking down, most of
the white campus was visible through the trees: the three
dormitories, the hospital, and administration buildings. The
head of the school, Director Hardee, worked in the big red
one with the American flag. There were the big facilities
the black boys and white boys used at different times, like
the gymnasium, the chapel, and the woodshop. From
above, the white schoolhouse was identical to the colored
one. Elwood wondered if it was in better shape, like the
schools in Tallahassee, or if Nickel delivered the same
stunted education to all its charges regardless of skin color.
When they got to the top of the hill, the yard crew turned
around. On the other side of the rise was the graveyard,
Boot Hill. A low wall of rough stones enclosed the white
crosses, gray weeds, the bent and lurching trees. The boys
gave it a wide berth.
If you took the road past the other side of the slope,
Jaimie explained, eventually you reached the printing plant,
the first set of farms, and then the swamp that marked the
northern end of the property. “You’ll be picking potatoes
sooner or later, don’t worry,” he told Elwood. Gangs of
students walked the trails and roads to their work
assignments while supervisors in their state cars
crisscrossed the property, watching. Elwood stood in
wonder at the sight of a black boy, thirteen or fourteen
years old, driving an old tractor that pulled a wooden
trailer full of students. The driver looked sleepy and serene
in his big seat, taking his charges to the farm.
When the other boys stiffened and stopped talking, it
meant that Spencer was about.
Midway between the colored and the white campuses
stood a single-story rectangular building, short and skinny,
that Elwood took for a storage shed. Rust stains fell like
vines across the white paint covering its concrete-block
walls, but the green trim around the windows and front
door was fresh and bright. The longer wall had one big
window with three smaller ones next to it like ducklings.
A patch of uncut grass, a foot wide, encircled the
building, untouched and untamed. “Should we cut that,
too?” Elwood asked.
The two boys next to Elwood sucked their teeth. “Nigger,
you don’t go that way unless they take you,” one said.
Elwood spent his free time before supper in Cleveland’s
rec room. He explored the cabinets, where they kept the
cards and games and spiders. Students argued over who
was next for table tennis, slapped paddles toward the saggy
net, and cursed over wild shots, the pop of the white balls
like the ragged heartbeat of an adolescent afternoon.
Elwood checked out the meager offerings on the
bookshelves, the Hardy Boys and comic books. There were
moldy volumes about the natural sciences with space vistas
and close-ups of the seafloor. He opened one cardboard
chess set. There were only three pieces inside—a rook and
two pawns.
The other students circulated, to or from work or sports,
upstairs to the bunks, into their private recesses of
mischief. Mr.  Blakeley stopped on his way through and
introduced Elwood to Carter, one of the black housemen.
He was younger than the house father and carried himself
like a stickler. Carter gave him a quick, dubious nod and
turned to tell a thumb-sucker in the corner to knock it off.
Half of the housemen in Cleveland were black and half
were white. “You got a coin toss over whether they look the
other way or hassle you,” Desmond said, “no matter what
color they are.” Desmond lay on one of the couches, his
head on the funny pages to prevent it from touching an
unwholesome stain on the upholstery. “Most are okay, but
some of them got that mad-dog shit in them.” Desmond
pointed out the student captain, whose job it was to keep
track of infractions and attendance. This week Cleveland’s
captain was a light-skinned boy with thick gold curls named
Birdy—he was pigeon-toed. Birdy patrolled the first floor
with the clipboard and pencil that were the trappings of his
office, humming happily. “This one will rat on you in a
second,” Desmond said, “but get a good captain and you
can scrape up some nice merits for Explorer or Pioneer.”
An air horn screeched to the south, down the hill. No
telling what it was. Elwood turned over a wooden crate and
slumped down. Where to fit this place into the path of his
life? The paint hung in thin rinds from the ceiling, and the
sooty windows turned every hour overcast. He was thinking
of Dr. King’s speech to high school students in Washington,
DC, when he spoke of the degradations of Jim Crow and the
need to transform that degradation into action. It will
enrich your spirit as nothing else can. It will give you that
rare sense of nobility that can only spring from love and
selflessly helping your fellow man. Make a career of
humanity. Make it a central part of your life.
I am stuck here, but I’ll make the best of it, Elwood told
himself, and I’ll make it brief. Everybody back home knew
him as even, dependable—Nickel would soon understand
that about him, too. At dinner, he’d ask Desmond how many
points he needed to move out of Grub, how long it took
most people to advance and graduate. Then he’d do it twice
as fast. This was his resistance.
With that, he went through three chess sets, made a
complete set of pieces, and won two games in a row.
Why he intervened in the fight in the bathroom, he
couldn’t muster a proper answer later. It was something his
grandfather might have done in one of Harriet’s stories:
stepped up when he saw something wrong.
The younger boy being bullied, Corey, was not someone
he’d met before. The bullies he’d encountered at his
breakfast table: Lonnie with his bulldog face, and his manic
partner Black Mike. Elwood went into the first-floor
bathroom to urinate, and the taller boys had Corey up
against the cracked tile wall. Maybe it was because Elwood
didn’t have any goddamned sense, as the Frenchtown boys
said. Maybe it was because they were bigger and the other
guy was smaller. His lawyer had persuaded the judge to let
Elwood spend his last free days at home; there was no one
to take him to Nickel that day, and the Tallahassee jail was
overcrowded. Perhaps if he’d spent more time in the
crucible of the county jail, Elwood would have known that it
is best not to interfere in other people’s violence, no matter
the underlying facts of the incident.
Elwood said, “Hey,” and took a step forward. Black Mike
spun around, slugged him in the jaw and knocked him back
against the sink.
Another boy, a chuck, opened the bathroom door and
yelled, “Oh, shit.” Phil, one of the white housemen, was
making the rounds. He had a drowsy way about him and
usually pretended not to see what was right in front of his
face. At a young age he had decided it was easier that way.
A coin toss, as Desmond had described Nickel justice. This
day Phil said, “What are you little niggers up to?” His tone
was light, more curious than anything else. Interpreting the
scene was not part of his job. Who was at fault, who started
it, why. His job was to keep these colored boys in check and
today his responsibilities were not outside his grasp. He
knew the names of the other boys. He asked the new boy
his name.
“Mr.  Spencer will take this up,” Phil said. He told the
boys to get ready for dinner.
OceanofPDF.com
T
CHAPTER SIX
he white boys bruised differently than the
black boys and called it the Ice Cream
Factory because you came out with
bruises of every color. The black boys called it the White
House because that was its official name and it fit and
didn’t need to be embellished. The White House delivered
the law and everybody obeyed.
They came at one a.m. but woke few, because it was
hard to sleep when you knew they were coming, even if
they weren’t coming for you. The boys heard the cars grind
gravel outside, the doors open, the thumping up the stairs.
The hearing was seeing, too, in bright strokes across the
mind’s canvas. The men’s flashlights danced. They knew
where their beds were—the bunks were only two feet
apart, and after occasions when they grabbed the wrong
ones, now they made sure beforehand. They took Lonnie
and Big Mike, they took Corey, and they got Elwood, too.
The night visitors were Spencer and a houseman named
Earl, who was big and quick, which helped when a boy
broke down in one of the back rooms and had to be put
back on course so they could proceed. The state cars were
brown Chevys, the ones that roved the grounds all day on
simple errands but at night became harbingers. Spencer
driving Lonnie and Black Mike and Earl taking Elwood and
Corey, who had been weeping all night.
No one talked to Elwood at dinner, as if what was
coming was catching. Some boys whispered when he
passed—What a dummy—and the bullies gave him angry
looks, but mostly there was a heavy pressure of menace
and unease in the dormitory that didn’t end until they took
the boys away. The rest of the boys relaxed then and some
were even able to dream.
At lights-out, Desmond whispered to Elwood that once it
started, it was best not to move. The strap had a notch cut
into it, and it’d snag on you and slice if you were not still.
In the car over, Corey made an incantation, “I’m-a hold on
and be still, I’m-a hold on and be still,” so maybe it was
true. Elwood didn’t ask how many times Desmond had gone
down because the boy stopped talking after that piece of
advice.
The White House, in its previous use, had been a work
shed. They parked behind it and Spencer and his man took
them in through the back. The beating entrance, the boys
called it. Passing by the road out front, you’d never look
twice. Spencer quickly found the key on his enormous key
ring and opened the two padlocks. The stench was fierce—
urine and other things that had soaked into the concrete. A
single naked bulb buzzed in the hallway. Spencer and Earl
led them past the two cells to the room at the front of the
building, where a line of bolted-together chairs waited, and
a table.
Right there was the front door. Elwood thought of
running. He didn’t. This place was why the school had no
wall or fence or barbed wire around it, why so few boys
ran: It was the wall that kept them in.
Spencer and Earl took Black Mike in first. Spencer said,
“Thought you’d be done after last time.”
Earl said, “Piss himself again.”
The roar began: an even gale. Elwood’s chair vibrated
with energy. He couldn’t figure out what it was—some sort
of machine—but it was loud enough to cover Black Mike’s
screams and the smack of the strap on his body. Halfway
through, Elwood started counting, on the theory that if he
knew how much the other boys got, he’d know how much
he’d get. Unless there was a higher system to how many
each boy got: repeat offender, instigator, bystander. No one
had asked Elwood for his side of the story, that he was
trying to break up the fight in the bathroom—but maybe
he’d get less for stepping in. He counted up to twenty-eight
before the beating stopped and they dragged Black Mike
out to one of the cars.
Corey continued to sob, and when Spencer came back he
told him to shut his fucking mouth and they took Lonnie in
for his. Lonnie got around sixty. It was impossible to make
out what Spencer and Earl said to him back there, but
Lonnie needed more instructions or admonishments than
his partner.
They took Corey in for his and Elwood noticed there was
a Bible on the table.
Corey got around seventy—Elwood lost his place a few
times—and it didn’t make sense, why did the bullies get
less than the bullied? Now he had no idea what he was in
for. It didn’t make sense. Maybe they lost count, too. Maybe
there was no system at all to the violence and no one, not
the keepers nor the kept, knew what happened or why.
Then it was Elwood’s time. The two cells faced each
other, separated by the hallway. The beating room had a
bloody mattress and a naked pillow that was covered
instead by the overlapping stains from all the mouths that
had bit into it. Also: the gigantic industrial fan that was the
source of the roaring, the sound that traveled all over
campus, farther than physics allowed. Its original home
was the laundry—in the summer those old machines made
an inferno—but after one of the periodic reforms where the
state made up new rules about corporal punishment,
someone had the bright idea to bring it in here. Splatter on
the walls where the fan had whipped up blood in its
gusting. There was a weird thing to the acoustics where the
fan covered the boys’ screams but right next to it you heard
the staff’s instructions perfectly: Hold on to the rail and
don’t let go. Make a sound and you’ll get more. Shut your
fucking mouth, nigger.
The strap was three feet long with a wooden handle, and
they had called it Black Beauty since before Spencer’s
time, although the one he held in his hand was not the
original: She had to be repaired or replaced every so often.
The leather slapped across the ceiling before it came down
on your legs, to tell you it was about to come down, and the
bunk springs made noise with each blow. Elwood held on to
the top of the bed and bit into the pillow but he passed out
before they were done, so when people asked later how
many licks he got, he didn’t know.
OceanofPDF.com
R
CHAPTER SEVEN
arely did Harriet make proper goodbyes
to her loved ones. Her father died in jail
after a white lady downtown accused
him of not getting out of her way on the sidewalk.
Bumptious contact, as Jim Crow defined it. That’s how it
went in the old days. He was waiting for his appointment
with the judge when they found him hung in his cell. No
one believed the police’s story. “Niggers and jail,” her uncle
said, “niggers and jail.” Two days prior, Harriet had waved
to him across the street on her way home from school. That
was her last image of him: Her big, cheerful daddy walking
to his second job.
Harriet’s husband, Monty, got hit in the head with a
chair while breaking up a scuffle at Miss Simone’s. Some
colored GIs from Camp Gordon Johnston in a rumble with a
bunch of Tallahassee crackers over who had next on the
pool table. Two people ended up dead. One of them was her
Monty, who’d stepped up to protect one of Simone’s
dishwashers from three white men. The boy still wrote
Harriet letters every Christmas. He drove a taxicab in
Orlando and had three kids.
She said goodbye to her daughter, Evelyn, and her sonin-law, Percy, the night they took off. Percy’s was one leavetaking in the works for years, although she hadn’t foreseen
that he’d take Evelyn. Percy had been too big for the town
since he got back from the war. He served in the Pacific
theater, behind the lines keeping up the supply chain.
He came back evil. Not because of what happened
overseas but from what he saw on his return. He loved the
army, and even received a commendation for a letter he
wrote to his captain about inequities in the treatment of
colored soldiers. Perhaps his life might have veered
elsewhere if the US government had opened the country to
colored advancement like they opened the army. But it was
one thing to allow someone to kill for you and another to let
him live next door. The GI Bill fixed things pretty good for
the white boys he served with, but the uniform meant
different things depending who wore it. What was the point
of a no-interest loan when a white bank won’t let you step
inside? Percy drove up to Milledgeville to visit a buddy
from his unit and some crackers started something. He’d
stopped for gas in one of those little towns. Cracker town,
crack-your-head town. He barely got out—everybody knew
white boys were lynching black men in uniform, but he
never believed he’d be a target. Not him. Bunch of white
boys jealous that they didn’t have a uniform and afraid of a
world that let a nigger wear one in the first place.
Evelyn married him. She was always going to, since they
were small. Elwood’s arrival did nothing to still Percy’s
wildness: the corn whiskey and roadhouse nights, the
roguish element he brought into their house on Brevard
Street. Evelyn had never been very strong; when Percy was
around she shrank to an appendage of his, an extra arm or
a leg. A mouth: He had Evelyn tell Harriet that they were
leaving for California to try their luck.
“What kind of people leave for California in the middle of
the night?” Harriet asked.
“I got to meet someone about an opportunity,” Percy
said.
Harriet thought they should wake the boy. “Let him
sleep,” Evelyn said, and that was the last she heard from
them. If her daughter had ever been suited for motherhood,
she never demonstrated it. The look on her face when little
Elwood suckled on her breast—her joyless, empty eyes
seeing through the walls of the house and into pure nothing
—chilled Harriet to the bone whenever she remembered it.
The day the court officer came for Elwood was the worst
goodbye. It had been the two of them for so long. She and
Mr. Marconi would make sure the lawyer kept on fixing his
case, she said. Mr.  Andrews was from Atlanta, a brand of
young white crusader who went north to get his law degree
and came back changed. Harriet never let him go without a
bite to eat. He was extravagant with his praise for her
cobbler and in his optimism over Elwood’s prospects.
They’d find a way out of this mess of thorns, she told her
grandson, and promised to visit his first Sunday at Nickel.
But when she showed up, they told her that he was sick and
couldn’t have visitors.
She asked what was wrong with him. The Nickel man
said, “How the hell should I know, lady?”
There was a new pair of denim pants on the chair next to
Elwood’s hospital bed. The beating had embedded bits of
the first into his skin and it took two hours for the doctor to
remove the fibers. It was a duty the doctor had to perform
from time to time. Tweezers did the trick. The boy would be
in the hospital until he walked without pain.
Dr. Cooke had an office next to the examination rooms,
where he smoked cigars and harangued his wife on the
telephone all day, bickering over money or her no-account
relatives. The potato-y cigar smoke permeated the ward,
covering the smell of sweat and vomit and gamey skin, and
dissipated by dawn, when he’d show up and perfume the
place again. There was a glass case full of bottles and
boxes of medicine that he unlocked with great seriousness,
but he only ever reached for the big bucket of aspirin.
Elwood spent his stay on his stomach. For obvious
reasons. The hospital inducted him into its rhythms. Nurse
Wilma grunted around most days, hale and brusque,
slamming drawers and cabinets. She kept her hair in a
licorice-red bouffant and dotted her cheeks with rouge so
that she reminded Elwood of a haunted doll come to
hideous life, something out of horror comics. The Crypt of
Terror, The Vault of Horror, read by window light in his
cousin’s attic. Horror comics, he’d noticed, delivered two
kinds of punishment—completely undeserved, and sinister
justice for the wicked. He placed his current misfortune in
the former category and waited to turn the page.
Nurse Wilma was almost sweet to the white boys who
came in with their abrasions and ailments, a second
mother. Nary a kind word for the black boys. Elwood’s
bedpan was a particular affront—she looked as if he’d
pissed in her outstretched palms. More than once in his
protest dreams, hers was the face of the waitress behind
the counter who refused to serve him, the housewife with
the spit-flecked mouth cursing like a sailor. That he
dreamed of a time when he was outside and marching kept
his spirits up each morning when he woke in the hospital.
His mind still capable of travel.
That first day there was only one other boy in the
hospital, his bed hidden behind a folding curtain at the far
end of the ward. When Nurse Wilma or Dr. Cooke tended to
him, they closed it behind them, the wheels of the curtain
squeaking across the white tile. The patient never spoke
when the staff addressed him, but their voices had a
cheerful quality that was absent when they talked to the
other boys: The kid was a terminal case, or royalty. None of
the students who stayed on the ward knew who he was or
what landed him there.
The cast of boys came in and out. Elwood got to know
some white kids he wouldn’t have met otherwise. Wards of
the state, orphans, runaways who’d lit out to get away from
mothers who entertained men for money or to escape
rummy fathers who came into their rooms in the middle of
the night. Some of them were rough characters. They stole
money, cussed at their teachers, damaged public property,
had stories about bloody pool-hall fights and uncles who
sold moonshine. They were sent to Nickel for offenses
Elwood had never heard of: malingering, mopery,
incorrigibility. Words the boys didn’t understand either, but
what was the point when their meaning was clear enough:
Nickel. I got busted for sleeping in a garage to keep warm,
I stole five dollars from my teacher, I drank a bottle of
cough syrup and went wild one night. I was on my own
trying to get by.
“Wow, they got you good,” Dr. Cooke said whenever he
changed Elwood’s dressings. Elwood didn’t want to look
but he had to. He got a glimpse of his inner thighs, where
the raw slashes on the backs of his legs crept up like
gruesome fingers. Dr.  Cooke gave him an aspirin and
retreated to his office. Five minutes later he was arguing
with his wife over a shiftless cousin who needed a loan for
a scheme.
Some snuffling dude woke Elwood in the middle of the
night and he was up for hours, his skin burning and
wriggling under the bandages.
A week into his hospital stay, he opened his eyes and
Turner lay in the bed opposite. Whistling the theme to The
Andy Griffith Show, cheerful and fluttering. He was a good
whistler and for the remainder of their friendship his
performances provided a score, capturing the mood of the
escapade or fluting a countervailing commentary.
Turner waited until Nurse Wilma went outside for a
cigarette and explained his visit. “Thought I’d take me a
vacation,” he said. He’d eaten some soap powder to make
himself sick, an hour of stomachache for a whole day off. Or
two—he knew how to sell it. “Got some more
powder  hidden in my sock, too,” he said. Elwood turned
away to brood.
“How you like that witch doctor?” Turner asked later.
Dr.  Cooke had just taken the temperature of a white boy
down the row who was puffed up and moaning like a cow.
The phone rang, the doctor dropped two aspirin into the
white kid’s palm and hoofed it to his office.
Turner rolled up to Elwood. He was clackety-clacking
around the ward in one of the old polio wheelchairs. He
said, “Come in here with your damn head cut off and he’d
give you aspirin.”
Elwood didn’t want to chuckle, like it would be cheating
on his pain, but he couldn’t help it. His testicles were swole
up from where the strap landed between his legs, and his
laughter tugged something inside and made them hurt
again.
“Nigger come in here,” Turner said, “head cut off, both
legs, both arms cut off, and that fucking witch doctor would
be like, ‘You want one tablet, or two?’ ” He coaxed the stuck
wheels of the wheelchair and huffed away.
There was nothing to read apart from The Gator, the
school newspaper, and a pamphlet commemorating the
school’s fiftieth anniversary, both printed on the other side
of campus by Nickel students. Every boy in every picture
was smiling, but even after Elwood’s short stay he
recognized a kind of Nickel deadness in their eyes. He
suspected he had it, too, now that he had fully enrolled.
Turning slowly on his side, propped on an elbow, he went
through the pamphlet a few times.
The state opened the school in 1899 as the Florida
Industrial School for Boys. “A reform school where the
young offender of law, separated from vicious associates,
may receive physical, intellectual, and moral training, be
reformed and restored to the community with purpose and
character fitting for a good citizen, an honorable and an
honest man with a trade or skilled occupation fitting such
person for self-maintenance.” The boys were called
students, rather than inmates, to distinguish them from the
violent offenders that populated prisons. All the violent
offenders, Elwood added, were on staff.
When it opened, the school admitted children as young
as five, a fact that swept up Elwood in a lament when he
tried to sleep: all those helpless kids. The first thousand
acres were granted by the state; over the years locals
generously donated another four hundred. Nickel earned
its keep. The construction of the printing plant was a bona
fide success by any measure. “In 1926 alone, publishing
created a profit of $250,000, in addition to introducing the
students to a useful trade in which to apply themselves
after graduation.” The brick-making machine produced
twenty thousand bricks a day; its issue propped up
buildings all over Jackson County, big and small. The
school’s annual Christmas-light display, designed and
executed by the students, drew visitors from miles around.
Every year the newspaper sent out a reporter.
In 1949, the year of the pamphlet’s publication, the
school was renamed in honor of Trevor Nickel, a reformer
who’d taken over a few years earlier. The boys used to say
it was because their lives weren’t worth five cents, but it
was not the case. Occasionally you passed Trevor Nickel’s
portrait in the hallway and he frowned like he knew what
you were thinking. No, that wasn’t it: Like he knew you
knew what he was thinking.
The next time one of the ringworm boys came in from
Cleveland, Elwood asked the kid to bring back some books
for him to read, and he did. Plopped down a stack of
battered natural-science books that by accident provided a
course in ancient forces: tectonic collisions, mountain
ranges thrown up to the sky, volcanic bombast. All the
violence roiling beneath that makes the world above. They
were big books with exuberant pictures, red and orange, in
contrast with the cloudy, white-gone-gray of the ward.
Turner’s second day in the hospital, Elwood caught him
pulling a piece of folded cardboard out of his sock. Turner
swallowed the contents and an hour later he was hollering.
Dr. Cooke came out and he threw up on the man’s shoes.
“I told you not to eat the food,” Dr.  Cooke said. “It’s
going to make you sick, what they serve here.”
“What else am I supposed to eat, Mr. Cooke?”
The doctor blinked.
When Turner finished mopping up the vomit, Elwood
said, “Doesn’t that hurt your stomach?”
“Sure it does, man,” Turner said. “But I don’t feel like
going to work today. These beds are lumpy as hell, but you
can get some good shut-eye, you figure out how to lay on
them.”
The secret boy behind the folded curtain made a heavy
sigh, and Elwood and Turner jumped. He didn’t make much
noise as a rule and you forgot he was around.
“Hey!” Elwood said. “You over there!”
“Shhh!” went Turner.
There was no sound, not even the shifting of a blanket.
“You go look,” Elwood said. Something had settled—he
felt better today. “See who it is. Ask what’s wrong with
him.”
Turner looked at him like he was nuts. “I ain’t asking
nobody shit.”
“Scared?” Elwood said, like one of the boys from his
street, how buddies taunted each other back home.
“Damn,” Turner said, “you don’t know. Pop back there
for a look, maybe you have to trade places with him. Like in
a ghost story.”
That night Nurse Wilma stayed late, reading to the kid
behind the curtain. The Bible, a hymn, it sounded how
people sound when they have God in their mouth.
The beds were occupied and then they weren’t. A bad
batch of canned peaches filled the ward. There weren’t
enough beds so they slept head to toe, gassy and gurgling.
The beds turned over. Grubs, Explorers, and the
industrious Pioneers. Injured, infected, faking it, and
afflicted. Spider bite, busted ankle, lost a fingertip in a
loading machine. A visit to the White House. Knowing that
he’d gone down, the other boys no longer kept him at a
distance. He was one of them now.
Elwood got sick of looking at his new pants sitting there
on the chair. He folded them up and stuffed them under his
mattress.
The big radio over by Dr.  Cooke’s office played all day,
competing with the noise of the metal shop next door—
electric saws, steel on steel. The doctor thought the radio
was therapeutic; Nurse Wilma saw no reason to coddle the
boys. Don McNeill’s Breakfast Club, preachers and serials,
the soaps Elwood’s grandmother listened to. The problems
of the white people in radio shows had been remote,
belonging to another country. Now they were a ride home
to Frenchtown.
Elwood hadn’t heard Amos ’n’ Andy in years. His
grandmother turned off the radio when Amos ’n’ Andy
came on, with its carousel of malapropisms and demeaning
misadventures. “White people like that stuff, but we don’t
have to listen to it.” She was glad when she read in the
Defender that it had been taken off the air. A station around
Nickel broadcast old episodes, haunted transmissions. No
one touched the dial when the old reruns came on and
everyone laughed at Amos and Kingfish’s antics, black boys
and white boys alike. “Holy mackerel!”
One of the radio stations sometimes played the theme to
The Andy Griffith Show, and Turner whistled in
accompaniment.
“Aren’t you worried they’ll know you’re faking it,”
Elwood said. “Whistling happy like that?”
“I ain’t faking—that soap powder is awful,” Turner said.
“But it’s me choosing, not anyone else.”
That was a dumb way of looking at it, but Elwood didn’t
say anything. The theme music was stuck in his head now,
and Elwood would have hummed or whistled but he didn’t
want to look like a copycat. The song was a tiny, quiet piece
of America carved out of the rest. No fire hoses, no need
for the National Guard. It occurred to Elwood that he’d
never seen a Negro in the small town of Mayberry, where
the show took place.
A man on the radio announced that Sonny Liston was
going to fight an up-and-comer named Cassius Clay. “Who’s
that?” Elwood said.
“Some nigger about to get knocked down,” Turner said.
One afternoon Elwood was half dozing when the noise
paralyzed him—the keys like a wind chime. Spencer was on
the ward to see the doctor. Elwood waited for the sound of
the leather strap scraping the ceiling before it came
down…Then the superintendent was gone and the sound of
the radio commanded the room again. He sweat through to
his sheets.
“Do they do it like that to everybody?” Elwood asked
Turner after lunch. Nurse Wilma had distributed ham
sandwiches and watery grape juice, white kids first.
Out of the blue, but Turner knew what Elwood was
referring to. He rolled over in the polio chair, lunch in his
lap. “Not like what you got,” he said. “Not that bad. I’ve
never gone down. I got smacked across the face for
smoking once.”
“I have a lawyer,” Elwood said. “He can do something.”
“You already got off lucky,” Turner said.
“How come?”
Turner finished his juice with a slurp. “Sometimes they
take you to the White House and we never see your ass
again.”
It was quiet on the ward except for them and the buzz
saw next door, keening. Elwood didn’t want to know but he
asked anyway.
“Your family asks the school what happened and they say
you ran away,” Turner said. He made sure the white boys
weren’t looking. “Problem was, Elwood,” he said, “you
didn’t know how it works. Take Corey and those two cats.
You wanted to do some Lone Ranger shit—run up and save
a nigger. But they punked him out a long time ago. See,
those three do that all the time. Corey likes it. They play
rough, then he takes them into the stall or whatever and
gets on his knees. That’s how they do.”
“I saw his face, he was scared,” Elwood said.
“You don’t know what makes him tick,” Turner said. “You
don’t know what makes anybody tick. I used to think out
there is out there and then once you’re in here, you’re in
here. That everybody in Nickel was different because of
what being here does to you. Spencer and them, too—
maybe out there in the free world, they’re good people.
Smiling. Nice to their kids.” His mouth squinched up, like
he was sucking on a rotten tooth. “But now that I been out
and I been brought back, I know there’s nothing in here
that changes people. In here and out there are the same,
but in here no one has to act fake anymore.”
He was talking in circles, everything pointing back at
itself. Elwood said, “It’s against the law.” State law, but also
Elwood’s. If everyone looked the other way, then everybody
was in on it. If he looked the other way, he was as
implicated as the rest. That’s how he saw it, how he’d
always seen things.
Turner didn’t say anything.
“It’s not how it’s supposed to be,” Elwood said.
“Don’t nobody care about supposed-to. If you call out
Black Mike and Lonnie, you calling out everyone who lets it
happen, too. You ratting on everybody.”
“That’s what I’m telling you.” Elwood told Turner about
his grandmother and the lawyer, Mr.  Andrews. They’d
report Spencer and Earl and anybody else up to no good.
His teacher Mr. Hill was an activist. He’d marched all over
—he hadn’t returned to Lincoln High School after the
summer because he was back organizing. Elwood wrote
him about his arrest but wasn’t sure if he got the letter.
Mr. Hill knew people who’d want to know about a place like
Nickel, once they got ahold of him. “It’s not like the old
days,” Elwood said. “We can stand up for ourselves.”
“That shit barely works out there—what do you think it’s
going to do in here?”
“You say that because there’s no one else out there
sticking up for you.”
“That’s true,” Turner said. “That doesn’t mean I can’t
see how it works. Maybe I see things more clearly because
of it.” He made a face as the soap powder gave him a kick.
“The key to in here is the same as surviving out there—you
got to see how people act, and then you got to figure out
how to get around them like an obstacle course. If you want
to walk out of here.”
“Graduate.”
“Walk out of here,” Turner corrected. “You think you can
do that? Watch and think? Nobody else is going to get you
out—just you.”
Dr.  Cooke gave Turner the boot the next morning with
two aspirin and a repeat of his prescription that he not eat
the food. It was only Elwood on the ward then. The curtain
that had been around the nameless boy was in the corner,
folded flat into itself. The bed was empty. He’d disappeared
sometime in the night without waking anyone.
Elwood intended to follow Turner’s advice, and he meant
it, but that was before he saw his legs. That defeated him
for a spell.
He spent another five days in the hospital, then it was
back with the other Nickel boys. School and work. He was
one of them now in many ways, including his embrace of
silence. When his grandmother came to visit, he couldn’t
tell her what he saw when Dr. Cooke removed the dressings
and he walked the cold tile to the bathroom. Elwood got a
look at himself then and knew that her heart wouldn’t be
able to take it, plus his shame in letting it happen. He was
as far away from her as the others in her family who’d
vanished and he was sitting right in front of her. On visiting
day, he told her he was okay but sad, it was difficult but he
was hanging in there, when all he wanted to say was, Look
at what they did to me, look at what they did to me.
OceanofPDF.com
W
CHAPTER EIGHT
hen Elwood got out he returned to the
yard crew. Jaimie the Mexican had
been chucked to the white side again
so another boy was in charge. More than once Elwood
caught himself swinging the scythe with too much violence,
like he was attacking the grass with a leather strap. He’d
stop and tell his heart to slow down. Ten days later, Jaimie
was back with the colored boys—Spencer rooted him out—
but he didn’t mind. “That’s my life, ping-pong.”
Elwood’s schooling was not going to improve. He had to
accept that. He touched Mr.  Goodall’s arm outside the
schoolhouse; the teacher didn’t recognize him. Goodall
repeated his promise to find more challenging work, but
Elwood was onto the teacher now and didn’t ask again. One
late-November afternoon they sent Elwood with a team to
clean out the basement of the schoolhouse, and he found a
set of Chipwick’s British Classics underneath some boxes
containing calendars for 1954. Trollope and Dickens and
people with names like that. Elwood went through the
books one by one during school hours while the boys
around him stuttered and stumbled. He had intended to
study British literature at the college. Now he had to teach
himself. It would have to do.
Punishment for acting above your station was a central
principle in Harriet’s interpretation of the world. In the
hospital, Elwood wondered if the viciousness of his beating
owed something to his request for harder classes: Get that
uppity nigger. Now he worked on a new theory: There was
no higher system guiding Nickel’s brutality, merely an
indiscriminate spite, one that had nothing to do with
people. A figment from tenth-grade science struck him: a
Perpetual Misery Machine, one that operated by itself
without human agency. Also, Archimedes, one of his first
encyclopedia finds. Violence is the only lever big enough to
move the world.
He canvassed but didn’t get a clear picture of how to
graduate early. Desmond, that scientist of demerit and
credit, was no help. “You get merits for behavior every
week if you do what you’re supposed to do, right off the
bat. But if your house father mixes you up with someone
else, or he’s out to get you—zip. For demerits, you never
know.” The demerit scale varied from dormitory to
dormitory. Smoking, fighting, perpetuating a state of
dishevelment—the penalty depended on where they’d sent
you and the whims of the local housemen. Blaspheming
cost a hundred demerits in Cleveland—Blakeley was the
God-fearing sort—but only fifty in Roosevelt. Jacking off
was a flat two hundred demerits in Lincoln, but if you were
caught jacking someone else off, it was only a hundred.
“Only a hundred?”
“That’s Lincoln for you,” Desmond said, as if explaining a
foreign land, jinns and ducats.
Blakeley liked his hooch, Elwood noticed. The man was
half-mast until noon. Did that mean he couldn’t rely on the
house father’s accounts? Say he stayed out of trouble,
Elwood asked, did everything right—how fast could he
climb from the lowest level of Grub to the highest level of
Ace? “If everything went perfect?”
“It’s too late for perfect if you already went down,”
Desmond told him.
Problem was, even if you avoided trouble, trouble might
reach out and snatch you anyway. Another student might
sniff out a weakness and start something, one of the staff
dislikes your smile and knocks it off your face. You might
stumble into a bramble of bad luck of the sort that got you
here in the first place. Elwood decided: By June he’d climb
the merit ladder out of this pit, four months short of what
that judge gave him. It was comforting—he was
accustomed to measuring time according to the school
calendar, so a June graduation made his Nickel term into a
lost year. This time next fall, he’d be back at Lincoln High
School for his senior year, and with Mr. Hill’s endorsement,
enrolled at Melvin Griggs again. They spent his college
money on the lawyer, but if Elwood worked extra next
summer, he’d make it back.
He had a date, now he needed a course of action. He felt
rotten those first days out of the hospital until he came up
with a scheme that combined Turner’s advice with what
he’d learned from his heroes in the movement. Watch and
think and plan. Let the world be a mob—Elwood will walk
through it. They might curse and spit and strike him, but
he’d make it through to the other side. Bloodied and tired,
but he’d make it through.
He waited, but no payback came from Lonnie and Black
Mike. Except for an incident where Griff hip-checked
Elwood and sent him crashing down the stairs, they
ignored him. Corey, the boy he’d stepped up to defend,
winked at him once. Everyone had moved on to girding
themselves for the next Nickel mishap, the one that was out
of their hands.
One Wednesday after breakfast, Carter the houseman
ordered Elwood over to the warehouse for a new detail.
Turner was there, along with a young white man, a lanky
sort with a beatnik slouch and a greasy spray of blond hair.
Elwood had seen him around, smoking in the shade of
various buildings. His name was Harper and according to
staff records, he worked in Community Service. Harper
looked Elwood over and said, “He’ll do.” The supervisor
closed the big sliding door to the warehouse, bolted it, and
they climbed into the front seat of a gray van. Unlike the
other school vehicles, it didn’t have Nickel’s name painted
on it.
Elwood sat in the middle. “Here we go,” Turner said. He
rolled down the window. “Harper asked who I thought
should replace Smitty, and I said, you. I told him you
weren’t another one of these dummies they got around
here.”
Smitty was an older boy from Roosevelt dormitory next
door. He’d hit the highest rank of Ace and graduated the
week prior, although Elwood thought graduate was a
moronic word to use. The boy couldn’t read a lick, plain as
day.
Harper said, “He said you can keep your mouth shut,
which is a requirement.” With that, they were off the
grounds.
Since the hospital, Elwood and Turner hung out most
days, killed afternoons in the Cleveland rec room playing
checkers and Ping-Pong with Desmond and some of the
other even-tempered boys. Turner usually stumbled into a
room as if searching for something, then started
bullshitting and forgot whatever errand had brought him
there. He was better at chess than Elwood, told better
jokes than Desmond, and unlike Jaimie, ran on a more
consistent schedule. Elwood knew Turner was assigned to
Community Service, but he got cagey when Elwood pressed
further: “It’s taking things and making sure they end up
where they’re supposed to end up in the end.”
“What the f-f-fuck does that mean,” Jaimie said. The boy
was not a natural cusser, and his occasional stutter
diminished the effect, but of the available vices at Nickel,
he had adopted foul language as one of the tamer choices.
“It means Community Service,” Elwood said.
The immediate meaning of Community Service was it
allowed Elwood to pretend he’d never hitchhiked to college
—for a few hours, he was out of Nickel. His first trip out in
the free world since his arrival. Free world was prison
slang, but it had migrated to the reformatory school
because it made sense, transmitted through a boy who’d
heard it from a hard-luck father or uncle, or from a staff
member revealing how he really felt about his charges,
despite the school vocabulary Nickel liked to use for itself.
The air was cool in Elwood’s lungs, and everything
outside the window dazzled, renewed. “This or this,” his
eye doctor asked at checkups, a choice between two lenses
of different power. Elwood never ceased to marvel how you
could walk around and get used to seeing only a fraction of
the world. Not knowing you only saw a sliver of the real
thing. This or this? Definitely this, all that the van tumbled
past, the sudden majesty of everything, even the fallingdown shotgun shacks and sad concrete-block houses, the
junker cars half in the weeds in someone’s yard. He saw a
rusty sign for Wild Cherry Hi-C and was more thirsty than
he’d ever been in his life.
Harper noticed the shift in Elwood’s posture. “He likes
being out,” the supervisor said, and he and Turner laughed.
He turned on the radio. Elvis was singing. Harper slapped
the steering wheel in time.
In temperament, Harper was an unlikely Nickel
employee. “All right for a white man,” in Turner’s
estimation. He practically grew up on the grounds, raised
by his mother’s sister, a secretary in the administration
building. He spent untold afternoons on the grounds as a
mascot to the white students and picked up odd work when
he was old enough. Painted reindeer in the annual
Christmas display ever since he could hold a brush. Now he
was twenty years old and worked full-time. “My aunt says
I’m a get-along type,” he told the boys one shift while they
idled outside the five-and-ten. “I suppose I am. I grew up
around you boys, white and colored, and I know you’re just
like me, but you had some bad luck.”
They made four stops around the town of Eleanor before
the fire chief’s house. First was JOHN DINER—a rusty outline
attested to a fallen-off letter and an apostrophe. They
parked down the alley and Elwood got a look at the van’s
cargo: cartons and crates of Nickel’s kitchen stores. Cans
of peas, industrial tins of peaches, applesauce, baked
beans, gravy. A selection of this week’s shipment from the
state of Florida.
Harper lit a cigarette and put his ear to a transistor
radio: game on today. Turner handed boxes of green beans
and sacks of onions down to Elwood before they brought
them into the back entrance of the restaurant kitchen.
“Don’t forget the molasses,” Harper said.
When they finished, the owner emerged—a porky
redneck whose apron was a palimpsest of dark stains—and
clapped Harper on the back. He handed Harper an
envelope and asked about his family.
“You know Aunt Lucille,” Harper said. “Supposed to stay
off her feet and never stays put for anything.”
The next two stops were also restaurants—a barbecue
stand and a meat-and-three joint over the county line—and
then they unloaded a store of canned vegetables at the Top
Shop Grocery. Harper folded each envelope of cash in half,
snapped a rubber band around it, and tossed it into the
glove compartment before the next destination.
Turner let the work speak for itself. Harper wanted to be
certain about Elwood’s comfort with his new detail. “You
don’t look surprised,” the young white man said.
“It has to end up somewhere,” Elwood responded.
“How things are done. Spencer tells me where to go, and
he kicks it up to Director Hardee.” Harper fiddled the dial
after more rock and roll: Elvis popped up again. He was
everywhere. “It used to be worse in the old days,” Harper
said, “from what my aunt says. But the state cracked down
and now we lay off the south-campus stuff.” Meaning, they
only sold the black students’ supplies. “We had this good
old boy who used to run Nickel, Roberts, who would’ve sold
the air you breathe if he could’ve. Now that was a crook!”
“Beats cleaning the toilets,” Turner said. “Beats cutting
grass, if you ask me.”
It was nice to be out, and Elwood said so. In the coming
months, Elwood saw all of Eleanor, Florida, as their threeman crew made the rounds. He got to know the back of the
short Main Street, as Harper parked by the service
entrances. Sometimes they unloaded notebooks and
pencils, sometimes medicine and bandages, but mostly it
was food. Thanksgiving turkeys and Christmas hams
disappeared into the hands of fry cooks, and the assistant
principal of the elementary school opened a box of erasers
and counted them one by one. Elwood wondered why the
boys had no toothpaste—now he knew. They parked behind
the five-and-ten, Fisher’s Drugs, and phoned ahead to the
local doctor, who slithered up to the driver’s window with a
furtive air. Once in a while they stopped at a green threestory house on a dead-end street and Harper got paid by a
well-groomed city-council type in a sweater vest. Harper
didn’t know the guy’s story, he said, but the man had good
manners, crisp bills, and liked to talk Florida teams.
This or this? Every time he left school property, the new
lens popped into place, and all it permitted him to see.
The first day, when the back of the van was empty,
Elwood assumed they’d return to Nickel, but they headed
to a clean, quiet street that reminded him of the nicer parts
of Tallahassee, the white part. They pulled up at a big white
house that floated on a sea of undulating green. An
American flag sighed on a pole attached to the roof. They
got out, and another look in the recesses of the van
revealed a canvas tarp that hid painting supplies.
“Mrs. Davis,” Harper said, bowing his head.
A white lady with a beehive hairdo waved from the front
porch. “This is so exciting,” she said.
Elwood didn’t make eye contact as she led them around
the back of the yard, where a gray, tired-looking gazebo
perched at the edge of the oak trees.
“That it?” Harper asked.
“My grandfather built it forty years ago,” Mrs.  Davis
said. “Conrad proposed to me right there.” She wore a
yellow dress with a houndstooth pattern and dark
sunglasses like Jackie Kennedy. She spotted a thin green
bug on her shoulder, flicked it off, and smiled.
A new paint job was in order. Mrs. Davis gave Harper a
broom, Harper gave Elwood the broom, and Elwood swept
the decking while Turner got the paint from the van.
“You boys are so nice to help us out here,” Mrs.  Davis
told them before she returned to the house.
“I’ll be back around three,” Harper said. Then he was
gone, too.
Turner explained that Harper had a girlfriend on Maple.
Her man worked at one of the factories and kept long
hours.
“We’re going to paint?” Elwood said.
“Yeah, man.”
“He’s leaving us here?”
“Yeah, man. Mr.  Davis is the fire chief. He has us out
here a lot, doing little stuff. Smitty and I did all the rooms
on the top floor.” He pointed to the dormer windows as if it
were possible for Elwood to appraise his handiwork. “All
those guys on the school board, they have us do chores.
Sometimes it’s some bullshit, but I’ll take being out here
over any job back at school.”
As did Elwood. It was a humid November afternoon and
he savored the free-world sounds of bugs and birds. Their
mating calls and warnings were soon accompanied by
Turner’s whistling—Chuck Berry, if Elwood was not
mistaken. The brand of paint was Dixie, the color Dixie
White.
The last time Elwood had done any painting, he’d given
Mrs. Lamont’s outhouse a new coat, a chore for which his
grandmother had loaned him out for ten cents. Turner
laughed and told Elwood how in the olden days, the school
sent teams of boys into Eleanor all the time to do work for
the big shots. According to Harper, sometimes it was
favors, like this paint job, but a lot of time it was for real
money, which schools kept for their “upkeep,” same as the
money from the crops, and the printing jobs, and the
bricks. Further back, it was more gruesome. “When you
graduated, you didn’t go back to your family, you had
parole where they basically sold your monkey ass to people
in town. Work like a slave, live in their basement or
whatever. Beat you, kick you, feed you shit.”
“Shit food, like we get now?”
“Hell, no. Way worse.” You had to work off your debt, he
said. Then they let you go.
“Debt from what?”
That stumped him. “I never thought about it that way.”
He stayed Elwood’s arm. “You don’t want to go too fast,” he
said. “This can be a three-day job, we play it right.
Mrs. Davis brings out lemonade.”
When two glasses of lemonade appeared on a bronze
tray, it was excellent.
They finished the railings and lattice of the walls. Elwood
shook a new can of Dixie White, pried it open, and stirred.
He’d told Turner how he got pinched and sent to Nickel
—“Man, that’s a raw deal”—but Turner never talked about
his old life. This was his second term at the school after
being out almost a year. Maybe asking about how he got
snatched back was a way in. The Nickel undertow sucked
up everything, and his friend’s past might get pulled into
the story.
Turner sat down at Elwood’s question. “You know what a
pinsetter is?”
“In a bowling alley,” Elwood said.
“I was working as a pinsetter in a bowling alley down in
Tampa, the Holiday. Most places, they got the machine that
does it, but Mr. Garfield was hanging in there. He liked to
see his pin boys crouch at the end of the lane like we were
sprinters. Or dogs about to go out hunting. It wasn’t a bad
job. Picking up the pins after each throw and setting them
up for the next frame. Mr.  Garfield was a friend of the
Everetts, where I was living. The state paid the Everetts
money to take in kids. Some money, not a lot. There were
always a lot of us strays around, coming and going.
“Like I said, it was a good job. Thursday was colored
night, and everybody came from all around, the different
colored bowling leagues, and that was a good time, but
mostly it was these stupid rednecks from Tampa. Some bad,
some less bad—white people. I was pretty fast and I find it
easy to smile when I’m working, being somewhere else in
my thoughts while I’m doing whatever, and the customers
liked me, they gave me tips. I got to know some of the
regulars. Not like know them, but we saw each other every
week. Like that. I started goofing off with them—if it was a
guy I knew, I might make a joke when they fouled, or make
some clown face like this when they threw a gutter or had
some funny-looking split. That became my routine, joking
around with the regulars, and I liked the tips.
“There was this old head who worked in the kitchen, his
name was Lou. One of those dudes you know have seen
some shit. He didn’t talk much to us pin boys, he flipped
burgers. Because he wasn’t too friendly, we didn’t
conversate much. This one night I was on my break and I
go out for a cigarette behind the grill. And he’s there. In
this apron, covered with grease. It was a hot night. And he
looks me up and down. He says to me, ‘I see you out there,
nigger, putting on a show. Why you always shucking and
jiving for these white people? Ain’t nobody ever teach you
self-respect?’
“Two other setters are out there and they hear this,
they’re like, damn. My face got all hot, I was ready to
punch this old fool—he doesn’t know me. Don’t know shit
about me. I look at him, and he ain’t moving, standing there
smoking this cigarette he rolled, and he knows I’m not
going to do anything. Because he’s right in what he said.
“Next time I was on a shift, I don’t know, I started doing
it differently. Instead of joking with them, I was mean.
When they hit the gutter or stepped over the line, there
was nothing friendly in my face. I saw in their eyes when
they realized the game had changed. Maybe we’d
pretended to be on the same side before and it was all
equal, but now it wasn’t.
“End of the night, I’d been taunting this fucking
peckerwood the whole game. This big heehaw meathead.
It’s his turn and he has to pick up a 4–6 split. I said, ‘Ain’t
that a stinker,’ like Bugs Bunny, and that’s it for him—he
comes charging up the lane. He’s chasing me around the
place, I’m jumping from lane to lane, up in everybody’s
business, dodging balls, and then finally his friends hold
him back. They come there all the time, they’re not trying
to make things hard for Mr.  Garfield. They know me, or
thought they knew me until I started not acting right, and
they get their friend and cool him out and leave.”
Turner grinned as he acted out the story. Until the last
part. He squinted at the floor of the gazebo as if trying to
make out something tiny. “That was the end of it, really,” he
said, scratching the nick in his ear. “Next week I saw that
guy’s car in the parking lot and I threw a cinder block
through the window and the cops picked me up.”
Harper was an hour late. They weren’t going to
complain. Free time at Nickel on one side, work time in the
free world on the other—it was an easy calculation. “Going
to need a ladder,” Elwood told Harper when he showed up.
“Sure,” Harper said.
Mrs. Davis waved from the porch as they pulled away.
“How’s your lady, Harper?” Turner asked.
Harper tucked in his shirttail. “Just when you ease into a
good time, they bring up some whole other thing they been
thinking about since the last time you saw them.”
“Sure, I know,” Turner said. He reached for Harper’s
cigarettes and lit one.
Elwood grabbed everything he saw in the free world to
reassemble it in his mind later. What things looked like and
what things smelled like and other things as well. Two days
later Harper told him he was on Community Service
permanently. But then, white men had always noticed his
industrious nature. The news brightened his mood. Each
time they returned to Nickel, he wrote down the particulars
in a composition book. The date. The name of the individual
and the establishment. Some names took a while to fill in,
but Elwood had always been the patient type, and
thorough.
OceanofPDF.com
T
CHAPTER NINE
he boys rooted for Griff even though he
was a miserable bully who jimmied and
pried at their weaknesses and made up
weaknesses if he couldn’t find any, such as calling you a
“knock-kneed piece of shit” even if your knees had never
knocked your whole life. He tripped them and laughed at
the ensuing pratfalls and slapped them around when he
could get away with it. He punked them out, dragging them
into dark rooms. He smelled like a horse and made fun of
their mothers, which was pretty low given the general
motherlessness of the student population. He stole their
desserts on multiple occasions—swiped from trays with a
grin—and even if the desserts in question were no great
shakes, it was the principle. The boys rooted for Griff
because he was going to represent the colored half of
Nickel at the annual boxing match, and no matter what he
did the rest of the year, the day of the fight he was all of
them in one black body and he was going to knock that
white boy out.
If Griff spat teeth before that happened, swell.
The colored boys had held the Nickel title for fifteen
years. Old hands on staff remembered the last white
champion and still talked him up; other things from the old
days they discussed less often. Terry “Doc” Burns was an
anvil-handed good old boy from a musty corner of
Suwannee County who’d been sent to Nickel for strangling
a neighbor’s chickens. Twenty-one chickens, to be exact,
because “they were out to get him.” Pain rolled off him like
rain from a slate roof. After Doc Burns returned to the free
world, the white boys who advanced to the final fight were
pikers, so wobbly that over the years tall tales about the
former champion grew more extravagant: Nature had
gifted Doc Burns with an unnaturally long reach; he did not
tire; his legendary combo swatted down every comer and
rattled windows. In fact, Doc Burns had been beaten and
ill-treated by so many in his life—family and stranger alike
—that by the time he arrived at Nickel all punishments
were gentle breezes.
This was Griff’s first term on the boxing team. He
arrived at Nickel in February, right after the graduation of
the previous champ, Axel Parks. Axel should have
graduated before fighting season, but Roosevelt’s
housemen made sure he was around to defend his title. An
accusation of stealing apples from the dining hall knocked
him down to Grub and guaranteed his availability. Griff’s
emergence as the baddest brother on campus made him
Axel’s natural successor. Outside the ring Griff made a
hobby of terrorizing the weaker boys, the boys without
friends, the weepy ones. Inside the ring his prey stepped
right up so he didn’t waste time hunting. Like an electric
toaster or an automated washing machine, boxing was a
modern convenience that made life easier.
The coach for the colored team was a Mississippian
named Max David who worked in the school garage. He got
an envelope at the end of the year for imparting what he’d
learned during his welterweight stint. Max David made his
pitch to Griff early in the summer. “My first fight made me
cockeyed,” he said, “and my farewell fight set my eyes right
again, so trust me when I say this sport will break you
down to make you better, and that’s a fact.” Griff smiled.
The giant pulverized and unmanned his opponents with
cruel inevitability through autumn. He was not graceful, he
was not a scientist. He was a powerful instrument of
violence, and that sufficed.
Given the typical length of enrollment at Nickel—
sabotage by staff aside—most students were only around
for one or two fighting seasons. As the championship
approached, the Grubs had to be schooled in the
importance of those December matches—the prelims inside
your dorm, the match between your dorm’s guy and the
best sluggers from the other two dorms, and then the bout
between the best black fighter and whatever chump the
white guys put up. The championship would be their sole
acquaintance with justice at Nickel.
The combat served as a kind of mollifying spell, to tide
them through the daily humiliations. Trevor Nickel
instituted the championship matches in 1946, soon after he
came on as the director of the Florida Industrial School for
Boys with a mandate for reform. Nickel had never run a
school before; his background was in agriculture. He made
an impression at Klan meetings, however, with his
impromptu speeches on moral improvement and the value
of work, the disposition of young souls in need of care. The
right people remembered his passion when an opening
came up. His first Christmas at the school gave the county
the chance to witness his improvements. Everything that
needed a new coat of paint got a new coat of paint, the
dark cells were briefly converted to more innocent use, and
the beatings relocated to the small white utility building.
Had the good people of Eleanor seen the industrial fan,
they might have had a question or two, but the shed was
not part of the tour.
Nickel was a longtime boxing evangelist, had steered a
lobbying group for its expansion in the Olympics. Boxing
had always been popular at the school, as most of the boys
had seen their share of scrapes, but the new director took
the sport’s elevation as his remit. The athletics budget,
long an easy target for directors on the skim, was
rejiggered to pay for regulation equipment and to bolster
the coaching staff. Nickel maintained a general interest in
fitness overall. He possessed a fervent belief in the miracle
of a human specimen in top shape and often watched the
boys shower to monitor the progress of their physical
education.
“The director?” Elwood asked when Turner told him that
last part.
“Where do you think Dr. Campbell got that trick from?”
Turner said. Nickel was gone, but Dr. Campbell, the school
psychologist, was known to loiter at the white boys’
showers to pick his dates. “All these dirty old men got a
club together.”
Elwood and Turner were hanging out on the gymnasium
bleachers this afternoon. Griff sparred with Cherry, a
mulatto who took up boxing as a matter of pedagogy, to
teach others how not to speak about his white mother. He
was quick and lithe and Griff clobbered him.
Catching Griff at his regimen was Cleveland’s favorite
occupation those early days in December. Boys from the
colored dormitories made the rounds, as well as white
scouts from down the hill who wanted the skinny. Griff had
been excused from his kitchen shift since Labor Day to
train. It was a spectacle. Max kept him on an obscure diet
of raw eggs and oats, and stored a jug of what he claimed
was goat blood in the icebox. When the coach administered
the doses, Griff swallowed the stuff with a lot of theater and
mortified the heavy bag in revenge.
Turner had seen Axel fight during his first term at
Nickel, two years prior. Axel was slow on his feet but as
solid and abiding as an old stone bridge; he weathered
what the skies decreed. Contrary to Griff’s mealy
disposition, he was kind and protective of the smaller kids.
“I wonder where he is now,” Turner said. “That nigger
doesn’t have a lick of sense. Making things worse for
himself, probably, wherever he is.” A Nickel tradition.
Cherry wavered and sank on his ass. Griff spat out his
mouthpiece and bellowed. Black Mike stepped into the
sparring ring and held Griff’s hand up like Lady Liberty’s
torch.
“Do you think he’ll knock him down?” Elwood asked. The
likely white contender was a boy named Big Chet, who
came from a clan of swamp people and was a bit of a
creature.
“Look at those arms, man,” Turner said. “Those things
are pistons. Or smoked hams.”
To see Griff quiver with unspent energy after a match,
two chucks unlacing his gloves like retainers, it was hard to
imagine how the giant could lose. Which is why, two days
later, Turner sat up in surprise when he heard Spencer tell
Griff to take a dive.
Turner was napping in the warehouse loft, where he’d
made a nest among crates of industrial scrubbing powder.
None of the staff bugged him when he went alone into the
big storage room on account of his work with Harper,
which meant Turner had a getaway place. No supervisors,
no students—just him, a pillow, an army blanket, and
Harper’s transistor radio. He spent a couple of hours a
week up there. It was like when he was tramping and didn’t
care to know anybody and no one cared to know him. He’d
had a few periods like that, when he was rootless and
tumbled down the street like an old newspaper. The loft
took him back.
The closing of the warehouse door woke him. Then came
Griff’s dumb donkey voice: “What is it, Mr. Spencer, sir?”
“How’s that training coming along, Griff? Good old Max
says you’re a natural.”
Turner frowned. Any time a white man asked you about
yourself, they were about to fuck you over. Griff was so
stupid he didn’t know what was happening. In class, the
boy struggled over two plus three, like he didn’t know how
many damned fingers he had on his hand. Some foolhardies
in the schoolhouse laughed at him then and Griff stuck
their heads into toilets, one by one over the next week.
Turner’s assessment was correct: Griff refused to grasp
the reason for the secret meeting. Spencer expounded
about the importance of the fight, the tradition of the
December match. Then he hinted: Good sportsmanship
means letting the other team win sometimes. He tried
euphemism: It’s like when a tree branch has to bend so it
doesn’t break. He appealed to fatalism: Sometimes it don’t
work out, no matter how much you try. But Griff was too
thick. Yes, sir…I suppose that’s right, Mr.  Spencer…I
believe that is the case, sir. Finally the superintendent told
Griff that his black ass had to take a dive in the third round
or else they’d take him out back.
“Yes, sir, Mr. Spencer,” Griff said. Up in the loft Turner
couldn’t see Griff’s face, so he didn’t know if he
understood. The boy had stones in his fists and rocks in his
head.
Spencer ended with, “You know you can beat him. That’ll
have to be enough.” He cleared his throat and said, “You
come along, now,” as if herding a lamb who’d wandered.
Turner was alone again.
“Ain’t that some shit?” he said. He and Elwood were
lounging on Cleveland’s front steps after a run to Eleanor.
The daylight was thin, winter coming down like the lid on
an old pot. Elwood was the only person Turner could tell.
The rest of these mutts would blab and then there’d be a
lot of busted heads.
Turner had never met a kid like Elwood before. Sturdy
was the word he returned to, even though the Tallahassee
boy looked soft, conducted himself like a goody-goody, and
had an irritating tendency to preach. Wore eyeglasses you
wanted to grind underfoot like a butterfly. He talked like a
white college boy, read books when he didn’t have to, and
mined them for uranium to power his own personal Abomb. Still—sturdy.
Elwood wasn’t surprised at Turner’s news. “Organized
boxing is corrupt on every level,” he said with authority.
“There’s been a lot in the newspapers about it.” He
described what he’d read back at Marconi’s, perched on his
stool during the dead hours. “Only reason to fix a fight is
because you’re betting on it.”
“I’d bet on it, if I had any money,” Turner said.
“Sometimes at the Holiday, we put money on the playoffs. I
got paid.”
“People are going to be upset,” Elwood said. Griff’s
victory was sure to be a feast, but almost as delicious were
the morsels the boys traded in anticipation, the scenarios in
which the white contender lost control of his bowels or
threw up a geyser of blood in Director Hardee’s face or
white teeth flew from his mouth “like they were chipped
out with an ice pick.” Fantasies hearty and fortifying.
“Sure,” Turner said. “But Spencer says he’s going to
take you out back, you listen.”
“Take him to the White House?”
“I’ll show you,” Turner said. They had some time before
supper.
They walked ten minutes to the laundry, which was shut
at this time of day. Turner asked Elwood about the book
under his arm and Elwood said a British family was trying
to marry off their oldest daughter to keep their estate and
title. The story had complicated turns.
“No one wants to marry her? She ugly?”
“She’s described as having a handsome face.”
“Damn.”
Past the laundry were the dilapidated horse stables. The
ceiling had given way long ago and nature had crept inside,
with skeletal bushes and limp grasses rising in the stalls.
You could get up to some wickedness in there if you didn’t
believe in ghosts, but none of the students had arrived at a
definite opinion on the matter so everyone stayed away to
be safe. There were two oaks on one side of the stables,
with iron rings stabbed into the bark.
“This is out back,” Turner said. “They say once in a while
they take a black boy here and shackle him up to those.
Arms spread out. Then they get a horse whip and tear him
up.”
Elwood made two fists, then caught himself. “No white
boys?”
“The White House, they got that integrated. This place is
separate. They take you out back, they don’t bring you to
the hospital. They put you down as escaped and that’s that,
boy.”
“What about their family?”
“How many boys you know here got family? Or got
family that cares about them? Not everyone is you,
Elwood.” Turner got jealous when Elwood’s grandmother
visited and brought him snacks, and it slipped out from
time to time. Like now. The blinders Elwood wore, walking
around. The law was one thing—you can march and wave
signs around and change a law if you convinced enough
white people. In Tampa, Turner saw the college kids with
their nice shirts and ties sit in at the Woolworths. He had to
work, but they were out protesting. And it happened—they
opened the counter. Turner didn’t have the money to eat
there either way. You can change the law but you can’t
change people and how they treat each other. Nickel was
racist as hell—half the people who worked here probably
dressed up like the Klan on weekends—but the way Turner
saw it, wickedness went deeper than skin color. It was
Spencer. It was Spencer and it was Griff and it was all the
parents who let their children wind up here. It was people.
Which is why Turner brought Elwood out to the two
trees. To show him something that wasn’t in books.
Elwood grabbed one of the rings and tugged. It was
solid, part of the trunk now. Human bones would break
before it came loose.
Harper confirmed the gambling two days later. They’d
unloaded a few hogs at Terry’s BBQ. “Delivered unto them,”
Turner said when Harper closed the van door. Their hands
reeked of slaughter smell and he asked about the fight.
“I’ll put down some money when I see who shakes out
for the big one,” Harper said. Betting was small-time when
Director Nickel ran things—purity of the sport, etc.
Nowadays the fat cats turned out, anyone in three counties
with a taste for wagering. Well, not anyone, someone on
staff had to vouch for you. “You always bet on the colored
boy anyway, though. Be foolish not to.”
“All boxing is fixed,” Elwood said.
“Crooked as a country preacher,” Turner added.
“They wouldn’t do that,” Harper said. This was his
childhood he was talking about. He grew up on those
matches, chomping popped corn in the VIP section. “It’s a
beautiful thing.”
Turner snorted and started whistling.
The big match was split up over two nights. On the first,
the white campus and black campus settled who to send to
the main event. For the last two months, three boxing rings
had been set up in the gymnasium for training; now only
one remained in the center of the big room. It was chilly
outside and the spectators stepped into the humid cavern.
White men from town claimed the folding chairs closest to
the ring, then came staff, and beyond that the student body
crammed into the bleachers, squatted on the floors, ashy
elbow to ashy elbow. The racial division of the school recreated itself in the gym, with white boys taking the south
half and black boys claiming the north. They jostled at the
borders.
Director Hardee acted as master of ceremonies. He
rarely left his office in the administration building. Turner
hadn’t seen him since Halloween, when he dressed in a
Dracula outfit and distributed sweaty handfuls of candy
corn to the younger students. He was a short man, fastened
into his suits, with a bald pate that floated in a cloud bank
of white hair. Hardee had brought his wife, a robust beauty
whose every visit was thoroughly annotated by the
students, if furtively—reckless eyeballing called for
mandatory beatings. She’d been Miss South Louisiana, or
so the story went. She cooled her neck with a paper fan.
The Hardees enjoyed a prime spot in front with the
board members. Turner recognized most of them from
raking their yards or delivering a ham. Where their pink
necks emerged from the linen, that’s where you strike, the
vulnerable inch.
Harper sat behind the VIP row with the rest of the staff.
He carried himself differently in the company of his fellow
supervisors, dropping his shirker’s affect. Many an
afternoon, Turner had seen the man’s face and posture
click into its proper place when a houseman or supervisor
showed up. A snap-to, dropping a disguise or taking one up.
Hardee made a few remarks. The chairman of the board,
Mr.  Charles Grayson—the manager of the bank and a
longtime Nickel supporter—was turning sixty on Friday.
Hardee made the students sing “Happy Birthday.” Mr.
Grayson stood and nodded, hands behind his back like a
dictator.
The white dormitories were up first. Big Chet squeezed
between the ropes and bounded into the center of the ring.
His cheerleaders expressed themselves with gusto; he
commanded a legion. The white boys didn’t get it as bad as
the black boys, but they were not in Nickel because the
world cared overmuch. Big Chet was their Great White
Hope. Gossip nailed him for a sleepwalker, punching holes
in the bathroom walls without waking. Morning found him
sucking on his bloody knuckles. “Nigger looks like
Frankenstein,” Turner said. Square head, long arms,
loping.
The opening fight went three unremarkable rounds. The
ref, who managed the floor of the printing plant in the
daytime, gave the decision to Big Chet and no one argued
otherwise. He was regarded as an even personality, the ref,
ever since he slapped a kid and his fraternity ring left the
kid half blind. After that he bent a knee to Our Savior and
never again raised a hand in anger except at his wife. The
white boys’ second match opened with a pop—a pneumatic
uppercut that whisked Big Chet’s opponent into a
childhood fear. He spent the remainder of the round and
the next two skittering like a rabbit. At the ref’s decision,
Big Chet rummaged in his mouth and spat out his
mouthpiece in two pieces. He raised his big ole arms to the
sky.
“I think he could take Griff,” Elwood said.
“Maybe he can, but they have to make sure.” If you had
the power to make people do what you wanted and never
exercised it, what was the point of having it?
Griff’s bouts with the champs of Roosevelt and Lincoln
were brief affairs. Pettibone stood a foot shorter than Griff,
an obvious mismatch when you saw them toe to toe, but
he’d climbed the Roosevelt heap and that was that. At the
bell, Griff barreled out and humiliated his quarry with a
battery of zip-zip-zip body blows. The crowd winced. “He’s
having ribs for dinner!” a boy behind Turner shouted.
Mrs.  Hardee shrieked when Pettibone floated up dreamily
on his tippy-toes and then toppled to kiss the dirty mat.
The second match was less lopsided. Griff tenderized the
Lincoln boy like a cheap cut of meat for three rounds, but
Wilson stayed on his feet to prove his worth to his father.
Wilson had two bouts going, the one everybody could see
and the one only he could. His father had been dead for
years and was thus unable to revise his assessment of his
firstborn son’s character, but that night Wilson slept
without nightmares for the first time in years. The ref gave
the fight to Griff with a concerned smile.
Turner surveyed the room and took in the assembled
marks, the boys and the bettors. You run a rigged game,
you got to give the suckers a taste. Back in Tampa, a few
blocks down from the Everetts’ house, a street hustler
conducted rounds of Find the Lady outside a cigar store.
Taking suckers’ money all day, weaving those cards around
on a cardboard box. The rings on his fingers sparkled and
shouted in the sun. Turner liked to hover and take in the
show. Track the hustler’s eyes, track the mark’s eyes as he
tried to follow the queen of hearts. Then they turned over
their card: How their faces collapsed when they saw they
weren’t as smart as they thought. The hustler told Turner
to beat it, but as the weeks went on he got bored and let
the boy hang around. “You got to let them think they know
what’s going on,” he told Turner one day. “They see it with
their own eyes, distract themselves with that, so they can’t
see the bigger game.” When the cops hauled him to jail, his
cardboard box lay in the alley around the corner for weeks.
With tomorrow’s fight set, Turner was transported back
to that street corner. Watching a game of Find the Lady,
neither hustler nor mark, outside the game but knowing all
its rules. The next evening the white men will put up their
money and the black boys will put up their hopes, and then
the confidence man turns over the ace of spades and rakes
it all in. Turner remembered the excitement of Axel’s fight
two years ago, the deranged joy in the realization that they
were allowed to have something for a change. They were
happy for a few hours, spending time in the free world,
then it was back to Nickel.
Suckers, all of them.
The morning of Griff’s big match, the black students
woke up wrung out from sleeplessness and the dining hall
bubbled with chatter over the dimension and magnitude of
Griff’s looming triumph. That white boy’s gonna be
toothless as my old granny. The witch doctor can give him
the whole bucket of aspirin and he’ll still have a headache.
The Ku Klux Klan’s gonna be crying under their hoods all
week. The colored boys frothed and speculated and stared
off in class, slacked off in the sweet potato fields. Mulling
the prospect of a black champion: One of them victorious
for a change, and those who kept you down whittled to
dust, seeing stars.
Griff strutted like a black duke, a gang of chucks in his
wake. The younger kids threw punches at their private,
invisible adversaries and made up a song about their new
hero’s prowess. Griff hadn’t bloodied or mistreated anyone
outside of the ring in a week, as if he’d sworn on a Bible,
and Black Mike and Lonnie curbed themselves in solidarity.
By all accounts, Griff was unbothered by Spencer’s order,
or so it seemed to Elwood. “It’s like he forgot,” he
whispered to Turner as they walked to the warehouse after
breakfast.
“If I got all this respect, I’d enjoy it, too,” Turner said.
The next day it would be as if it never happened. He
remembered Axel the afternoon after his big fight, stirring
a wheelbarrow of cement, gloomy and diminished once
more. “When’s the next time fools who hate and fear you
are going to treat you like Harry Belafonte?”
“Or he forgot,” Elwood said.
That evening they filed into the gymnasium. Some of the
kitchen boys operated a big kettle, cranking out popcorn
and scooping it into paper cones. The chucks chomped it
down and raced to the back of the line for seconds. Turner,
Elwood, and Jaimie squeezed together in the middle of the
bleachers. It was a good spot. “Hey Jaimie, aren’t you
supposed to be sitting over there?” Turner asked.
Jaimie grinned. “Way I see it, I win either way.”
Turner crossed his arms and scanned the faces on the
floor. There was Spencer. He shook hands with the fat cats
in the front row, the director and his wife, and then sat with
the staff, smug and sure. He withdrew a silver flask from
his windbreaker and took a pull. The bank manager handed
out cigars. Mrs.  Hardee took one and everyone watched
her blow smoke. Wispy gray figures twirled in the overhead
light, living ghosts.
On the other side of the room, the white boys stomped
their feet on the wood and the thunder bounced off the
walls. The black boys picked it up and the stomping rolled
around the room in a staggered stampede. It traveled a full
circuit before the boys stopped and cheered at their racket.
“Send him to the undertaker!”
The ref rang the bell. The two fighters were the same
height and build, hacked from the same quarry. An even
match, the track record of colored champions
notwithstanding. Those opening rounds, there was no
dancing or ducking. The boys bit into each other again and
again, trading attacks, bucking the pain. The crowd
bellowed and jeered at every advance and reversal. Black
Mike and Lonnie hung on the ropes, hooting scatological
invective at Big Chet, until the ref kicked their hands away.
If Griff feared knocking out Big Chet by accident, he gave
no sign. The black giant battered the white boy without
mercy, absorbed his opponent’s counterassault, jabbed at
the kid’s face as if punching his way through the wall of a
prison cell. When blood and sweat blinded him, he
maintained an eerie sense of Big Chet’s position and fended
the boy off.
At the end of the second round, you had to call the fight
for Griff, despite Big Chet’s admirable offensives.
“Making it look good,” Turner said.
Elwood frowned in disdain at the whole performance,
which made Turner smile. The fight was as rigged and
rotten as the dishwashing races he’d told Turner about,
another gear in the machine that kept black folks down.
Turner enjoyed his friend’s new bend toward cynicism,
even as he found himself swayed by the magic of the big
fight. Seeing Griff, their enemy and champion, put a
hurting on that white boy made a fellow feel all right. In
spite of himself. Now that the third and final round was
upon them, he wanted to hold on to that feeling. It was real
—in their blood and minds—even if it was a lie. Turner was
certain Griff was going to win even though he knew he
wasn’t. Turner was a mark after all, another sucker, but he
didn’t care.
Big Chet advanced on Griff and unfurled a series of
quick jabs that drove him into his corner. Griff was trapped
and Turner thought, Now. But the black boy gathered his
opponent in a clinch and remained on his feet. Body blows
sent the white boy reeling. The round dwindled into
seconds and Griff did not relent. Big Chet squashed his
nose with a thunk and Griff shook it off. Each time Turner
saw the perfect moment to take a dive—Big Chet’s rigorous
assault would cover even the worst acting—Griff refused
the opening.
Turner nudged Elwood, who had a look of horror on his
face. They saw it: Griff wasn’t going down. He was going to
go for it.
No matter what happened after.
When the bell sounded for the last time, the two Nickel
boys in the ring were entwined, bloody and slick, propping
each other up like a human tepee. The ref split them and
they stumbled crazily to their corners, spent.
Turner said, “Damn.”
“Maybe they called it off,” Elwood said.
Sure, it was possible the ref was in on it and they’d
decided to fix it that way instead. Spencer’s reaction
dispelled that theory. The superintendent was the only
person in the second row still sitting, a malignant scowl
screwed into his face. One of the fat cats turned around,
red-faced, and grabbed his arm.
Griff jerked to his feet, lumbered to the center of the
ring, and shouted. The noise of the crowd smothered his
words. Black Mike and Lonnie held back their friend, who
appeared to have lost his wits. He struggled to cross the
ring.
The ref called for everyone to settle down and delivered
his decision: The first two rounds went to Griff, the last to
Big Chet. The black boys had prevailed.
Instead of cavorting around the canvas in triumph, Griff
squirmed free and traversed the ring to where Spencer sat.
Now Turner heard his words: “I thought it was the second!
I thought it was the second!” He was still screaming as the
black boys led him back to Roosevelt, cheering and
whooping for their champion. They had never seen Griff cry
before and took his tears for those of triumph.
Getting hit in the head can rattle your brains. Getting hit
in the head like that can make you addle-minded and
confused. Turner never thought it’d make you forget two
plus one. But Griff had never been good at arithmetic, he
supposed.
He was all of them in one black body that night in the
ring, and all of them when the white men took him out back
to those two iron rings. They came for Griff that night and
he never returned. The story spread that he was too proud
to take a dive. That he refused to kneel. And if it made the
boys feel better to believe that Griff escaped, broke away
and ran off into the free world, no one told them otherwise,
although some noted that it was odd the school never
sounded the alarm or sent out the dogs. When the state of
Florida dug him up fifty years later, the forensic examiner
noted the fractures in the wrists and speculated that he’d
been restrained before he died, in addition to the other
violence attested by the broken bones.
Most of those who know the story of the rings in the
trees are dead by now. The iron is still there. Rusty. Deep in
the heartwood. Testifying to anyone who cares to listen.
OceanofPDF.com
M
CHAPTER TEN
iscreants had bashed in the reindeers’
heads. They expected a certain amount
of wear and tear after the holiday,
when the boys gathered to pack the delicate Christmas
displays. Bent antlers, a leg twisting from shreds at the
joint. What lay before them was malicious vandalism.
“Look at this,” Miss Baker said. She sucked her teeth.
Miss Baker was on the young side for a Nickel teacher, with
a predilection for simmering outrage. At Nickel, her
dependable ire stemmed from the regrettable condition of
the colored art room, the haphazard supplies, and what
could only be interpreted as institutional resistance to her
various improvements. The young teachers never lasted
long before they moved on. “All this hard work.”
Turner pulled out the balled-up newspaper from the
reindeer skull and unwrinkled it. The headline rendered a
verdict on the first Nixon and Kennedy debate: ROUT. “This
one’s a goner,” he said.
Elwood raised his hand. “Do you want us to make all new
ones or just new heads, Miss Baker?”
“I think the bodies we can salvage,” she said. She
grimaced and twisted her curly red hair into a bun. “Just do
the heads. Touch up the fur on the bodies and next year
we’ll start from scratch.”
Visitors from all over the panhandle, families from
Georgia and Alabama caravaned every year to take in the
annual Christmas Fair. It was the pride of the
administration, a fund-raising bounty that proved reform
was no mere lofty notion but a workable proposition. A bit
of an operation, gears and gears. Five miles of colored
lights dangled from the cedars and traced the roofs of the
south campus. The thirty-foot Santa at the foot of the drive
required a crane to fit it together. The assembly
instructions for the miniature steam train that looped
around the football field were passed through the decades
like the scrolls of a solemn sect.
Last year’s display attracted more than a hundred
thousand guests to the property. There was no reason,
Director Hardee insisted, that the good boys of the Nickel
Academy couldn’t improve on that number.
The white students handled construction and the
reassembly of the large displays—the gigantic sleigh, the
Nativity diorama, the train tracks—and the black students
did most of the painting. Touch-ups, new additions.
Correcting the artistic errors of previous, less meticulous
boys and refurbing the old workhorses. Three-foot-high
candy canes lined each dormitory walkway, and they
invariably required new dabs of red and white paint. The
monstrous poster-size Christmas cards featured North Pole
shenanigans, fairy-tale favorites like Hansel and Gretel and
the Three Little Pigs, and biblical re-creations. The cards
tilted on stands along the school roads as if adorning the
lobby of a grand theater.
The students loved this time of year, whether it reminded
them of Christmases back home, miserable as they were, or
it was the first real holiday of their whole lives. Everyone
got gifts—Jackson County was generous that way—white
and black alike, not just sweaters and underwear but
baseball gloves and boxes of tin army men. For one
morning they were like boys from nice houses in nice
neighborhoods where it was quiet at night and
nightmareless.
Even Turner had cause to smile, as he touched up the
Gingerbread Man card and remembered the folk hero’s
rallying cry: “You can’t catch me, you can’t catch me.” A
good way to be. He didn’t remember how the story ended.
Miss Baker signed off on his work and he joined Jaimie,
Elwood, and Desmond over by the papier-mâché station.
Desmond whispered, “Jaimie says Earl.”
Desmond found the stuff but Jaimie came up with the
scheme. It was an unlikely proposition from a student who
had just made it to Pioneer. Almost out. Jaimie grew up in
Tallahassee like Elwood, but they couldn’t name two places
they had in common. Different neighborhoods, different
cities. His father, he’d been told, was a full-time flimflam
man and the part-time regional salesman for a vacuum
cleaner company, driving his circuit around the panhandle
and knocking on doors. It wasn’t clear how he met Jaimie’s
mother, but Jaimie was one proof of their acquaintance and
the vacuum cleaner that they lugged from short-term
residence to short-term residence was another.
Jaimie’s mother, Ellie, swept up at the Coca-Cola bottling
plant on South Monroe, in All Saints. Jaimie and his gang
used to kick around the railroad yard nearby. Playing craps,
passing around a harrowed copy of Playboy. He was a good
kid, not the most diligent about school attendance, but
never would’ve seen the inside of Nickel if not for the
depot. An old rummy who haunted the yards stuck his hand
down the pants of one of the gang and they beat him
senseless. Jaimie was the only one who didn’t outrun the
deputies.
During his term at Nickel, the Mexican boy sidestepped
the squabbles that embroiled the rest of them, the
uncounted disputes over psychological turf and endless
encroachments. His constant dorm reassignments
notwithstanding, Jaimie kept a quiet profile and conducted
himself in accordance with the Nickel handbook’s rules of
conduct—a miracle, since no one had ever seen the
handbook despite its constant invocations by the staff. Like
justice, it existed in theory.
Spiking a supervisor’s drink lay outside his personality.
Nonetheless: Earl.
Desmond worked in the sweet potato fields. No
complaints. He liked the way the potatoes smelled at the
cusp of picking time, that warm, peaty scent. Like his
father’s sweat when he came home from work and made
sure Desmond was tucked in proper.
The previous week Desmond was part of a team ordered
to rearrange a work shed, the big gray one where they kept
the tractors. Half the lights were burned out and critters
had made a home in various spots. Spiderwebs canopied
one corner and Desmond stabbed a broom at the white
blossoms, wary of what might burst forth. He recognized
some of the loose cans stacked there and found a place for
them, but there was one green relic too faded to read. He
shook it: solid throughout. He asked one of the older boys
what to do with it, and the kid said that it shouldn’t be in
there. “That’s horse medicine, to make them puke when
they eat something they shouldn’t.” The old stables were
nearby—perhaps that junk had ended up here when they
closed them down. At Nickel, things tended to end up
where they were supposed to, but a lazy or mischievous
soul occasionally subverted the order.
Desmond hid the medicine in his windbreaker and took it
to Cleveland.
One of them—no one remembered who, when it was all
over—suggested putting it in a staffer’s drink. Why else had
Desmond taken it? But it was Jaimie who made the scheme
real in his calm rebuttals to the counterarguments. “Who
would you give it to?” Jaimie asked his friends in turn, with
a rhetorical air. Jaimie had a stutter that slunk out when he
asked questions—he had an uncle with a quick hand—but
the stutter disappeared during the can discussions.
Desmond fingered Patrick, a houseman who’d beat him
for wetting his bed and made him drag his soiled mattress
to the laundry in the middle of the night. “That fucking
peckerwood—I’d like to see him puke up his guts.”
They were in the Cleveland rec room, after school let
out. No one else around. Occasionally cheers from one of
the sports fields wafted over. Who would you give it to?
Elwood suggested Duggin. No one knew that he and
Duggin had had a dustup. Duggin was a stout-backed white
man who stomped around with a sleepy, cow-eyed look. He
had a way of suddenly appearing in front of you, like a
puddle or a pothole, and you learned that his big meaty
hands were faster than you’d think, pincering shoulder
blades, noosing a skinny neck. The supervisor, Elwood told
them, had socked him in the stomach for talking to a white
student, a kid he’d met in the hospital. Fraternization
between the students of the two campuses was
discouraged. The boys nodded—“makes sense”—but they
all knew he really wanted to give it to Spencer. For his legs.
No one dared mention Spencer’s name anywhere near this
daydream or else they’d never have wasted a breath on it.
“I’d give it to Wainwright,” Turner said. He told them
how Wainwright had caught him smoking cigarettes, back
during his first term at Nickel. Knocked him upside the
head so hard it left a lump on his cheek. Wainwright was
pale-skinned, but all the black boys knew from his hair and
nose that he had some Negro blood. He beat the black boys
for knowing what he pretended not to know about himself.
“I was greener than you, El, back then.” No one had caught
him smoking since.
It was Jaimie’s turn. He said simply, “Earl,” and did not
elaborate.
Why?
“He knows.”
The days passed and they picked up the prank between
checkers and Ping-Pong. Different targets emerged when
they saw another student mistreated or suddenly
remembered some personal encounter, a reprimand, a box
on the ear. One name remained constant: Earl. Elwood
dropped Duggin from his rotation and threw in Earl one
day. Earl hadn’t beat Elwood the night they took him to the
White House, but he was not-Spencer, Spencer once
removed. Close enough.
It’s possible Elwood already knew the answer when he
asked, “What’s the Holiday Luncheon?”
The Holiday Luncheon was marked on the big calendar
in the dorm’s entrance hall. Desmond said it wasn’t for
them, it was for the staff. A nice meal in the dining hall to
celebrate another year of hard work on the north campus.
“And they get to raid the meat lockers for some prime
beef to give themselves,” Turner said. Boys volunteered for
the opportunity to rack up merits by serving as waiters.
Desmond said, “That would be a good time to do it.”
Saying it and not saying it.
Jaime, as ever, said, “Earl.”
Earl sometimes worked the south campus, sometimes
the north. Under most circumstances, they’d have heard
about the bad blood between Jaimie and the supervisor but
both of them spent time on the white half and who knew
what had passed between them down there. It could have
been Lovers’ Lane, some back talk, a frame-up by one of
the white boys. Earl was a regular at the drinking sessions
at the motor pool. When the motor-pool light was on at
night and you heard them carrying on, you prayed you
didn’t have a beating hanging over your head or that you’d
been picked for a date on Lovers’ Lane. It would end up
bad.
Strange medicine in an old green can. The boys gathered
the words and intonations of a justice spell. Justice or
revenge. No one wanted to admit it was a real plan they
cooked up all along. They kept returning to it as Christmas
approached, passing the idea between them so each
considered its heft and cast. As the prank evolved from
abstraction to something more solid, full of hows and
whens and what-ifs, Desmond, Turner, and Jaimie stopped
including Elwood without realizing it. The prank was
against his moral conscience. Hard to picture the Reverend
Martin Luther King Jr. dosing Governor Orval Faubus with
a couple of ounces of lye. And Elwood’s beating at the
White House had him scarred all over, not just his legs. It
had weeviled deep into his personality. The way his
shoulders sank when Spencer appeared, the flinch and
shrink. He could only stand so much talk of revenge before
the reality grabbed ahold of him.
Then it popped and the boys talked about it no more.
“They’d put us in the ground,” Desmond said, when Jaimie
sparked up another round of “who do we get.”
“We have to be careful,” Jaimie said.
“I’m going to play some basketball,” Desmond said, and
he was out.
Turner sighed. He had to admit that the game had
gotten boring. It was nice for a time to picture one of their
tormentors puking all over their yummy spread at the
Holiday Luncheon, spraying all those peckerwoods with his
mess. Shitting his pants, face gone strawberry-red from
pain, heaving until what came out wasn’t food but his own
dark blood. A pleasant vision, a different kind of medicine.
But they weren’t going to do it, and that fact spoiled it.
Turner stood, and Jaimie shook his head and joined them
for basketball.
Friday, the day of the Holiday Luncheon, the Community
Service crew was out on rounds. Harper, Turner, and
Elwood had just finished up with the five-and-ten when the
supervisor said he had something he had to do. “I’ll be back
in a hot minute,” he told them. “Y’all can wait here.”
The van disappeared. Turner and Elwood walked up the
scrabbly alley to the street. Harper had left them alone
before, when they were working on a board member’s
house. Never on Main Street. Even after two months of
back-alley exchanges, Elwood was incredulous. “We can
walk around?” he asked Turner.
“We don’t got to make a commotion, but yeah,” Turner
said, pretending it had happened before plenty of times.
Sightings of Nickel students on Main Street were not
uncommon. The students shuffled off the gray school buses
in their state-issued denim for community service—real
community service, not the special services of Turner and
Elwood’s assignments—cleaning up rubbish in the park
after July Fourth fireworks or the Founders Day parade.
Once a season the choir visited the Baptist church to show
off their beautiful voices as Director Hardee’s secretaries
handed out envelopes for donations. A boy might be found
in the company of a supervisor darting into town for
business. Two unescorted colored boys was a sight,
however. It was lunch hour. The white people of Eleanor
tried to account for them. The boys didn’t look shifty or
scared. Their supervisor was probably inside the hardware
store—Mr.  Bontemps hated niggers and had made them
wait outside. The white folks walked on. It wasn’t their
business.
Christmas toys—windup robots and air guns and painted
trains—filled the front window of the five-and-ten. The boys
knew to hide their enthusiasm over little-kid things that
still had an allure. They walked quickly past the bank. It
seemed like a place where board members might appear, or
at least white men with power who signed official
documents, like reform school orders.
“It’s weird being out here,” Elwood said.
“It’s okay,” Turner said.
“No one watching,” Elwood said.
The sidewalk was empty, a break in the noon traffic.
Turner looked around and smiled. He knew what Elwood
was thinking. “Most of them talk about running into the
swamp,” Turner said. “Wash their scent off so the dogs
can’t get them, then hide in there until the coast is clear
and hitch somewhere. West or north. That’s how they get
you, though, because that’s where everybody runs to. And
you can’t wash no scent off, that’s only in movies.”
“How would you do it?”
Turner had turned it over in his head many times but
had never shared it with anyone. “You head out here into
the free world, not the swamp. Snatch clothes from a
clothesline. Head south, not north, because they ain’t
expecting it. Those empty houses we pass on our
deliveries? Mr.  Tolliver’s house—he’s always down at the
capital for business. His house is empty. You raid them for
supplies and then put as many miles between you and the
dogs as you can, tire them out. The trick is not doing what
they know you going to do.” Then he remembered the most
important part. “And don’t take no one with you. Not one of
those dummies. They’ll take you down with them.”
They had ambled to the front of the pharmacy. Behind
the window, a blond woman crouched over a carriage and
spooned ice cream into her baby’s mouth. The little boy
was a mess, smeared with chocolate and bawling with
happiness.
“You got any money?” Turner said.
“More than you got,” Elwood said.
No money at all. They laughed because they knew the
drugstore didn’t serve colored patrons, and sometimes
laughter knocked out a few bricks from the barricade of
segregation, so tall and so wide. And they laughed because
ice cream was the last thing they wanted.
Elwood’s aversion was understandable; the visit to the
Ice Cream Factory had left its marks. Turner hated the stuff
on account of his aunt’s boyfriend, who moved in with them
when Turner was eleven years old. Mavis was his mother’s
sister and his only family. The state of Florida didn’t know
about her, thus the blank space on their forms where her
name should have been written, but he had lived with her
for a time. His father, Clarence, was a bit of a “rambler,”
not that he had to be told because he had the same
affliction. Turner remembered him as two big brown hands
and a raspy chuckle. When he heard autumn leaves
scuttling in the wind, he remembered that chuckle. The
same way Nickel boys remembered White House visits
when they heard the smart snap of leather, decades later.
Turner last saw his father when he was three years old.
After that, the man was the wind. His mother, Dorothy,
hung around longer, long enough for her to choke on her
own vomit. She had that taste—rotgut, the rougher the
better. The stuff she drank the night she died left her
twisted and blue and cold on the front-room sofa. He knew
where she was now—six feet under in St.  Sebastian
Cemetery—which was one thing he had on his upstanding
friend Elwood. Elwood’s mother and father had lit out West
and didn’t even send a postcard. What kind of mother
leaves her kid in the middle of the night? One that doesn’t
give a shit. He made a note to save that as a low blow if he
and Elwood ever got into a real fight. Turner knew his
mother loved him. She just loved liquor more.
His aunt Mavis took him in and made sure Turner had
nice clothes for school and three meals. The last Saturday
of every month she wore her good red dress and sprayed
perfume into her neck and went out with her girlfriends,
but apart from that her life was the hospital, where she
worked as a nurse, and Turner. No one had ever called her
pretty. She had tiny black eyes, an afterthought for a chin,
and when Ishmael started courting her, she fell quick. He
called her pretty and a lot of other things she’d never heard
before. Ishmael was a maintenance man at the Houston
airport and when he came by with flowers they almost hid
the industrial odor that permeated his skin no matter how
much he washed.
Ishmael was a man of secret menace who stored up
violence like a battery; Turner learned to recognize these
men from then on. How Mavis brightened at the thought of
him, singing ditties from the movie musicals she loved,
locking herself in the hall bathroom with a hot comb while
the transistor crackled. In and out of tune. It never
occurred to Turner why she wore sunglasses two weeks
straight that one time, why she stayed in her room some
mornings and didn’t emerge until past noon, limping with
soft moans.
The day after Turner put himself between Mavis and
Ishmael’s fists, Ishmael took him out for ice cream.
A. J. Smith’s, over on Market Street. “Bring this young man
the biggest sundae you got.” Every bite like a sock in the
mouth. He ate every miserable spoonful and ever since it
struck him that adults are always trying to buy off children
to make them forget their bad actions. Had the flavor of
that fact in his mouth when he ran from his aunt’s house
that last time.
Nickel served the students vanilla ice cream once a
month, and it made them so squealingly happy, like a bunch
of dumb piglets in a sty, that Turner wanted to knock
everyone flat. Third Wednesday of the month, Turner and
Elwood carried most of the north campus’s ice-cream
allotment through the back door of the Eleanor pharmacy.
Turner felt he was performing a service for his fellow
students, sparing them.
The blond lady pushed the carriage toward the door and
Elwood held the door open for her. She didn’t say a word.
Harper pulled up and waved them to the front seat. “You
boys up to no good?”
“Yes, sir,” Turner said. He whispered to Elwood, “Don’t
go stealing my plan, now, El. That shit’s pure gold.” They
got in the van.
When they drove past the administration building toward
the colored campus, the students stood in worried huddles
on the green. Harper slowed and called over one of the
white boys. “What’s happening?”
“They took Mr. Earl to the hospital. Something’s wrong
with him.”
Harper parked the van by the warehouse and ran to the
hospital. Elwood and Turner hustled to Cleveland. Elwood
scanning every which way like a squirrel and Turner trying
to maintain a front, which made him move like a space
robot. They needed a report. Despite the segregated
campuses, the black boys and white boys passed on news
for safety’s sake. Sometimes Nickel was like being back
home, where the older brother or sister that you hated
warned you about a parent’s black mood or daylong
drinking jag so you could make preparations.
They found Desmond outside the colored dining hall.
Turner looked inside. The staff table was still set in the
aftermath. Half set—the overturned chairs pointed to a
fuss, and the smear of blood showed where they’d dragged
out Earl.
“I don’t think it was medicine,” Desmond said. His deep
voice added a baleful tone.
Turner punched him in the shoulder. “You’re going to get
us killed!”
“It wasn’t me! It wasn’t me!” Desmond said. He looked
over Turner’s shoulder toward the White House.
Elwood’s hand covered his mouth. There was a half of a
work-shoe footprint in the blood. He snapped to and turned
downhill. To see if they were coming for them. “Where’s
Jaimie?”
“That nigger,” Desmond said.
They strategized on the dining-hall steps. Turner
suggested that they hang out and gather information on
Earl’s condition from the other students. He didn’t say he
wanted to stay there because it was a straight shot to the
road bordering the east side of campus. If Spencer came up
with a posse, he’d be out lickety-split. Can’t catch me, I’m
the Gingerbread Man.
Jaimie showed up an hour later, looking rumpled and a
bit dazed, like he’d just had a turn on a Tilt-A-Whirl. He
completed the story they’d got from the other boys. The
Holiday Luncheon commenced as it always did. The special
tablecloth that only got aired out once a year covered the
staff table, the nice dishes were wiped of dust. The
supervisors took their places and drank beer, sharing
rowdy stories and off-color speculation about the bustier
secretaries and teachers. It was loud and they enjoyed
themselves. A few minutes into the meal, Earl bolted up
and grabbed his stomach. They thought he was choking.
Then he commenced to disperse his insides in a spray.
When the blood appeared they carried him down the hill to
the hospital.
Jaimie told them that he waited among the boys outside
the ward until the ambulance took him away.
“You’re crazy,” Elwood said.
“I didn’t do it,” Jaimie said. His face was blank. “I was
playing football. Everybody saw me.”
“The can is gone from my locker,” Desmond said.
“I told you I didn’t take it,” Jaimie said. “Maybe someone
robbed your shit and they did it.” He knocked Desmond’s
shoulder. “You said it was horse medicine!”
“That’s what he told me,” Desmond said. “You saw it—it
had a horse on it.”
“Could have been a goat,” Turner said.
“Maybe it was horse poison,” Elwood said.
“Or goat poison,” Turner added.
“They ain’t rats, dummy,” Desmond said. “You shoot
horses, not poison them.”
“He’s lucky he ain’t dead then,” Jaimie said. Elwood and
Desmond continued to press him, but his version did not
change.
It was hard to miss the smile that tugged at Jaimie’s
mouth from time to time. Turner wasn’t angry that Jaimie
lied to their faces. He admired liars who kept on lying even
though their lies were obvious, but there was nothing
anyone could do about it. Another proof of one’s
powerlessness before other people. Jaimie wasn’t going to
admit it, so Turner just watched the boys and the activity
down the hill.
Earl didn’t die. He didn’t come back to work, either.
Doctor’s orders. They’d hear about that in the coming days.
And a few weeks after that, they’d discover that Earl’s
replacement, a tall man named Hennepin, was made of
meaner stuff, and he’d subject many a boy to his cruel
whims. But they made it through that first evening without
being strung up, and when word came that Dr.  Cooke
blamed Earl’s fit on his constitution—he had a family
history, it seemed—Turner stopped strategizing his escape.
Just before lights-out, he and Elwood were hanging out
by the big oak in front of the dormitory. The campus had
quieted. Turner wanted a cigarette, but his pack was back
in the warehouse loft. He whistled instead, that Elvis song
Harper kept singing on their runs.
The night bugs started up in a wave. “Earl,” Turner said.
“That’s some shit.”
“Wish I’d been there to see it, though,” Elwood said.
“Ha.”
“I wish it had been Spencer,” Elwood said. “That would
have been nice.” His palm went to the back of his thigh, to
the spot he rubbed when he remembered.
They heard a whoop. Down the hill, the supervisors had
turned on the Christmas lights and the boys got a look at
the results of all the hard work of the last few weeks.
Green, red, and white bulbs sketched a route of holiday
cheer along the trees and the south-campus buildings. Far
off in the dark, the big Santa at the entrance glowed from
the inside with a demonic fire.
“Those are some lights,” Turner said.
Past the White House, blinking lights outlined the old
water tower—one of the white kids had fallen from the
ladder while nailing them up and had broken his
collarbone. The lights floated on the X’s of the wooden
struts, circled the huge tank, sketched the triangular peak.
Like a spaceship taking off. It reminded Turner of
something, then it came to him—that amusement park, Fun
Town, from the TV commercials. That dumb, happy music,
the bumper cars and the roller coaster, and the Atomic
Rocket. The other boys talked about the place from time to
time, they’d go there when they were out in the free world
again. Turner thought that was stupid. They didn’t let
colored people in those nice places. But there it was before
him, pointed at the stars, decked in a hundred flickering
lights, waiting for takeoff: a rocket. Launched in darkness
toward another dark planet they couldn’t see.
“It looks nice,” Turner said.
“We did a good job,” Elwood said.
OceanofPDF.com
PART
Three
OceanofPDF.com
“E
CHAPTER ELEVEN
lwood?”
He grunted in response from the
living room, where the window kept
a sliver of Broadway below: Sammy’s Shoe Repair, the
closed-down travel agency, and the median that ran up the
avenue. The angle of his vision made a trapezoid, his
personal snow globe of the city. It was a good place to
smoke and he’d found a way to perch on the sill that didn’t
aggravate his back.
“I’m going out for a bag of ice, I can’t take it anymore,”
Denise said, and locked the front door behind her. He had
given her a set of keys last week.
He didn’t mind the heat. This city knew how to concoct a
miserable summer, sure, but it had nothing on the South on
those hot days. The way New Yorkers complained about
summer heat, on the subway, in the bodega, made him
snicker ever since he got here. There was a garbage strike
then, too, his first day in the city, but it had been February.
It didn’t smell as bad. This time whenever he left the
vestibule downstairs, the stench was a thicket—he wanted
a machete to hack through it. It was only the second day of
the strike.
The wildcat strike of ’68: an introduction to the city so
wretched that he had to interpret it as a hazing. Steel trash
cans mobbed the pavement—overflowing and untouched
for days—and the newer garbage in bundled bags and
cardboard boxes huddled against them. He avoided public
transportation in a new place until he got the lay of it and
he’d never been on a subway before. He walked all the way
uptown from the Port Authority. Walking in a straight line
was impossible. He weaved around the mounds of refuse.
When he got to the Statler, the SRO on Ninety-Ninth Street,
the residents had kicked open a path to the front door
between two monstrous piles of garbage. Rats zipped back
and forth. If you wanted to break into one of the secondfloor rooms, all you had to do was scale the trash.
The manager gave him a key to a place in the back, four
flights up. Hot plate, with a bathroom down the hall. One of
the guys he worked with in Baltimore told him about the
flophouse and painted a terrible picture. It wasn’t as bad as
the guy made it out. He’d stayed in worse places. After a
couple of days, he bought cleanser at the A&P and took it
on himself to clean the toilet and shower. No one else
bothered—that kind of joint. He’d scrubbed dirty johns
plenty of times, plenty of places.
On his knees in the stink. Welcome to New York.
Down on Broadway, Denise crossed his perch view. Seen
from street level, the median was clean most days. From
the third floor you peered over the benches and trees and
saw the trash crowding the subway ventilation grates and
paving stones. Paper bags and beer bottles and tabloids.
Now the crap was everywhere, in drifts. With the latest
strike under way, everybody saw what he saw all the time:
The city was a mess.
He stubbed out his smoke in the teacup and made it to
the couch without hitting one of those gongs. Ever since he
put his back out, he’d feel all right and forget and move too
fast and then gong—a detonation in his spine. Gong while
sitting on the toilet, gong while picking up his pants. He
yelped like a dog and then curled on the floor for a few
minutes. The bathroom tile cool on his skin. It was his own
fault. You never knew what was in those drawers and
boxes. One time when they were moving this old Ukrainian
guy—a cop who got his pension and picked up stakes to
Philadelphia where he had a niece—he bent down to lift a
night table and his spine popped. Larry said he heard it
from the hallway. The cop kept his free weights in there.
Three hundred pounds of weights, in case he got the urge
to lift in the middle of the night. What put his back out last
week was a big wooden bureau, harmless-looking, but he’d
been working extra shifts for money. Sleepy and sloppy.
“You got to watch it with that Danish modern shit,” Larry
told him. When Denise returned he’d ask her to fill another
hot-water bottle, long as she was going to be in the kitchen
fixing more rum and Cokes.
The block was loud most nights with salsa music and it
was louder this evening, what with everyone keeping their
windows open because of the heat, plus tomorrow was July
Fourth. Everyone had off. If his back wasn’t too
troublesome, they were going to Coney Island for the
fireworks, but tonight they would stay in and watch The
Defiant Ones on channel 4. Sidney Poitier and Tony Curtis,
two convicts chained together on the run through the
swamp, dodging hunting dogs and dumb-faced deputies
with shotguns. Phony Hollywood crap, but he always
watched the movie when it came on, usually on The Late
Late Show, and Denise liked Sidney Poitier.
His rooms were furnished with castoffs from work. A
kind of showroom for the furniture of New Yorkers from all
over the city, in rotation, new stuff coming in and old stuff
going out. His queen-size bed with the type of super-stiff
mattress he liked, the dresser with the fancy brass studs,
all the lamps and rugs. People get rid of plenty when they
move—sometimes they’re changing not just places but
personalities. Up or down “the economic ladder.” Maybe
the bed won’t fit in the new place, or the sofa’s too boxy, or
they’re newlyweds and put a new living-room set on their
registry. A lot of these white-flight families splitting for the
suburbs, Long Island and Westchester, they’re making a
whole new start—shaking the city off, and that means
getting rid of how they used to see themselves. Him and
the rest of the crew from Horizon Moving had dibs before
the junkman got his hands on it. The couch he lay on now
was his twelfth in seven years. Constantly upgrading. One
of the perks of working for a moving company, though it
was hell on your back sometimes.
Even if he scavenged furniture like a transient, he put
down roots. After his childhood home, this was the place
he’d lived the longest. He started this New York stint at the
SRO, stayed there a few months until he got the job at 4
Brothers washing dishes. He moved around a bunch—
uptown, Spanish Harlem—until he got a line on the job at
Horizon, steady work, and humped it down here to EightySecond Street off Broadway. He knew he was going to take
the apartment when the landlord threw the door wide:
here. Four years and counting. “I’m middle class now,” he
joked to himself. Even the roaches were of a noble sort,
scurrying when he turned on the bathroom light instead of
ignoring his presence. He took their modesty as a touch of
class.
Denise returned. “Did you hear me outside?” She went
into the kitchen and stabbed the bag of ice with a butter
knife.
“What?”
“This rat ran across my feet and I screamed. That was
me,” she said.
Denise was tall and Harlem-tough and could’ve played
basketball in one of the lady leagues. One of these city girls
who wasn’t afraid of anything. He’d seen her curse out this
muscle-bound turkey who whispered something untoward
as she passed on the street, she got up in the dude’s face,
but a rat made her squeal like a little girl. Denise was most
definitely not a little girl, so when she let out that part of
her it was always a surprise. She lived on 126th next to a
vacant lot and the heat and now the garbage made the
empty lot livelier than usual. The bastards were
everywhere, bursting out of their underground hidey-holes.
She said she saw a rat as big as a dog last night. “Barked
like one, too.” He opined that maybe it was a dog, but she
wasn’t going back today and he was glad to have her.
Her Wednesday-night classes were canceled because of
the Fourth. He was off, too, that afternoon, sleeping when
she came over and got into bed with him. Her big silver
earrings on the bedside table—courtesy of the Atkinson
family, Turtle Bay to York Avenue, three kids and a dog and
a Gimbels dining-room set—woke him up. By now she knew
the spot on his back where it hurt and kneaded it and then
told him to roll over and got on top. The room was ten
degrees hotter when they were done and well tangled up in
each other. Warm rum and Cokes worked for a while and
then they didn’t and an ice run was in order.
They met at the high school up on 131st Street. At night
there were adult classes. He was working on his GED and
she taught ESL to Dominicans and Poles in the classroom
next door. He waited to finish the course before he asked
her out. Earned his certificate and feeling proud and it was
one of those moments that makes you realize you have no
one in your life who cares about the occasional triumph.
He’d had the thought of getting his GED in the back of his
mind for a while. Tended to it like it was a candle flame
cupped in his hand out of the wind. He kept seeing the ads
on the subway—Complete Your Studies at Night on Your
Own Terms—and was so happy to get that piece of paper
that he said, Fuck it, and walked right up to her. Big brown
eyes and a bridge of freckles over her nose. On His Own
Terms. He hardly ever did it any other way.
Asked her out and she said no. She was seeing someone.
Then a month later she called him up and they went out for
Cuban Chinese.
Denise brought over the rum and Cokes with ice. “And I
got us some sandwiches,” she said.
He set up the TV tray, which had been left behind by
Mr.  Waters when he picked up stakes from Amsterdam
Avenue to Arthur Avenue in the Bronx. It folded up so that
it fit neat between the couch and the end table, like that.
Nobel Prize in Physics to the guy who invented it.
“They need to get off their asses and pick it all up,”
Denise said from the kitchen. “Beame has to pick up the
phone and talk to these people.”
She thought the mayor was a bum and relished the
strike for its opportunity of complaint. She listed her gripes
as he wrangled the rabbit ears to the best place for channel
4. The smell, she said, for one—of the rotting food and the
bleach the supers sprayed on top of it. The bleach was for
the flies that swarmed over the piles of trash in a gross
haze and for the maggots twisting on the pavement. Then
there was the smoke. People lit the garbage on fire to get
rid of it—he didn’t understand this, and he considered
himself a student of the human animal—and the limp
breezes between the buildings carried the smoke all over.
The fire engines screamed as they scattered across the city
on the avenues and side streets.
That, plus the rats.
He sighed. In every argument he took whatever side
stuck it to the Man, rule one. Cops and politicians, fat-cat
businessmen and judges, the assorted motherfuckers
working levers. “They got ’em by the balls, they should
twist,” he said. “They’re working men.” Mayor Beame,
Nixon and his bullshit, it was almost enough to make him
want to vote. But he avoided the government whenever
possible so as not to push his little bit of luck.
“Why don’t you sit down, baby,” he said. “I’ll get it
together.”
“I already did it all.” Even put the kettle on for his hotwater bottle. It whistled.
Trash-fire smoke snuck in through the window so he
opened the one in the bedroom for cross ventilation. She
was right. It’d be a true hassle if this strike went as long as
the last one. It was terrible out there. But it was good for
the rest of the city to see what kind of place they were
really living in.
Try his perspective for a change. See how they liked it.
The news anchor offered the holiday weather and gave a
brief update on the strike—“talks continue”—and told the
viewers to stay tuned for the Nine O’Clock Movie.
He tapped her glass with his. “You’re married to me,
now—here’s the ring.”
“What?”
“From the movie. Sidney Poitier says it.” Holding up the
chains that bind him to the redneck.
“You should watch what you say.”
Sure, the dialogue changed depending on who was
saying it and who you said it to. Like the ending of the
movie. On the one hand, neither convict made it out. Or you
look at it the other way and each of them could’ve made it
to freedom if they’d let the other one die. Maybe it didn’t
matter—they were fucked either way. He stopped watching
the movie a few years later when he realized he didn’t
watch it because it was sort of corny, or they got the facts
wrong, or it marked how far he had come, but because
watching it made him sad, and a nutjob part of him sought
out that sadness. At a certain point he learned the smarter
play was to avoid the things that brought you low.
That night, though, he didn’t see the end of the movie
because Denise wore a denim skirt and her big thighs
sticking out distracted him too much. He reached over
when that antacid commercial came on.
The Defiant Ones, then sex, then sleep. Fire engines in
the night. Tomorrow morning he had to get up and out,
back pain or no, because at ten he was going to meet the
man and buy the van. He had a roll of bills tucked in his
boot under his bed and he’d miss the satisfaction of adding
twenty bucks to it on payday. Tore down the flier in the
laundromat so no one else could beat him to it: a ’67 Ford
Econoline. Needed a new finish, glossy, but the guys on
125th owed him one. And then he’d supplement his Horizon
shifts with his own jobs. Weekends, too, bring on Larry so
he can pay off his old lady. You couldn’t count on the
Department of Sanitation, but Larry bellyaching about his
child support was as dependable as U.S. Steel.
He decided to call his company Ace Moving. AAA was
taken and he wanted to be at the top of the phone book. It
was six months before he realized he picked the name from
his time at Nickel. Ace: out in the free world to make your
zigzag way.
OceanofPDF.com
T
CHAPTER TWELVE
here were four ways out of Nickel.
One: Serve your time. A typical
sentence fell between six months and two
years, but the administration had the power to confer a
legal discharge before then at its discretion. Good behavior
was a trigger for a legal discharge, if a careful boy
gathered enough merits for promotion to Ace. Whereupon
he was released into the bosom of his family, who were very
glad to have him back or else winced at the sight of his face
bobbing up the walk, the start of another countdown to the
next calamity. If you had family. If not, the state of Florida’s
child-welfare apparatus had assorted custodial remedies,
some more pleasant than others.
You could also serve time by aging out. The school
showed boys the door on their eighteenth birthday, quick
handshake and pocket change. Free to return home or to
make their way in the indifferent world, likely shunted
down one of life’s more difficult trails. Boys arrived banged
up in different ways before they got to Nickel and picked
up more dents and damage during their term. Often graver
missteps and more fierce institutions waited. Nickel boys
were fucked before, during, and after their time at the
school, if one were to characterize the general trajectory.
Two: The court might intervene. That magic event. A
long-lost aunt or older cousin materialized to relieve the
state of your wardship. The lawyer retained by dear mom,
if she had the means, argued mercy on account of changed
circumstance: Now that his father’s gone, we need a
breadwinner in the house. Perhaps the judge in charge—a
new one or the same sourpuss—stepped in for his own
reasons. Like, money changed hands. But if there had been
bribe money, the boy wouldn’t have been cast into Nickel in
the first place. Still, the law was corrupt and capricious in
various measure and sometimes a boy strolled out through
what passed for divine intervention.
Three: You could die. Of “natural causes” even, if
abetted by unhealthy conditions, malnutrition, and the
pitiless constellation of negligence. In the summer of 1945,
one young boy died of heart failure while locked in a
sweatbox, a popular corrective at that time, and the
medical examiner called it natural causes. Imagine baking
in one of those iron boxes until your body gave out, wrung.
Influenza, tuberculosis, and pneumonia killed their share,
as did accidents, drownings, and falls. The fire of 1921
claimed twenty-three lives. Half the dormitory exits were
bolted shut and the two boys in the dark third-floor cells
were prevented from escaping.
The dead boys were put in the dirt of Boot Hill or
released into the care of their family. Some deaths were
more nefarious than others. Check the school records,
incomplete as they may be. Blunt trauma, shotgun blast. In
the first half of the twentieth century, boys who had been
leased out to local families wound up dead sometimes.
Students were killed while on “unauthorized leave.” Two
boys were run over by trucks. These deaths were never
investigated. The archaeologists at the University of South
Florida noticed that the death rates of those who attempted
multiple escapes were higher than those who did not. One
speculates. As for the unmarked graveyard, it kept its
secrets close.
Fourth: Finally, you could run. Make a run for it and see
what happened.
Some boys escaped into silent futures under different
names in different places, living in shadow. Dreading for
the rest of their lives the day Nickel caught up with them.
Most often runners were captured, taken for a tour of the
Ice Cream Factory, and then ushered into a dark cell for a
couple of weeks of attitude adjustment. It was crazy to run
and crazy not to run. How could a boy look past the
school’s property line, see that free and living world
beyond, and not contemplate a dash to freedom? To write
one’s own story for once. To forbid the thought of escape,
even that slightest butterfly thought of escape, was to
murder one’s humanity.
One famous Nickel escapee was Clayton Smith. His story
wending its way through the years. The supervisors and
housemen made sure of its longevity.
It was 1952. Clayton was not the most likely runaway.
Not bright or hale, defiant or spirited. He simply lacked the
will to endure. Ground down plenty before he stepped on
campus, but Nickel magnified and refined the cruelty of the
world, opening his eyes to the bleaker wavelengths. If he’d
suffered all this in his fifteen years, what more lay in store?
The men in Clayton’s family shared a strong family
resemblance. Neighborhood folks recognized them
immediately from their hawkish profiles, light brown eyes,
the flittering way they moved their hands and mouths when
they talked. The similarities persisted beneath the skin, for
Smith men were neither lucky nor long-lived. With Clayton
there was no mistaking the resemblance.
Clayton’s daddy had a heart attack when the boy was
four years old. His hand a claw on the bedsheets, mouth
wide, eyes wide. At ten, Clayton left school to work in the
Manchester orange groves, following his three brothers
and two sisters. The baby of the family, pitching in. His
mama’s health failed after a bout of pneumonia and the
state of Florida assumed guardianship. Scattered the
children. In Tampa, they still called Nickel the Florida
Industrial School for Boys. It had a reputation for
improving a young man’s character, whether he was a bad
seed or simply had no other place to go. His older sisters
wrote him letters that his fellow students read to him. His
brothers went this way and that, swept up.
Clayton had never learned to fight, not with older
siblings around to cow the bullies. At Nickel he fared poorly
in the skirmishes. The only time he felt good and level was
when he worked in the kitchen, peeling potatoes. It was
quiet then and he had a system. The house father of
Roosevelt at that time was named Freddie Rich, and his
employment history was a map of helpless children. Mark
G. Giddins House, the Gardenville School for Young Men,
St.  Vincent Orphanage over in Clearwater. The Nickel
Academy for Boys. Freddie Rich identified candidates by
their gait and posture, administration files strengthened
the argument, and their treatment by the other boys
provided final confirmation. He made quick work of young
Clayton, his fingers finding two vertebrae that told the boy,
Now.
Freddie Rich’s quarters were up on Roosevelt’s third
floor, but he preferred to take his prey to the basement of
the white schoolhouse in keeping with Nickel tradition.
After that last trip to Lovers’ Lane, Clayton was done. The
two supervisors who caught him crossing campus that
night were accustomed to seeing the boy walking back to
the dormitory unescorted. They let him pass. He had a head
start.
The boy’s plan involved his sister Bell, who’d landed at a
home for girls on the outskirts of Gainesville. In contrast
with the rest of the family, she enjoyed improved
circumstances. The people who ran the home were a kindly
sort, enlightened when it came to racial matters. No more
corn mash and frayed dresses. She was back in school and
only worked on weekends, when she and the other girls
took in mending. When she was old enough, she wrote
Clayton, she’d come for him and they’d be together again.
Bell had dressed and bathed him when he was little and all
notions of comfort in his life were an allusion to those early,
half-remembered days. The night of his escape he got to
the rim of the swamp, where common sense told him to
enter the dark water, but he couldn’t bring himself to do it.
Too forbidding, between the phantoms, murk, and animal
symphony of sex and aggression. The dark had always
terrified Clayton and only Bell knew the songs that soothed
him, cradling his head in her lap as he wound her braids in
his fingers. He headed east to the edges of the lime fields
until he got to Jordan Road.
He crept in the woods along the road through first light
and into the afternoon. Every car sent him into the burrs
and underbrush. When he couldn’t take another step he hid
under a lonesome gray house and squatted in the fetid
water of the crawl space. Bugs made supper of him and he
caressed the bumps on his skin to see how much he could
soothe them without scratching open the bites. The family
returned home, a mother and father and teenage girl whom
he only saw the feet and knees of. The girl was pregnant,
he learned, and this had upturned the order. Or the house
had always been a storm and this was the same weather.
He slithered forth when the bickering stopped and they
slept.
The side of the road was gloomy and fearsome and the
boy had no idea about the direction of his travel, but he
was unconcerned. Long as he didn’t hear hunting dogs, he
was okay. As it happened, the Apalachee hounds were
deployed elsewhere, attending to the escape of three
Piedmont convicts, and Freddie Rich didn’t report Clayton’s
disappearance for twenty-four hours, scared as a trapped
rat that his predations would be uncovered. He’d been
dismissed from previous jobs and he liked the easy bounty
of his latest post.
Had Clayton ever been alone? In the house on that deadend street in Tampa, his brothers and sisters were ever on
top of him, all of them crammed into the three rooms of the
rickety shotgun. Then Nickel with its communal
debasements. He wasn’t accustomed to so much time with
the knocking of his thoughts, which rattled around his skull
like dice. He hadn’t thought of a future beyond a reunion
with his family. On the third day, he concocted a scenario—
a couple of years as a cook, then saving up for his own
restaurant.
Soon after Clayton started picking at the orange groves,
Chet’s Drive-In opened up on a broken stretch of county
road. He looked through the slats of the truck on the way to
work, waiting for that red, white, and blue explosion of the
restaurant’s facade and steel canopy. They hung the
banners, the signs sprouted along the road to tease, and
then it opened: Chet’s. The young white waiters and
waitresses wore smart green-and-white striped jumpsuits
and smiled as they ferried burgers and shakes out to the
lot. The slick jumpsuits encoded virtues—industry, selfreliance. Those fancy cars and the hands sticking out to
receive. It was inspiring.
True, Clayton had never eaten in a restaurant and overesteemed the grandeur of the joint. And perhaps his hunger
nourished the idea of owning a dining establishment. As he
ran, the vision of his restaurant—walking among the
customers to ask how they enjoyed the meal, checking the
day’s receipts in the back office like he’d seen in movies—
kept pace with him.
On the fourth day he was far enough that he decided to
hitch. His Nickel dungarees and work shirt were a sight.
He swiped work clothes from a clothesline after he saw a
battered pickup grind away from a big white farmhouse. He
cased the house for a spell and snatched overalls and a
shirt when he thought it was safe. An old woman on the
second floor watched him lope out of the woods and grab
them. The work clothes had been her late husband’s and
repurposed by her grandson. She was glad to watch them
go because it pained her to see them on another person,
especially her son’s boy, who was cruel to animals and a
blasphemer.
He didn’t care where his ride was headed as long as it
took him a couple of hours’ distance. Clayton was starving.
He’d never gone this long without eating and didn’t know
how to remedy that, but miles were the most important
thing. Not many cars passed and the white faces scared
him, even if he was bold enough to take to the asphalt.
There were no Negro drivers; maybe Negroes didn’t own
cars in this part of the state. He finally forced himself to
stick out his thumb when a white Packard with midnight
blue trim rounded the bend. He couldn’t see the driver but
Packards were the first cars he learned to recognize and he
had a fondness for them.
The driver was a middle-aged white man in a creamcolored suit. Of course it was a white man, how could it be
otherwise in that car? He wore his blond hair parted and
had silver squares of hair at the temples. His eyes changed
from blue to ice-white behind his wire-frame eyeglasses,
depending on the sun.
The man looked Clayton up and down. He beckoned the
boy inside. “Where you headed, boy?”
Clayton said the first thing that popped into his head:
“Richards.” The name of the street he grew up on.
“I don’t know it,” the white man said. He mentioned a
town Clayton had never heard of and said that he’d take
him as far as he was going.
Clayton had never been in a Packard before. He rubbed
the fabric next to his right thigh, where the man couldn’t
see: It was rippled and yielding. He wondered after the
maze of pistons and valves under the hood, what it’d be like
to see how the good men at the plant had put it together.
“You live there, boy?” the man asked. “Richards?” He
sounded educated.
“Yes, sir. With my mama and daddy.”
“Okay,” the man said. “What’s your name, boy?”
“Harry,” Clayton said.
“You can call me Mr. Simmons.” Nodding as if they had
an understanding.
They drove for a while. Clayton wasn’t going to speak
unless spoken to and kept his lips squished to keep
something stupid from flying out. Now that it wasn’t his
two dumb feet moving him, he got agitated and scanned for
police cars. Rebuked himself for not staying out of sight
longer. He pictured Freddie Rich at the head of the posse,
holding a flashlight, the sun gleaming off the big buffalo
belt buckle Clayton knew so well—the sight of it, the clatter
of it on the concrete floor. The houses got closer together
and the Packard eased through a short main street, the boy
sinking in his seat but trying not to let the man notice.
Then they were on a quiet road once more.
“How old are you?” Mr.  Simmons asked. They had just
passed a closed-down Esso station, the pumps rusted to
scarecrows, and a white church next to a small graveyard.
The ground had settled, sending the tombstones off-kilter
so that the graveyard was a mouthful of rotten teeth.
“Fifteen,” Clayton said. He realized who the man
reminded him of—Mr.  Lewis, their old landlord. Best pay
him on the first of the month or you’re out on the street on
the second. He got a queasy feeling. The boy made a fist.
He knew what he’d do if the man put his hand on his leg or
tried to touch his thing. He’d vowed to sock Freddie Rich in
the face many times and then stood paralyzed when the
time came, but this day he felt he could actually do it.
Drawing strength from the free world.
“You in school, boy?”
“Yes, sir.” It was a Tuesday, he was pretty sure. He
counted back. Freddie Rich liked to look him up Saturday
nights. Cheaper than a dime-a-dance and you get more for
your money.
“An education is important,” Mr. Simmons said. “It opens
doors. Especially for your people.” The moment passed.
Clayton spread his fingers on the upholstery as if palming a
basketball.
How many days before he got to Gainesville? He
remembered the name of Bell’s home—Miss Mary’s—but
he’d have to ask around. What kind of city was Gainesville?
There was a lot of this plan he had to figure out before he
set things up for himself. Bell would devise secret signals
and places to meet that only she knew about. She was
smart that way. It’d be a long time before she tucked him in
again and told him the things that made it all fine, but he
could wait it out if she was close. “Hush now, Clayton…”
That’s what he was thinking when the Packard rolled
past the stone columns at the foot of the Nickel driveway.
Mr. Simmons had just retired as the mayor of Eleanor, but
he remained a member of the board and kept abreast of the
life of the school. Three white students on the way to the
metal shop saw Clayton get out of the car but didn’t know
that he was the boy who ran away, and at midnight the fan
bellowed its news to the half asleep but that didn’t tell
them who was getting ice cream, and in those days the
boys didn’t know that cars heading out to the school dump
in the middle of the night meant that the secret graveyard
had welcomed a new resident. It took Freddie Rich to bring
Clayton Smith’s story to the student population, when he
gave it to his latest boy as an object lesson.
You could run and hope to get away. Some made it. Most
didn’t.
There was a fifth way out of Nickel, according to Elwood.
He cooked it up after his grandmother came on visiting day.
It was a warm February afternoon, and the families
gathered at the picnic tables outside the dining hall. Some
boys were local and their mothers and fathers appeared
every weekend with sacks of food, new socks, and news
from the neighborhood. But the students came from all
over the state, Pensacola to the Keys, and most families had
far to travel if they wanted to see their wayward sons. Long
trips on stuffy buses, warm juice and sandwich crumbs
tumbling from wax paper onto laps. Work intervened,
distance made visits impossible, and there were some boys
who understood that their families had washed their hands
of them. On visiting day, after services, the housemen
informed the boys whether or not anyone was coming up
the hill, and if no one was coming, the boys busied
themselves on the playing fields, or found distraction in the
tables of the woodshop or in the swimming pool—white
kids in the morning, colored kids in the afternoon—and
averted their eyes from the reunions up the hill.
Harriet made the trip to Eleanor twice a month but had
missed her last visit because of sickness. She sent a letter
telling Elwood it was a chest cold and included some
newspaper articles she thought he’d like, an account of a
Martin Luther King speech in Newark, New Jersey, and a
big color spread on the space race. She looked years older,
walking slowly toward him. Her illness had stolen from her
already slight frame, her collarbones tracing a line across
her green dress. When she spotted Elwood, she halted and
let him come close for an embrace. It bought her a moment
of rest before the final steps to the picnic table he’d staked
out.
Elwood held her longer than usual, nuzzling into her
shoulder. Then he remembered the other boys and
withdrew. Best not to show too much of himself. It had been
a long wait for her return, and not just because she had
promised some good news the next time she came from
Tallahassee.
His life at Nickel had slowed to an obedient shuffle. The
period after New Year’s was unremarkable. The Eleanor
deliveries cycled through the regulars a few times, and
Elwood knew what to expect at each stop, even reminding
Harper more than once that this Wednesday was the Top
Shop and the restaurant beat, like he’d helped out
Mr.  Marconi back in the tobacco shop. The dormitories
were quieter than they’d been through the fall. Fistfights
and scuffles were rare and the White House remained
unoccupied. Once it was clear that Earl wasn’t going to
kick the bucket, Elwood and Turner and Desmond forgave
Jaimie. Most afternoons they played Monopoly, their game
a conspiracy of house rules, obscure covenants, and
revenge. Buttons replaced the lost tokens.
The more routine his days, the more unruly his nights.
He woke after midnight, when the dormitory was dead,
starting at imagined sounds—footsteps at the threshold,
leather slapping the ceiling. He squinted at the darkness—
nothing. Then he was up for hours, in a spell, agitated by
rickety thoughts and weakened by an ebbing of the spirit. It
wasn’t Spencer that undid him, or a supervisor or a new
antagonist slumbering in room 2, rather it was that he’d
stopped fighting. In keeping his head down, in his careful
navigation so that he made it to lights-out without mishap,
he fooled himself that he had prevailed. That he had
outwitted Nickel because he got along and kept out of
trouble. In fact he had been ruined. He was like one of
those Negroes Dr. King spoke of in his letter from jail, so
complacent and sleepy after years of oppression that they
had adjusted to it and learned to sleep in it as their only
bed.
In less kind moments, he had counted Harriet among
their number. Now she looked the part, diminished as much
as he was. A wind easing after blustering for as long as you
could remember.
“Can we squeeze in with y’all?”
Burt, another boy from Cleveland, one of the chucks,
wanted to share the picnic table. Burt’s mother thanked
them and smiled. She was young, maybe twenty-five years
old, with a round, open face. Harried yet graceful as she
juggled Burt’s baby sister, who squatted in her lap hooting
at the bugs. Their goofing and play distracted Elwood as
his grandmother spoke. They were loud and happy—
Elwood and his grandmother were church-quiet beside
them. Burt was a rambunctious kid but sweet-hearted from
what Elwood had seen. He didn’t know the boy well, or his
troubles, but he might straighten up and fly right when he
got out. His mother waited for him in the free world and
that was mighty. More than most of the boys had.
Elwood’s grandmother might not be there when he got
out. This had never occurred to him before. She was rarely
sick, and when she was, she refused to stay off her feet.
She was a survivor but the world took her in bites. Her
husband had died young, her daughter had vanished out
West, and now her only grandson had been sentenced to
this place. She had swallowed the portion of misery the
world had given to her, and now there she was, alone on
Brevard Street, her family tugged away one by one. She
might not be there.
Elwood knew she had bad news because she kept on
longer than usual about the goings-on around their corner
of Frenchtown. Clarice Jenkins’s daughter got into
Spelman, Tyrone James was smoking in bed and burned his
house down, a new hat store opened up on Macomb. She
threw him a bone about the movement: “Lyndon Johnson’s
carrying on President Kennedy’s civil rights bill. Bringing it
to Congress. And if that good old boy is doing right, you
know things is changing. Be a whole different thing when
you come home, Elwood.”
“Your thumb’s dirty,” Burt said, “take it out of your
mouth. Here’s mine instead.” He stuck it at his sister and
she grimaced and giggled.
Elwood reached across the table and grabbed Harriet’s
hands. He’d never touched her like that before, as if
reassuring a child. “Grandma, what is it?”
Most visitors wept on visiting day at some point, at the
sight of the Nickel turnoff coming up the road, on
departure, with their backs to their sons. Burt’s mother
handed his grandmother a handkerchief. She turned away
to wipe her eyes.
Harriet’s fingers trembled; he stilled them.
The lawyer was gone, she said. Mr.  Andrews, the nice,
polite white lawyer who’d been so optimistic about
Elwood’s appeal, had picked up stakes to Atlanta without a
word. And taken two hundred dollars of their money with
him. Mr.  Marconi had kicked in another hundred after
meeting with him, which was out of character, yes, but
Mr. Andrews had been adamant and persuasive. What they
had on their hands was a classic miscarriage of justice. The
lawyer’s office was empty when she took the bus downtown
to see him, she said. The landlord was showing the office to
a prospective renter, a dentist. They looked at her like she
was nothing.
“I let you down, El,” she said.
“I’m okay,” he said. “I just made Explorer.” He kept his
head down and was rewarded. Just like they wanted.
There were four ways out. In the throes of his next
midnight spell Elwood decided there was a fifth way.
Get rid of Nickel.
OceanofPDF.com
H
CHAPTER THIRTEEN
e never missed a marathon. He didn’t
care for the winners, those Superman
types hunting world records, slapping
down that New York asphalt over bridges and up the extrawide borough avenues. Camera crews in cars trailed them,
zooming in on every drop of sweat and veins jumping in
their necks, and white cops on motorcycles, too, to keep
nuts from running out from the sidelines and messing with
them. Those guys got enough applause, what did they need
him for? The winner last year was this African brother,
dude was from Kenya. This year it was a white guy from
Britain. Built the same, skin color aside—look at those legs
and you know they’re going to be in the paper. Pros,
training all year, jetting all over the globe to compete. It
was easy to root for the winners.
No, he liked the punch-drunk ones, half walking at mile
twenty-three, tongues flapping like Labradors. Tumbling
across the finish line by hook or by crook, feet pounded to
bloody meat in their Nikes. The laggards and limpers who
weren’t running the course but running deep into their
character—down into the cave to return to the light with
what they found. By the time they got to Columbus Circle,
the TV crews have split, the cone cups of water and
Gatorade litter the course like daisies in a pasture, and the
silver space blankets twist in the wind. Maybe they had
someone waiting for them and maybe they didn’t. Who
wouldn’t celebrate that?
The winners ran alone at the front, then the race course
filled up with the pack, the normal joes crammed together.
He came out for the runners bringing up the rear and for
the crowds on the sidewalks and street corners, those New
York mobs so oddball and lovely that they summoned him
from his uptown apartment by a force he could only call
kinship. Every November the race pitted his skepticism
about human beings against the fact that they were all in
this dirty city together, unlikely cousins.
The spectators stood on tippy-toes, bellies rubbing on
the blue wooden police barriers that get rolled out for
races, riots, and presidents, jostling for sight lines, on the
shoulders of daddies and boyfriends. Amid the noise of air
horns, wolf whistles, and ghetto blasters shouting out old
calypso tunes. “Go!” and “You can do it!” and “You got it!”
Depending on the breeze the air smelled of Sabrett hot-dog
carts or the hairy armpit of that tank-topped chick
adjacent. To think of those Nickel nights where the only
sounds were tears and insects, how you could sleep in a
room crammed with sixty boys and still understand that
you were the only person on earth. Everybody around and
nobody around at the same time. Here everybody was
around and by some miracle you didn’t want to wring their
neck but give them a hug. The whole city, poor people and
Park Avenue types, black and white, Puerto Ricans, on the
curb, holding signs and national flags and cheering the
people who had been their opponents the day before in
front of them at the A&P checkout, grabbing the last seat
on the subway, walking like a walrus too slow on the
sidewalk. Competitors for apartments, for schools, for the
very air—all those hard-won and cherished animosities fell
away for a few hours as they celebrated a rite of endurance
and vicarious suffering. You can do it.
Tomorrow it was back to the front but this afternoon the
truce held until the last runner’s last cheer.
The sun was gone. November decided to remind
everybody they lived in its kingdom now, ordering up gusts.
He exited the park at Sixty-Sixth, darted between two cops
on horses, reflected in the cops’ sunglasses as a black
minnow. The dispersing spectators thinned when he got off
Central Park West.
“Hey, man! Hey, hold up a minute!”
Like many New Yorkers he had a crackhead alert system
and turned, steeling himself.
The man grinned. “You know me, man—Chickie! Chickie
Pete!”
So it was. Chickie Pete from Cleveland, a man now.
He didn’t run into a lot of people from the old days. One
of the advantages of living up north. He saw Maxwell one
time at a wrestling match at the Garden, Jimmy “Superfly”
Snucka in a steel match swooping through the air like a
giant bat. Maxwell was in line at one of the concessions,
close enough to see the six-inch scar on his forehead that
leapt over his eye socket and gouged into his jaw. And he
thought he saw pigeon-toed Birdy once outside Gristedes,
had that same curly golden hair, but the guy looked straight
through him. As if he were in disguise, crossing the border
under false documents.
“How you doing, man?” His old Nickel comrade wore a
green Jets sweatshirt and red track pants that were a size
too big, borrowed.
“Hanging in there. You look good.” He’d pegged the
energy correctly—Chickie wasn’t a crackhead but he’d
been around the block a few times, with that too-raw thing
druggies have when they just get out of jail or a clinic.
Here he was, slapping him five, grabbing his shoulder, and
talking too loud in a performance of gregariousness. A
walking flinch.
“My man!”
“Chickie Pete.”
“Where you headed?” Chickie Pete proposed a beer,
drinks on him. He begged off, but Chickie Pete wouldn’t
hear of it, and after the marathon perhaps a test of
goodwill for his fellow man was in order. Even when the
fellow man hailed from dark days.
He knew Chipp’s from his Eighty-Second Street days,
before he moved uptown. Columbus was a sleepy stretch
when he came to the city—everything closed by eight, tops
—and then neighborhood joints opened up on the avenue,
singles bars and restaurants that took reservations. Like
everywhere in the city: It’s a dump and then presto, it’s the
in-thing. Chipp’s was a proper saloon—bartenders who
tracked your usual, decent burgers, conversation if you
want it and a nod if you don’t. The only time he
remembered something racial happening, this cracker in a
Red Sox cap started going nigger this and nigger that and
got kicked out in a hot minute.
Horizon guys liked to duck in on Mondays and
Thursdays, Annie’s shifts, on account of her buy-back policy
and her bosom, both generous. After he got Ace up and
running, he sometimes took his employees out and brought
them here, until he learned that if he drank with the guys
they took liberties. Show up late or no-show with lame
excuses. Or scruffy, their uniforms rumpled. He paid good
money for those uniforms. Designed the logo himself.
The game was on, sound low. He and Chickie sat at the
bar and the bartender placed their pints on coasters
advertising Smiles, a fern bar that used to be a few blocks
up the street. The bartender was new, a white guy. A
redhead with a bumpkin manner. He liked to pump iron, his
T-shirt sleeves as tight as a rubber on his biceps. The kind
of gorilla you hire for Saturday nights if you get a crowd.
He put down a twenty even though Chickie said drinks
were on him. “You used to play trumpet,” he said. Chickie
was in the colored band and made a splash in the New
Year’s talent show with a jazzy version of “Greensleeves,” if
he recalled, a rendition that verged on bebop.
Chickie smiled at the reminder of his talent. “That was a
long time ago. My hands.” He held up two fingers that
curled like crab legs. He said he’d just spent thirty days
drying out.
Mentioning that they sat in a bar seemed impolite.
But Chickie had always made accommodations with his
shortcomings. The boy had been a reedy little runt when he
got to Nickel and regularly punked out his first year until
he learned to fight, and then he preyed on the smaller kids,
taking them into closets and supply rooms—you teach what
you’re taught. That, and the trumpet thing was all he
remembered about the Nickel Boy, before Chickie started
into his life after graduation. It was a familiar tune, one
he’d heard over the years—not from Nickel Boys but from
dudes who spent time in similar places. A stint in the army,
the routine and discipline appealed to him. “A lot of guys
went from juvie into the armed forces. It’s like a natural
option, especially if you got no home to go back to. Or want
to go back to.” Chickie was in the military for twelve years,
and then he had a crack-up and they drummed him out.
Married a couple of times. Any job he could get. The best
was selling stereos in Baltimore. He could go on forever
about hi-fis.
“I always drank,” Chickie said. “Then it was like the
more I tried to settle down, the more I got fucked up every
night.”
Last May he beat up a guy in a bar. The judge said it was
either jail or a program, no choice at all. He was in town
visiting his sister, who lived in Harlem. “She letting me stay
while I figure out my next move. I’ve always liked it up
here.”
Chickie asked him what he was up to, and Elwood felt
bad telling him about his company so he cut the number of
trucks and employees by half and didn’t mention the new
office on Lenox, which he was quite proud of. Ten-year
lease. The longest thing he’d ever committed to, and it was
weird because the only thing that bothered him about it
was that he wasn’t bothered about it.
“My man,” Chickie said. “Moving on up! Got a lady?”
“Never settled down, I guess. I go out, when work ain’t
so bad.”
“I hear you, I hear you.”
The light from the street dropped a shade as the taller
buildings ushered a premature evening. It was the cue for a
dose of the Sunday-night back-to-work blues, and he wasn’t
the only one afflicted—there was a rush at the bar. The
muscle-bound bartender served the two blond coeds first,
underage probably and testing alcohol enforcement south
of their Columbia University stomping grounds. Chickie
ordered another beer, outpacing him.
They started in on the old days, quickly sliding to the
dark stuff, the worst of the housemen and supervisors.
Didn’t say Spencer’s name, as if it might conjure him on
Columbus Avenue like a peckerwood specter, that
childhood fear still kept close. Chickie mentioned the
Nickel Boys he ran into over the years—Sammy, Nelson,
Lonnie. This one was a crook, that one lost an arm in
Vietnam, another one was strung out. Chickie said the
names of guys he hadn’t thought of in forever, it was like a
picture of the Last Supper, twelve losers with Chickie in the
middle. That’s what the school did to a boy. It didn’t stop
when you got out. Bend you all kind of ways until you were
unfit for straight life, good and twisted by the time you left.
Where did that leave him. How bent was he?
“You got out in ’64?” Chickie asked.
“You don’t remember?”
“What?”
“Nothing. Time served”—a lie told many times, when he
slipped up and mentioned reform school—“and they kicked
me out. Went up to Atlanta and then kept going north. You
know. I’ve been here since ’68. Twenty years.” All this time
he’d taken it as a given that his escape was a Nickel
legend. The students passing his story around as if he were
a folk hero, a Stagger Lee figure scaled down to teenage
size. But it hadn’t happened. Chickie Pete didn’t even recall
how he got out. If he wanted to be remembered, he should
have carved his name into a pew like everyone else. He lit
another cigarette.
Chickie Pete squinted. “Hey, hey, what happened to that
kid you used to hang around with all the time?”
“Which guy?”
“The guy with that thing. I’m trying to remember.”
“Hmm.”
“It’ll come back to me,” he said, and split to the
bathroom. He made a remark to a table of gals celebrating
a birthday. They laughed at him when he went into the
men’s room.
Chickie Pete and his trumpet. He might have played
professionally, why not? A session man in a funk band, or
an orchestra. If things had been different. The boys could
have been many things had they not been ruined by that
place. Doctors who cure diseases or perform brain surgery,
inventing shit that saves lives. Run for president. All those
lost geniuses—sure not all of them were geniuses, Chickie
Pete for example was not solving special relativity—but
they had been denied even the simple pleasure of being
ordinary. Hobbled and handicapped before the race even
began, never figuring out how to be normal.
The tablecloths were new since the last time he was here
—red-and-white checkered vinyl. Denise used to complain
about the sticky tables, in those days. Denise—that was one
thing he’d messed up. Around him the civilians ate their
cheeseburgers and drank their pints, in their free-world
cheer. An ambulance sped by outside and in the dark
mirror behind the liquor he had a vision of himself outlined
a bright red, a shimmering aura that marked him as an
outsider. Everybody saw it, just like he knew Chickie’s story
in two notes. They’d always be on the lam, no matter how
they got out of that school.
No one in his life stayed long.
Chickie Pete slapped him on the back on his return. He
got mad suddenly, thinking about how knuckleheads like
Chickie were still breathing and his friend wasn’t. He
stood. “I got to go, man.”
“No, no, I hear you. Me, too,” Chickie said, with the
surety of those who have nothing to do. “I don’t want to
ask,” Chickie said.
Here it comes.
“But if you’re looking for a hand, I could use the job. I’m
sleeping on a couch.”
“Right.”
“You have a card?”
He started for his wallet and his ACE MOVING business
cards—“Mr. Elwood Curtis, President”—but thought better
of it. “Not on me.”
“I can handle the work, is what I’m putting out there.”
Chickie wrote his sister’s number on a red bar napkin. “You
ring me up—for the old days.”
“I will.”
Once he made sure Chickie Pete was good and gone, he
headed for Broadway. He had the uncharacteristic urge to
take the bus, the 104 up Broadway. Take the scenic route
and absorb the life of the city. He nixed it: The marathon
was over, and his feeling of bonhomie was as well. In
Brooklyn and Queens and the Bronx and Manhattan, the
cars and trucks had resumed ownership of the blocked-off
streets, the marathon route disappeared mile by mile. Blue
paint on asphalt marked the course—every year it flaked
away before you knew it. The white plastic bags skittering
down the block and the overflowing trash cans were back,
the McDonald’s wrappers and red-top crack vials crunching
underfoot. He grabbed a cab and thought about dinner.
It was funny, how much he had liked the idea of his
Great Escape making the rounds of the school. Pissing off
the staff when they heard the boys talking about it. He
thought this city was a good place for him because nobody
knew him—and he liked the contradiction that the one
place that did know him was the one place he didn’t want
to be. It tied him to all those other people who come to
New York, running away from hometowns and worse. But
even Nickel had forgotten his story.
Knocking Chickie for being a fuckup when he was going
home to his empty apartment.
He ripped up Chickie Pete’s red napkin and tossed it out
the window. No One Likes a Litterbug popped into his head,
courtesy of the city’s new quality-of-life drive. A successful
campaign, judging from the way it stayed with him. “So
give me a ticket,” he said.
OceanofPDF.com
D
CHAPTER FOURTEEN
irector Hardee suspended two days of
classes to get the facility in shape for
the state inspection. It was a surprise
inspection, but his fraternity brother ran child welfare
down in Tallahassee and made a phone call. Plenty of longstanding cosmetic items required attention despite the
students’ work details. The sun-cracked basketball court
called for a new surface and hoops, and rust afflicted the
tractors and harrows on the farms. An alien light radiated
when the boys wiped generations of grime from the
skylights in the printing plant. Most of the buildings, from
the hospital to the schoolhouses to the garages, badly
needed a new coat of paint, the dormitories—especially
those for colored students—most of all. It was quite a sight,
all the boys, big and small, hustling in unified purpose,
paint on their chins, the chucks wobbling as they ferried
the cans of Dixie across campus.
At Cleveland, Carter the houseman drew upon his
construction days and demonstrated how to tuck-point the
cracks between those good Nickel bricks. Crowbars
wrenched the rotten floorboards; new ones were cut and
set. Hardee called in outsiders for the specialty work. The
new boiler, delivered two years earlier, was finally installed.
Plumbers replaced two broken urinals on the second floor,
and burly roofers took care of blisters and punctures up
top. No more early-morning leaks waking the boys of room
2.
The White House got a new coat. No one saw who did it.
One day it was its dingy self, the next it made the sun
vibrate on eyeballs.
Judging from Hardee’s face as he toured the progress,
the boys were on track for a good showing. Every few
decades a newspaper report about embezzlement or
physical abuse at the school initiated an investigation by
the state. In their wake came prohibitions against
“spanking,” and the use of dark cells and sweatboxes. The
administration instituted a stricter accounting of school
supplies, which had a tendency to disappear, as well as the
profits from the various student businesses, which also
liked to disappear. The parole of students to local families
and businesses was terminated and the medical staff
increased. They fired the longtime dentist and found one
who didn’t charge by the extraction.
It had been years since there were any allegations
against Nickel. On this occasion the school was merely
another item on a long list of government facilities due a
once-over.
Work assignments—farming, printing, brick-making, and
the like—continued as usual, because they promoted
responsibility, built character, etc., and were an important
source of revenue. Two days before the inspection, Harper
dropped off Elwood and Turner at the house of Mr. Edward
Childs, a former county supervisor and longtime booster of
the Nickel Academy for Boys. The school and the family
went back a ways. Edward Childs and the Kiwanis Club had
gone fifty-fifty on the football uniforms five years earlier. It
was hoped that he’d repeat his generosity, given an
incentive.
Mr.  Childs’s father, Bertram, had served in local
government and had also sat on the school board. He was
an avid proponent of peonage, back when it was allowed,
and often leased paroled students. They tended the horses
when there had been a stable out back, and the chickens.
The basement that Elwood and Turner cleaned out that
afternoon had been where the indentured boys slept. When
the moon was full, the boys had stood on the cot and gazed
upon its milky eye through the single cracked window.
Elwood and Turner were unaware of the basement’s
history. They were charged with removing sixty years of
junk so that it could be converted into a rec room, with
checkerboard floor tile and wood paneling. The Childs’s
teenagers had been lobbying and Edward Childs was not
without his own ideas for the space, as his wife and kids
visited her family for two weeks every August and he was
left to his own devices. Wet bar over there, install some
modern lighting, things they’d seen in magazines. Before
those dreams were realized, old bicycles, ancient steamer
trunks, broken-down spinning wheels, and a multitude of
other dusty relics waited for their final reward. The boys
opened the heavy cellar doors and got to work. Harper sat
in the van, smoking and listening to the baseball game.
“Junkman’s going to love us,” Turner said.
Elwood carried a stack of dusty Saturday Evening Posts
up the stairs and added it to the pile of Imperial
Nighthawks by the curb. The Imperial was a Klan paper;
the issue on top featured a black-robed night rider carrying
a burning cross. Had Elwood cut the twine, he would have
discovered that this was a popular cover theme. He turned
over the bundle to hide the image and revealed an ad for
Clementine Shaving Cream.
While Turner made jokes under his breath and whistled
Martha and the Vandellas, Elwood’s thoughts traced a
groove. Different newspapers for different countries. He
remembered looking up agape in his encyclopedia volume
after he read Dr.  King’s speech in the Defender. The
newspaper ran the address in full after the reverend’s
appearance at Cornell College. If Elwood had come across
the word before, through all those years of skipping around
the book, it hadn’t stuck in his head. King described agape
as a divine love operating in the heart of man. A selfless
love, an incandescent love, the highest there is. He called
upon his Negro audience to cultivate that pure love for
their oppressors, that it might carry them to the other side
of the struggle.
Elwood tried to get his head around it, now that it was
no longer the abstraction floating in his head last spring. It
was real now.
Throw us in jail, and we will still love you. Bomb our
homes and threaten our children, and, as difficult as it is,
we will still love you. Send your hooded perpetrators of
violence into our communities after midnight hours, and
drag us out onto some wayside road, and beat us and leave
us half-dead, and we will still love you. But be ye assured
that we will wear you down by our capacity to suffer, and
one day we will win our freedom.
The capacity to suffer. Elwood—all the Nickel boys—
existed in the capacity. Breathed in it, ate in it, dreamed in
it. That was their lives now. Otherwise they would have
perished. The beatings, the rapes, the unrelenting
winnowing of themselves. They endured. But to love those
who would have destroyed them? To make that leap? We
will meet your physical force with soul force. Do to us what
you will and we will still love you.
Elwood shook his head. What a thing to ask. What an
impossible thing.
“You hear me?” Turner asked. Wiggling his fingers in
Elwood’s blank face.
“What?”
Turner needed a hand inside. They’d made good
progress, even with Turner’s standard delaying technique,
unearthing a stash of old steamer trunks beneath the
stairs. Silverfish and centipedes made a break for it as the
boys dragged the trunks to the center of the basement. The
stamps decorating the scruffy black canvas commemorated
trips to Dublin, Niagara Falls, San Francisco, and other
distant ports of call. A story of exotic travel in bygone days,
places these boys would never see in their lives.
Turner huffed. “What’s in these things?”
“I’ve been writing everything down,” Elwood said.
“Everything what?”
“The deliveries. The yard work and chores. The names of
everybody and the dates. All our Community Service.”
“Nigger, why would you do a thing like that?” Knowing
why but curious as to how his friend would phrase it.
“You told me. No one else can get me out of here, just
me.”
“Nobody ever listens to me—why you got to start?”
“I didn’t know why I did it at first. That first day with
Harper, I wrote down what I saw. And I kept doing it. In one
of the school notebooks. It made me feel better. I suppose it
was to tell someone someday, and now I’m going to do it.
I’m going to give it to the inspectors when they come.”
“What do you think they going to do? Put your picture on
the cover of Time magazine?”
“I did it to stop it.”
“Another one of these dummies.” Feet thumped over
their heads—they never did see the Childs family that
entire day—and Turner busied himself like they had X-ray
vision. “You’re getting along. Ain’t had trouble since that
one time. They going to take you out back, bury your ass,
then they take me out back, too. The fuck is wrong with
you?”
“You’re wrong, Turner.” Elwood tugged on the handle of
a weathered brown trunk. It broke in half. “It’s not an
obstacle course,” he said. “You can’t go around it—you
have to go through it. Walk with your head up no matter
what they throw at you.”
“I vouched for you,” Turner said, wiping his hands on his
trousers. “You got ticked off and need to get it off your
chest, that’s cool.” Marking the end of the conversation.
When they were done hauling, the boys had performed
surgery—cut the rotten tissue from the house and plopped
it on the tray of the curb. Turner banged on the van door to
wake Harper. The radio relayed a sizzle of static.
“What’s wrong with him?” Harper asked Elwood. Turner
was mum, a conspicuous turn.
Elwood shook his head and looked out the window.
His thoughts prowled and roved after midnight. Turner’s
angry question joined his host of worry. It wasn’t, what did
he think the white men were going to do but did he trust
them to do it?
He was alone in this particular protest. He wrote The
Chicago Defender twice, but hadn’t heard back, even when
he mentioned the editorial he’d written under another
name. It had been two weeks. More distressing than the
notion that the newspaper didn’t care about what was
going on at Nickel was that they received so many letters
like it, so many appeals, that they couldn’t address them
all. The country was big, and its appetite for prejudice and
depredation limitless, how could they keep up with the host
of injustices, big and small. This was just one place. A lunch
counter in New Orleans, a public pool in Baltimore that
they filled with concrete rather than allow black kids to dip
a toe in it. This was one place, but if there was one, there
were hundreds, hundreds of Nickels and White Houses
scattered across the land like pain factories.
If he asked his grandmother to send the letter, avoiding
the matter of whether his mail made it out, she’d open it
lickety-split and throw it in the trash. Fearful of what would
happen to him—and she didn’t even know what they’d done
to him so far. He had to trust a stranger to do the right
thing. It was impossible, like loving the one who wanted to
destroy you, but that was the message of the movement: to
trust in the ultimate decency that lived in every human
heart.
This or this. This world whose injustices have sent you
meek and shuffling, or this truer, biding world waiting for
you to catch up?
At breakfast the morning of the state visit, Blakeley and
the other house fathers of the north campus made clear
their message of the day: “You boys mess up, it’s your ass.”
Blakeley, Terrance Crowe from Lincoln, and Freddie Rich,
who looked after the boys in Roosevelt. Every day he wore
the same buffalo belt buckle, nestled above his crotch and
under his potbelly like an animal wending between hills.
Blakeley gave the boys the schedule of the inspection.
He was alert and awake, having forsworn his nightcaps.
The black boys weren’t on display until the afternoon, he
said. The inspection commenced with the white campus,
the schoolhouse and dormitories, and the big facilities like
the hospital and the gymnasium. Hardee wanted to show
off the athletic fields and the new basketball court, so that
was next before the men from Tallahassee went over the
hill to the farms, the printing press, and the renowned
Nickel brick plant. Last came the colored campus. “You
know Mr.  Spencer will have a word for you if he catches
you with your shirt untucked or your dirty drawers hanging
out of your footlocker,” Blakeley said. “And it will not be
kind.”
The three house fathers stood before the serving trays,
which that day were filled with the food the students were
supposed to get every morning: scrambled eggs, ham, fresh
juice, and pears.
“When they getting here, sir?” one of the chucks asked
Terrance. Terrance was a big strapping man with a
scraggly white beard and watery eyes. He’d worked at
Nickel for more than twenty years, which meant he’d seen
different kinds of meanness. Which made him one of the
bigger accomplices, in Elwood’s estimation.
“Any minute,” Terrance said.
When the house fathers took their seats, the boys were
permitted to eat.
Desmond looked up from his plate. “I haven’t eaten this
good since…” He couldn’t think of it. “They should inspect
this place all the time.”
“Nobody talking now,” Jaimie said. “Eat.”
The students dug in happily, scraping plates. The bribe
did its job, despite the stern words. The boys were in a
pleasant mood, between the grub, the new clothes, the
repainted dining hall. Those ragged at the cuff or knee had
been given new trousers. Their shoes gleamed. The line
outside the barber’s had wrapped around the building
twice. The students looked smart. Even the ringworm kids.
Elwood searched for Turner. He sat with some Roosevelt
boys he bunked with during his first term. From his fake
smile, he knew Elwood was looking at him. Turner had
barely spoken to Elwood since the day in the basement. He
still hung out with Jaimie and Desmond, slinking off when
Elwood appeared. He’d been scarce in the rec room and
Elwood assumed he was hanging out in his loft. The boy
was almost as good as Harriet at the silent treatment,
especially given the years of practice his grandmother had
on him. This silence’s lesson? Keep your mouth shut.
Ordinarily, Wednesdays were Community Service, but for
obvious reasons Elwood and Turner were reassigned.
Harper grabbed them after breakfast and told them to join
the bleacher team. The football bleachers were a splintery
mess, wobbly, unsound. Hardee saved their refurbishment
for the day of the inspection, as if such large undertakings
were just another day at the school. Ten boys were
dispatched to sand, replace, and paint the planks on one
side of the field, and another ten took care of the bleachers
opposite. By the time the inspectors finished with the white
campus, the teams would have a nice performance under
way. Elwood and Turner were on different teams.
Elwood took to reconnoitering spent or rotten planks.
Tiny gray bugs boiled forth and slinked from the daylight.
He’d gotten into a nice rhythm when the signal went up—
the inspectors had departed the gymnasium and were
headed toward the football field. He tried to think of how
Turner would have nicknamed them. The portly one was a
ringer for Jackie Gleason, the one with the buzz cut looked
like a refugee from Mayberry, and the tall one was JFK. He
had the angular WASP features of the dead president and the
same splendid white teeth, and had chosen the haircut to
heighten the resemblance. Out in the sun, the inspectors
took off their suit jackets—it was going to be a humid day—
under which they wore the short-sleeve shirts and clipped
black ties that made Elwood think of Cape Canaveral and
those smart men with impossible trajectories crammed into
their skulls.
He lugged his words like an anvil in his Nickel-issued
pockets. Darkness cannot drive out darkness, the reverend
said, only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate,
only love can do that. He’d copied over his list of four
months of deliveries and recipients, the names and dates
and goods exchanged, the bags of rice and tins of peaches,
the sides of beef and Christmas hams. He added three lines
about the White House and Black Beauty, and that one of
the students, Griff, had gone missing after the boxing
championship. All in his finest penmanship. He didn’t put
his name down, to kid himself that they wouldn’t know the
author’s identity. They’d know he was the snitch, of course,
but they’d be in jail.
Is this what it felt like? To walk arm in arm in the middle
of the street, a link in a living chain, knowing that around
the next corner the white mob stood with their baseball
bats and fire hoses and curses. But it was just him, as
Turner told him that day in the hospital.
The boys had been trained to wait until spoken to before
talking to a white man. Learned this in their earliest days,
in school, on the streets and roads of their dusty towns.
Had it reinforced at Nickel: You are a colored boy in a
white man’s world. He’d considered different theaters for
his delivery: the schoolhouse, outside the dining hall, the
parking lot by the administration building. He never pulled
off this particular emancipation play without interruption—
Hardee and Spencer, usually Spencer, inevitably bounded
out on the boards, ruining the scene. He’d expected the
director and superintendent to take the inspectors around,
but the state men roamed unescorted. Moseying on the
concrete paths, pointing at this or that, conferring. They
stopped people for little talks, calling over a white boy who
was running to the library, collaring Miss Baker and
another female teacher for a chat.
Maybe it was possible.
JFK, Jackie Gleason, and Mayberry dawdled by the new
basketball courts—that had been a shrewd maneuver on
Hardee’s part—and approached the football fields. Harper
muttered, “You boys look busy,” and waved at the
inspectors. He walked the fifty-yard line to the opposite
bleachers to give the illusion of noninterference. Elwood
descended the bleachers, stepping around Lonnie and
Black Mike, who were awkwardly setting a plank of pine
into the scaffold. He had the angle right for interception. A
quick hand-off—and if Harper saw and asks what’s in that
envelope, he says it’s an essay on how civil rights has
changed things for the younger generation of colored folks,
he’d been working on it for weeks. It sounded like some
corny shit Turner would accuse him of.
Elwood was two yards away from the white men. His
heart caught. No budging that anvil any farther. He veered
over to the lumber pile and put his hands on his knees.
The inspectors proceeded up the hill. Jackie Gleason
made a joke and the other two laughed. They walked past
the White House without a glance.
The other students made so much noise when they saw
what the kitchen had cooked up for lunch—hamburgers and
mashed potatoes and ice cream that would never see the
inside of Fisher’s Drugs—that Blakeley told them to keep it
down. “You want them to think this is some kind of circus
we running here?” Elwood’s stomach refused the food.
He’d fucked it up. Try again in Cleveland, he decided. The
rec room, a quick “excuse me sir” in the hallway. Instead of
out in the open, in the middle of the green. He’d have
cover. Give it to JFK. But what if the inspector opened it
right there? Or read it on the walk down the hill, as Hardee
and Spencer caught up with them to escort them off the
property?
They had whipped Elwood. But he took the whipping and
he was still here. There was nothing they could do that
white people hadn’t done to black people before, were not
doing at this moment somewhere in Montgomery and
Baton Rouge, in broad daylight on a city street outside
Woolworths. Or some anonymous country road with no one
to tell the tale. They would whip him, whip him bad, but
they couldn’t kill him, not if the government knew what
was going on here. His mind strayed—and he saw the
National Guard drive through the Nickel gate in a convoy
of dark green vans, and soldiers jumping out into
formation. Maybe the soldiers didn’t agree with what they
were sent to do, their sympathies lay with the old order
instead of what was right, but they had to abide by the laws
of the land. Same way they lined up in Little Rock to let the
nine Negro children into Central High School, a human
wall between the angry whites and the children, between
the past and the future. Governor Faubus couldn’t do
anything about it because it was bigger than Arkansas and
its backward wickedness, it was America. A mechanism of
justice set in movement by a woman sitting down on a bus
where she was told not to sit, a man ordering ham on rye at
a forbidden counter. Or a letter of proof.
We must believe in our souls that we are somebody, that
we are significant, that we are worthful, and we must walk
the streets of life every day with this sense of dignity and
this sense of somebody-ness. If he didn’t have that, what
did he have? Next time, he would not falter.
The bleacher team headed back after lunch. Harper
caught his arm. “Hold on a minute, Elwood.”
The other boys cut down the slope. “What is it, Mr.
Harper?”
“I need you to head up to the farms and find
Mr. Gladwell,” he said. Mr. Gladwell and his two assistants
oversaw all the planting and harvesting at Nickel. Elwood
had never talked to him, but everyone knew him from his
straw hat and his farmer’s tan, which made him look like he
swam across the Rio Grande to get here. “Those men from
the state aren’t going to head up there today,” Harper said,
“they’re going to send some other experts to check out the
farms, special. You find him and tell him he can relax.”
Elwood turned to where Harper pointed, down the main
road where the three inspectors mounted the steps to
Cleveland. They went inside. Mr. Gladwell was God knows
where up north, with the lime or potato fields, it was acres
and acres. The inspectors would be gone by the time he got
back.
“I’m liking the painting, Harper—can one of the little
kids go?”
“Mr. Harper, sir.” On campus they had to go by the rules.
“Sir, I’d rather work on the bleachers.”
Harper frowned. “Acting crazy today, all of you. You do
what I asked you and on Friday it’s back to the usual.”
Harper left Elwood on the dining-hall steps. Last
Christmas, he’d stood in the same spot when Desmond told
him and Turner about Earl’s stomach trouble.
“I’ll do it.”
It was Turner.
“What’s that?”
“That letter you got in your pocket,” Turner said. “I’ll get
it to them, fuck it. Look at you—you look sick.”
Elwood searched for a tell. But Turner stood with the
con men of the world and the con men never betray the
game.
“I said I’ll do it, I’ll do it. You got someone else?”
Elwood gave it to him and ran north without a word.
It took Elwood an hour to find Mr. Gladwell, who sat in a
big rattan chair at the edge of the sweet potato fields. The
man stood and squinted at Elwood.
“Say what now? Guess I can smoke,” he said, and relit
his cigar. He barked at his charges, who had stalled their
labor at the sight of the messenger. “That doesn’t mean you
can quit, now. Get to it!”
Elwood took the long way back, around the trails that
circumnavigated Boot Hill and took him past the stables
and laundry. He was slow with his steps. He didn’t want to
know if Turner had been intercepted, or if the boy had
ratted on him or simply taken his letter up to his hideout
and put a match to it. Whatever waited for him on the other
side would still be waiting for him whenever he got there,
so he whistled a tune he remembered from when he was
little, a blues tune. He didn’t recall the words or whether it
had been his father or mother who sang it, but he felt good
whenever the song snuck up on him, a kind of coolness like
the shadow of a cloud out of nowhere, something that
broke off something bigger. Yours briefly before it sailed on
its way.
Turner brought him to his warehouse loft before supper.
Turner had a license to roam, but Elwood didn’t, and he
shook off a wave of fear. But if he wrote that letter, he was
bold enough to enter the warehouse without permission.
The hideout was smaller than in his imagination, a cramped
recess Turner had chipped out of the Nickel cave—walls
made of crates, a dingy army blanket, and a cushion from
the rec-room couch. It was not the hideout of a canny
operator but the slim refuge of a runaway who had stepped
into a doorway to get out of the rain, collar hugged tight.
Turner sat against a box of machine oil and cradled his
knees. “I did it,” he said. “I put it in a copy of The Gator. In
the newspaper, like at the bowling alley when Mr. Garfield
slipped a payoff to the fucking cops. Ran up to the man’s
car and said, ‘I thought you’d like a copy.’ ”
“Which one did you give it to?”
“JFK, who else?” In disdain. “You think I gave it to that
dude from The Honeymooners?”
“Thanks,” Elwood said.
“I didn’t do shit, El. I delivered the mail, is all.” He put
out his hand and the boys shook on it.
The kitchen staff brought out the ice cream again that
night. The house fathers, and presumably Hardee, were
satisfied with how the inspection had gone. At school the
next day, and on Community Service that Friday, Elwood
waited for the reaction, like he was back at Lincoln High
School and waiting for the volcano to bubble and smoke in
science class. The National Guard didn’t screech into the
parking lot, Spencer didn’t put his cold hand on his neck
and say, “Boy, we have a problem.” It didn’t happen like
that.
It happened as it ever happened. At night, in the
dormitories, flashlights crawling over his face when they
took him to the White House.
OceanofPDF.com
S
CHAPTER FIFTEEN
he read about the restaurant in the Daily
News and left the clipping by his side of
the bed so he wouldn’t miss it. It had
been a while since they’d had a night out together. Three
months on, his secretary Yvette still left the office early to
care for her mother, which had him playing catch-up at the
end of every day. Her mother was senile, but they called it
dementia now. As for Millie, it was almost March so the
annual madness had descended, April  15 coming up and
everybody scrambling. “They have a level of denial that is
positively insane,” his wife said. She usually got home in
time for the eleven o’clock news. He’d canceled date night
twice already—date night was some women’s magazine
thing now embedded in his vocabulary like a splinter—so
Millie was not going to let him miss this one. “Dorothy has
been twice and says it’s amazing,” Millie said.
Dorothy thought a lot of things were amazing, like
gospel brunch, American Idol, and organizing a petition
against that new mosque opening up. He held his tongue.
He left at seven, after taking a crack at decoding the
new health plan Yvette had dug up for Ace. It was cheaper
but was he getting ripped off in the long run with the copay bullshit? This species of paperwork had always
confounded and vexed. He’d have Yvette explain it again
when she got in the next day.
He got off at the City College stop on Broadway and
peeled off up the hill. It was warmer than it was supposed
to be for March, but he remembered more than one April
blizzard in Manhattan and wasn’t ready to call it spring yet.
“It happens right after you put your coat away,” he said.
Millie told him he sounded like some batty hermit who lived
in a cave.
Camille’s was on the corner of 141st and Amsterdam,
the anchor retail of a seven-story tenement. The Daily
News review described the place as nouveau Southern,
“down-home plates with a twist.” What was the twist—that
it was soul food made by white people? Chitlins with some
pale pickled thing on top? A neon Lone Star beer sign
blinked in the window and a halo of battered Alabama
license plates surrounded the menu by the entrance. He
squinted—his eyes weren’t what they used to be. Despite
the hillbilly warning signs, the food sounded good and not
too fussed over, and when he got to the hostess station,
most of the patrons inside were neighborhood people.
Black people, Latinos who probably worked in the area, for
the college. Squares, but their presence vouched.
The hostess was a white girl in a light blue hippie dress,
one of that clan. Chinese-character tattoos scrolled up her
wiry arms, who knew what they said. She pretended not to
see him and he started up a round of “Racism or Bad
Service?” He didn’t get far into his calculations before she
apologized for the wait—the new system was down, she
said, frowning at the gray glow on her stand. “Would you
like to sit now or wait for the rest of your party?”
Years of habit made him say he’d wait outside and then
on the sidewalk came that too-familiar disappointment—
Millie had made him quit. He pushed a tablet of nicotine
gum out of the foil.
A warm late-winter evening. He didn’t think he’d been
on this block before. Up on 142nd he recognized a building
from an old job, back when he was still on the truck. He
still felt the old days in his back sometimes, a twinge and a
quiver. This was Hamilton Heights now. The first time one
of his dispatchers asked where Hamilton Heights was, he
said, “Tell them they’re moving to Harlem.” But the name
persisted and stuck. Real estate agents cooking up new
names for old places, or resurrecting old names for old
places, meant the neighborhood was turning over. Meant
young people, white people are moving back. He can cover
office rent and payroll. You want to pay him to move you
into Hamilton Heights or Lower Whoville or whatever they
come up with, he’s glad to help, three-hour minimum.
White flight in reverse. The children and grandchildren
of those who’d fled the island years before, fled the riots
and the bankrupt city government and the graffiti that
spelled out Go Fuck Yourself no matter what the letters
said. The city was such a dump when he arrived, he didn’t
blame them. Their racism and fear and disappointment
paid for his new life. You want to pay to move to Roslyn,
Long Island, Horizon is glad to help, and if he was getting
the hourly wage back then and not paying the hourly wage,
he was grateful that Mr. Betts paid on time, in cash, off the
books. Didn’t matter what his name was or where he’d
come from.
A West Side Spirit stuck out of the garbage can on the
corner and he made a note to tell Millie that he wasn’t
doing the interview. When they were going to bed, or
tomorrow, so as not to spoil the evening. A woman in her
book club sold ads for the paper and told Millie she’d put
his name up for a feature they were running, spotlighting
local businesses. “Enterprising Entrepreneurs.” He was a
natural—a black man who owned his own moving company,
employed local people, mentoring.
“I don’t mentor anybody,” he told Millie. He was in the
kitchen, tying a garbage bag into a knot.
“It’s a big honor.”
“I’m not one of these people who needs everybody’s
attention,” he said.
It was simple—a quick interview and then they’d send a
photographer to take some pictures of his new office on
125th Street. Maybe one of him standing in front of the
trucks—the big boss, to put it all in perspective. Out of the
question. He’d be nice about it, place an ad or two, and
that’d be the end of it.
Millie was five minutes late. Unusual for her.
It bugged him. He stepped back, stepped back some
more so he saw the building proper and realized he had
been here before. Back in the ’70s. The restaurant had
been a community center or the like, legal aid, a view of the
desks so you can see that everybody looks like you. Help
you fill out the application for food stamps and other
government programs, break down the discouraging
bureaucratese, probably run by some former Panthers. He
was still working for Horizon so it had to be the ’70s. Top
floor, middle of summer, and the elevator was out. Humping
up all that white-and-black hexagon tile, the steps worn
from so many feet that they seemed to smile, a dozen
smiles every floor.
Right: The old lady had died. The son hired them to pack
everything and take it to his house on Long Island, where
they’d bring it to the basement and shove it up cozy
between the boiler and the never-touched fishing rods.
Where it would remain until the son died and his children
didn’t know what to do with it and it started all over again.
The family had packed up half the old lady’s stuff and then
given up—you got to know the signs when people got
overwhelmed by the enormity of the undertaking. There
were still a bunch of images from the afternoon in his
memory: up and down the tenement floor; the sweat soaked
into their Horizon T-shirts; the jammed-shut windows that
corralled the musty smell of isolation and death; the empty
cupboards. The bed she died in, stripped to the blue-andwhite striped mattress and her stains.
“Are we taking the mattress?”
“We are not taking the mattress.”
Lord knows he had a fear in those days of dying like that.
No one knows until the stink alarms the neighbors and the
irritated super lets the cops in. Irritated until he sees the
body and then after that it’s all pieced-together biography
—he let the mail pile up, one time he cursed out the nice
lady next door and vowed to poison her cats. Die alone in
one of his old rooms and what’s the last thing he thinks of
before he kicks the bucket—Nickel. Nickel hunting him to
his final moment—a vessel in his brain explodes or his
heart flops in his chest—and then beyond, too. Perhaps
Nickel was the very afterlife that awaited him, with a White
House down the hill and an eternity of oatmeal and the
infinite brotherhood of broken boys. He hadn’t thought
about going out like that in years—he’d packed it up in a
box and put it in his basement, next to the boiler and the
neglected fishing gear. With the rest of the stuff from the
old days. He stopped embroidering that fantasy long ago.
Not because he had someone in his life. But because that
someone was Millie. She chipped off the bad parts. He
hoped he did the same.
He got a feeling—he wanted to buy her flowers, like
when he started taking her out. Eight years since he saw
her at the Hale House fund-raiser, filling out her raffle
tickets in her careful script. Is that what normal husbands
do—buy flowers for no reason? All these years out of that
school and he still spent a segment of his days trying to
decipher the customs of normal people. The ones who had
been raised happily, three meals a day and a kiss
goodnight, the ones who had no notion of White Houses,
Lovers’ Lanes, and white county judges who sentenced you
to hell.
She was late. If he hurried he could make it to Broadway
and buy a cheap bouquet at a Korean deli before she got
there.
“What’s this for?” she’ll ask.
For being the whole free world.
He should have thought of the flowers sooner, at the deli
outside the office or when he stepped out of the subway,
because right then she said, “There’s my handsome
husband,” and it was date night.
OceanofPDF.com
T
CHAPTER SIXTEEN
heir daddies taught them how to keep a
slave in line, passed down this brutal
heirloom. Take him away from his family,
whip him until all he remembers is the whip, chain him up
so all he knows is chains. A term in an iron sweatbox,
cooking his brains in the sun, had a way of bringing a buck
around, and so did a dark cell, a room aloft in darkness,
outside time.
After the Civil War, when a five-dollar fine for a Jim Crow
charge—vagrancy, changing employers without permission,
“bumptious contact,” what have you—swept black men and
women up into the maw of debt labor, the white sons
remembered the family lore. Dug pits, forged bars, forbid
the nourishing face of the sun. The Florida Industrial
School for Boys wasn’t in operation six months before they
converted the third-floor storage closets into solitary
confinement. One of the handymen went dorm by dorm,
screwing in bolts: there. The dark cells remained in use
even after two locked-up boys died in the fire of ’21. The
sons held the old ways close.
The state outlawed dark cells and sweatboxes in juvenile
facilities after World War II. It was a time of high-minded
reform all over, even at Nickel. But the rooms waited, blank
and still and airless. They waited for wayward boys in need
of an attitude adjustment. They wait still, as long as the
sons—and the sons of those sons—remember.
Elwood’s second White House beating was not as severe
as the first. Spencer didn’t know what damage the boy’s
letter had caused—who else had read it, who cared, what
sort of repercussions roiled down in the capitol. “Smart
nigger,” he said. “I don’t know where they get these smart
niggers.” The superintendent was not his usual jolly self.
He gave the boy twenty licks then, distracted, handed
Black Beauty to Hennepin for the first time. Spencer had
hired Hennepin as Earl’s replacement, unaware of how
perfectly he had chosen. But like seeks like. Hennepin
maintained an expression of dull-witted malice most of the
time, lumbering across the grounds, but he brightened at
opportunities for cruelty, with a leer and gap-toothed grin.
Hennepin beat the boy briefly before Spencer stayed his
hand. There was no telling what was happening in
Tallahassee. They took the boy to the dark cell.
Blakeley’s room was to the right at the top of the stairs.
Behind the other door lay the small hallway and the three
rooms. The rooms had been repainted for the inspection
and piles of bedding and surplus mattresses moved inside.
The paint hid the initials of the cells’ previous inhabitants,
the scratches in the darkness over the years. Initials,
names, and also a range of cuss words and entreaties.
When the doors opened and the scratches were revealed to
the boys who had written them, the hieroglyphics did not
resemble what they remembered putting into the walls. It
was all demonology.
Spencer and Hennepin hauled the sheets and mattresses
to the rooms on either side. The room was empty when they
shoved Elwood in. The next afternoon a houseman on the
day shift gave the boy a bucket for a toilet, but no more.
Light strained through the mesh opening at the top of the
door, a gray light his eyes eventually became accustomed
to. They gave him food when the other boys left for
breakfast, one meal a day.
The last three inhabitants of that particular room had
come to bad ends. The place was worse luck on top of bad
luck, cursed. Rich Baxter was sentenced to the dark cell for
fighting back—a white supervisor boxed his ears, and Rich
knocked out three of his teeth. He had a solid right hand.
Rich spent a month in the room, thinking of the glorious
violence he would deliver to the white world when he got
out. Mayhem and murder and assault. Wiping his bloody
knuckles on his dungarees. Instead he enlisted in the army
and died—it was a closed casket—two days before the end
of the Korean War. Five years later, Claude Sheppard got
sent upstairs for stealing peaches. He was never the same
after those weeks in the dark—a boy went in and a man
hobbled out. He renounced misbehavior and sought out
cures for his pervasive worthlessness, a kind of sad-sack
seeker. Claude overdosed on smack in a Chicago flophouse
three years later; potter’s field keeps him now.
Jack Coker, Elwood Curtis’s immediate predecessor, was
discovered engaged in homosexual activity with another
student, Terry Bonnie. Jack spent his dark time in
Cleveland, Terry on the third floor of Roosevelt. Binary
stars in cold space. The first thing Jack did when he got out
was to smack Terry in the face with a chair. Well, not the
first thing. He had to wait until dinnertime. The other boy
was a mirror that granted a ruinous glimpse of himself.
Jack died on the floor of a juke-joint floor one month before
Elwood arrived at Nickel. He misheard a stranger’s remark
and lashed out. The stranger had a knife.
After a week and a half, Spencer got tired of being afraid
—in truth he was afraid much of the time but was
unaccustomed to one of his black boys instigating that fear
—and paid Elwood a visit. Things were quieting down at
the statehouse, Hardee was less distressed. The worst was
over. The government had too much power to interfere, was
the problem in general. Way he saw it. It got worse every
year. Spencer’s daddy had been a supervisor on the south
campus and got demoted after one of his charges ended up
choked to death. Some roughhousing that got out of hand
and he was the scapegoat. Money was tight before; it got
tighter. Spencer remembered those days still, the pot of
canned corn beef and broth stinking up that little kitchen
and him and his brothers and sisters lined up with their
chipped bowls. His grandfather had worked for the T.  M.
Madison Coal Company in Spadra, Arkansas, minding
nigger convicts. No one from the county, no one from the
main office, dared to interfere with the execution of his
office—his grandfather was a craftsman and enjoyed the
respect of his achievements. It was demeaning, one of
Spencer’s boys writing a letter on him.
Spencer took Hennepin with him to the third floor. The
rest of the dormitory was at breakfast. “You’re probably
wondering how long we’re going to keep you in here,” he
said. They kicked Elwood a while and Spencer felt better,
like a bubble of worry in his chest up and popped.
The worst thing that ever happened to Elwood happened
every day: He woke in that room. He would never tell
anyone about those days of darkness. Who would come for
him? He had never considered himself an orphan. He had
to stay behind so that his mother and father could find
what they needed in California. No point having sad
feelings about it—one thing had to happen for the other
thing to happen. He had an idea that one day he’d tell his
father about his letter, how it was just like the letter his
father gave to his commanding officer about the treatment
of colored troops, the one that got him a commendation in
the war. But he was as much an orphan as many of the boys
in Nickel. No one was coming.
He thought long on Dr.  Martin Luther King Jr.’s letter
from the Birmingham jail, and the powerful appeal the man
composed from inside. One thing gave birth to the other—
without the cell, no magnificent call to action. Elwood had
no paper, no pen, just walls, and he was all out of fine
thoughts, let alone the wisdom and the way with words.
The world had whispered its rules to him for his whole life
and he refused to listen, hearing instead a higher order.
The world continued to instruct: Do not love for they will
disappear, do not trust for you will be betrayed, do not
stand up for you will be swatted down. Still he heard those
higher imperatives: Love and that love will be returned,
trust in the righteous path and it will lead you to
deliverance, fight and things will change. He never
listened, never saw what was plainly in front of him, and
now he had been plucked from the world altogether. The
only voices were those of the boys below, the shouts and
laughter and fearful cries, as if he floated in a bitter
heaven.
A jail within a jail. In those long hours, he struggled over
Reverend King’s equation. Throw us in jail and we will still
love you…But be assured that we will wear you down by
our capacity to suffer, and one day we will win our freedom.
We will not only win freedom for ourselves, we will so
appeal to your heart and your conscience that we will win
you in the process and our victory will be a double victory.
No, he could not make that leap to love. He understood
neither the impulse of the proposition nor the will to
execute it.
When he was little, he kept lookout on the dining room
of the Richmond Hotel. It had been closed to his race and
one day it would open. He waited and waited. In the dark
cell, he reconsidered his vigil. The recognition he sought
went beyond brown skin—he was looking for someone who
looked like him, for someone to claim as kin. For others to
claim him as kin, those who saw the same future
approaching, slow as it may be and overfond of back roads
and secret hardscrabble paths, attuned to the deeper music
in the speeches and hand-painted signs of protest. Those
ready to commit their weight to the great lever and move
the world. They never appeared. In the dining room or
anywhere else.
The door to the stairwell opened, scraping against the
floor. Footsteps outside the dark cell. Elwood braced
himself for another beating. After three weeks they had
finally decided what to do with him. He was sure that was
the only reason he hadn’t been taken out back to the iron
rings and then disappeared—uncertainty. Now that things
had quieted down, Nickel returned to proper discipline and
the customs that had been handed down from generation to
generation.
The bolt slid. There was one slim silhouette in the
doorway. Turner shushed him and helped Elwood to his
feet.
“They’re going to take you out back tomorrow,” Turner
whispered.
“Yeah,” Elwood said. Like Turner was talking about
someone else. He was dizzy.
“We got to get, man.”
Elwood puzzled over the we. “Blakeley.”
“That nigger’s passed out, man. Shhh!” He handed
Elwood his glasses and clothes and shoes. They came from
Elwood’s locker, the ones he wore on his first day of school.
Turner was also dressed in regular clothes, black trousers
and a dark blue work shirt. We.
The Cleveland boys had replaced the creaky floorboards
for the inspection; they missed a few. Elwood tilted his
head to listen for noise from the house father’s quarters.
The couch was near the door. Many a boy had made the
journey up the steps to rouse him from that couch when he
slept through reveille. Blakeley did not stir. Elwood was
stiff from his confinement and from the two beatings.
Turner let him lean on him. He carried a bulging knapsack
on his back.
There was a chance they might happen on one of the
boys from room 1 or room 2 heading out for a piss. They
hurried, as quietly as they could, down and around the next
flight of stairs. “We going to walk straight past,” Turner
said, and Elwood knew he meant past the rec room to the
back entrance of Cleveland. The lights were on all night on
the first floor. Elwood didn’t know what time it was—one in
the morning? two—but it was late enough for the night
supervisors to be deep in some illicit shut-eye.
“They’re playing poker down at the motor pool tonight,”
Turner said. “We’ll see.”
Once they got out of the light cast from the windows,
they made a hobbled sprint for the main road. They were
out.
Elwood didn’t ask where they were headed. He asked
Turner, “Why?”
“Shit—they were running around like bugs the last two
days, all those motherfuckers. Spencer. Hardee. Then
Freddie told me that Sam heard from Lester that he heard
them talking about taking you out back.” Lester was a
Cleveland kid who swept up at the supervisor’s office and
had the line on all the big stuff going down, a regular
Walter Cronkite. “That was it,” Turner said. “Tonight or not
at all.”
“But why are you coming with me?” He could have
pointed Elwood in the right direction and wished him luck.
“They snatch you up in a hot minute, dumb as you are.”
“You said don’t take anyone with you,” Elwood said. “On
the run.”
“You’re dumb, and I’m stupid,” Turner said.
Turner was taking him toward town, running along the
road and then diving when a car appeared. As the houses
got closer together, they crouched and took it slowly, which
suited Elwood fine. His back hurt, and his legs where
Spencer and Hennepin had sliced at him with Black Beauty.
The immediacy of their flight reduced the pain. Three times
somebody’s damned dogs started up loud barking when
they passed their houses and the boys sprinted. They never
saw the dogs but the noise got their blood flowing.
“He’s in Atlanta all month,” Turner said. He’d led them
to Mr.  Charles Grayson’s house, the banker they’d sung
“Happy Birthday” to the night of the big fight. For
Community Service they had cleaned out and painted his
garage. It was a big house, and lonely. His twin sons had
gone off to college. Elwood and Turner had thrown out a lot
of the old toys from when the Grayson boys were little.
They had matching red bicycles, Elwood remembered. The
bikes were still where they’d left them, next to the
gardening tools. The moonlight was enough to make them
out.
Turner pumped up the tires. He didn’t have to search for
the pump. How long had he been planning this? Turner
kept his own kind of records—this house provided one sort
of aid, that house another—the same way Elwood
maintained his.
There was no outfoxing the dogs once they were on the
trail, Turner told him. “Most you can do is get as far away
as you can. Put some miles between you and them.” He
tested the tires with his thumb and forefinger. “I think
Tallahassee is good,” he said. “It’s big. I’d say north but I
don’t know up there. In Tallahassee we can get a ride
somewhere and then those dogs going to need wings to
catch us.”
“They were going to kill me and bury me out there,”
Elwood said.
“Sure as shit.”
“You got me out,” Elwood said.
“Yup,” Turner said. He started to say something else, but
stopped. “Can you ride it?”
“I can do it.”
It was an hour and a half to Tallahassee in a car. On a
bike? Who knew how far they’d get before sunup, taking
the roundabout way. The first time a car came up behind
them and it was too late to veer off, they biked on and kept
their faces blank. The red pickup overtook them without
incident. After that, they remained on the road to make as
many miles as Elwood’s pace allowed.
The sun came up. Elwood was heading home. He knew
he couldn’t stay but it would calm him to be in his city
again after these white streets. He’d go wherever Turner
instructed and when it was safe, put it all down on paper
again. Try the Defender again, and The New York Times.
They were the paper of record, which meant they were in
the business of protecting the system, but they had come a
long way in their coverage of the rights struggle. He could
reach out to Mr. Hill again. Elwood hadn’t tried to contact
his former teacher after he got to Nickel—his lawyer had
promised to track him down—but the man knew people.
People in SNCC and those in the Reverend King’s circle.
Elwood had failed, but he had no choice but to take up the
challenge again. If he wanted things to change, what else
was there to do but stand up?
Turner, for his part, thought of the train they’d jump, he
thought of the north. It wasn’t as bad as down here—a
Negro could make something of himself. Be his own man.
Be his own boss. And if there was no train, he’d crawl on
his hands and knees.
The morning got on and the traffic picked up. Turner had
deliberated over this road or the other country road and
picked this one. On the map it looked less populated and
the same, distance-wise. He was sure the drivers were
checking them out. Looking straight ahead was best.
Elwood kept pace, to his surprise. Around the curve, the
road lifted to a slope. If Turner had been locked up and had
his ass kicked a few times, he’d be laid out going up this
hill, little as it was. Sturdy—that was Elwood.
Turner drove his knee down with his hand. He’d stopped
looking back when he heard a car behind them but he got a
tingle and turned his head. It was a Nickel van. Then he
saw the bloom of rust on the front fender. It was the
Community Service van.
On one side of the road was farmland—dirt mounds in
furrows—and on the other open pasture. No woods beyond
them as far as he saw. The pasture was closer, surrounded
by a white wooden fence. Turner shouted to his partner.
They were going to have to run.
They steered to the bumpy side of the road and leapt off
the bikes. Elwood made it over the fence before Turner did.
One of the cuts on his back had bled through his shirt and
dried. Turner caught up in a second and the boys were side
by side. They ran through the tall swaying wild grass and
weeds. The doors of the van opened and Harper and
Hennepin climbed over the fence, quick. They each carried
a shotgun.
Turner took a peek. “Faster!”
Down the slope lay another fence, and then trees.
“We got it!” Turner said.
Elwood panted, his mouth agape.
The first shotgun blast missed. Turner checked again. It
was Hennepin. Harper stopped next. He held the shotgun
like his daddy showed him when he was a boy. His daddy
wasn’t around much but had taught him this thing.
Turner zagged and put his head down as if he could duck
buckshot. Can’t catch me, I’m the Gingerbread Man. He
looked back again as Harper pulled the trigger. Elwood’s
arms went wide, hands out, as if testing the solidity of the
walls of a long corridor, one he had traveled through for a
long time and which possessed no visible terminus. He
stumbled forward two steps and fell into the grass. Turner
kept running. He asked himself later if he heard Elwood cry
out or make any kind of sound but never did figure it out.
He was running and there was only the rush and roil of
blood in his head.
OceanofPDF.com
T
EPILOGUE
hose kiosks didn’t like him, no matter
how much he jabbed and muttered at the
screens. He checked in at the counter.
This one’s attendant was a black girl in her mid-twenties,
all business. That new breed coming up, like Millie’s
nieces, who didn’t take any mess and weren’t afraid to tell
you.
“Flying to Tallahassee,” Turner said. “Last name Curtis.”
“Identification?”
He was due for a new driver’s license, now that he
shaved his head every other day. He didn’t resemble the
picture. The old him. Once he got to Tallahassee he
wouldn’t need this license anyhow. It was history.
When the owner of the diner asked him his name, two
weeks out of Nickel, he said, “Elwood Curtis.” First thing
that popped into his head. It felt right. He used the name
from then on when anybody asked, to honor his friend.
To live for him.
Elwood’s death made the papers. He was a local boy, you
can’t escape the long arm of the law, that bullshit. Turner’s
name in black-and-white newsprint as the other escapee, “a
Negro youth.” No description apart from that. Another
black boy causing trouble, that’s all you needed to know.
Turner hid out in Jaimie’s old stomping grounds—the
railroad yards in All Saints. He risked one night at the
depot and then hopped a freight north. Working here and
there—restaurants, day labor, construction—up the coast.
Eventually New York City, where he stayed.
In 1970, he went back to Florida for the first time and
requested a copy of Elwood’s birth certificate. The
downside of working with sketchy dudes on building sites
and in greasy spoons was that they were sketchy, but they
also knew shady things, like how to get a birth certificate
for a dead man. Dead boy. Date of birth, name of parents,
city. Back then it was easy, before Florida wised up and put
all those protections in place. He put in for a Social
Security card two years later and it arrived in the mailbox,
sitting on top of an A&P flyer.
The printer behind the airline counter chattered and
whirred. “You have a good flight, sir,” the attendant said.
She smiled. “Anything else?”
He woke up. “Thank you.” Lost in that old place. His first
visit to Florida in forty-three years. The place reached right
through the TV screen and yanked him back.
Millie got home from work last night and he gave her the
two articles he printed out on Nickel and the graveyards.
“That’s terrible,” she said. “These people get away with
everything.” According to one of the pieces, Spencer had
died some years before, but Earl was still kicking around.
Ninety-five years old, all of them wretched. He was retired,
and such “a well-respected member of the Eleanor
community” that in 2009 the town bestowed their Good
Citizen of the Year Award on him. In the newspaper photo
the old supervisor was decrepit, leaning on a cane on his
porch, but his cold steel eyes gave Turner a shiver.
“Did you ever hit boys thirty or forty times with a strap?”
the reporter asked.
“That is simply not true, sir. I swear on my children’s
lives. Just a little discipline,” Earl said.
Millie gave him back the articles. “You know that old
cracker beat them boys. A little discipline.”
She didn’t get it. How could she, living in the free world
her whole life. “I used to live there,” Turner said.
His tone. “Elwood?” Like testing the ice to see if it’d
bear her weight.
“I was at Nickel. That’s the place. I told you I was in
juvie, but I never said the name.”
“Elwood. Come here,” she said. He sat on the couch. He
hadn’t served his time, as he told her years ago, but ran.
Then he told her the rest, including the story of his friend.
“His name was Elwood,” Turner said.
They were on the couch for two hours. Not counting the
fifteen minutes, halfway through, that she spent in their
bedroom with the door closed: “I have to go, I’m sorry.” She
returned, her eyes rubbed red, and they picked it up.
In some ways Turner had been telling Elwood’s story
ever since his friend died, through years and years of
revisions, of getting it right, as he stopped being the
desperate alley cat of his youth and turned into a man he
thought Elwood would have been proud of. It was not
enough to survive, you have to live—he heard Elwood’s
voice as he walked down Broadway in the sunlight or at the
end of a long night hunched over the books. Turner walked
into Nickel with strategies and hard-won dodges and a
knack for keeping out of scrapes. He jumped over the fence
on the other side of the pasture and into the woods and
then both boys were gone. In Elwood’s name, he tried to
find another way. Now here he was. Where had it taken
him?
Millie said, “Your falling out with Tom.” Moments from
nineteen years resolved into fine grain. It was easier to
focus on details. Small things stuck and kept her from
taking in the entire picture. His fight with Tom, who
worked with him at his first moving job. They’d been
friends a long time. It was a Fourth of July barbecue out in
Port Jefferson, at the man’s own house. They were talking
about some rapper who just got out of jail for tax evasion
and Tom said, “Don’t do the crime, if you can’t do the
time,” singing it like in the opening credits to that old cop
show.
“That’s why they get away with it,” he said to Tom,
“because people like you think they deserve it.” Why was
he—who? Elwood? Turner? the man she married—
defending this deadbeat? Blowing up like that. Yelling at
Tom in front of the whole party while he flipped burgers in
that silly apron. They drove all the way back to Manhattan
in silence. Other small things: Him walking out of movies
with no explanation beyond “I’m bored” because a scene—
of violence, of helplessness—abducted him and took him
back to Nickel. He was always so calm and even then this
darkness crept up on him. His rants about cops and the
criminal justice system and predators—everyone hated
cops, but it was different with him and she taught herself to
let him vent when he got on one of his jags because of the
feral thing that snuck into his face, the vehemence of his
words. The nightmares that tormented him, the ones he
claimed not to remember—she knew his reform school had
been bad but she didn’t know it had been this place. She
took his head into her lap as he wept, running her thumb
over that stray-cat notch in his ear. The scar she never
noticed but was right in front of her.
Who was he? He was him, the man he had always been.
She told him that she understood, as much as she was able
to understand that first night. He was him. They were the
same age. She had grown up in the same country with the
same skin. She lived in New York City in 2014. It was hard
to remember sometimes how bad it used to be—bending to
a colored fountain when she visited her family in Virginia,
the immense exertion white people put into grinding them
down—and then it all returned in a rush, set off by tiny
things, like standing on a corner trying to hail a cab, a
routine humiliation she forgot five minutes later because if
she didn’t, she’d go crazy, and set off by the big things, a
drive through a blighted neighborhood snuffed out by that
same immense exertion, or another boy shot dead by a cop:
They treat us like subhumans in our own country. Always
have. Maybe always will. His name didn’t matter. The lie
was big but she understood it, given how the world had
crumpled him up, the more she took in his story. To come
out of that place and make something of himself, to become
a man capable of loving her the way he did, to become the
man she loved—his deception was nothing compared to
what he had done with his life.
“I don’t call my husband by his last name.”
“Jack. Jack Turner.” No one had ever called him Jack
except his mother and his aunt.
“I’ll try it on,” she said. “Jack, Jack, Jack.”
It sounded okay to him. More true each time it came out
of her mouth.
They were wrung out. In their bed she said, “You have to
tell me all of it. This isn’t just one night.”
“I know. I will.”
“What if they throw you in jail?”
“I don’t know what they’re going to do.”
She should go with him. She wanted to go with him. He
wouldn’t let her. They’d have to pick it up after he had done
this thing. No matter which way it ended up down there.
They didn’t speak after that. They didn’t sleep. She
curled into his spine, him reaching back for her rump to
make sure she was still real.
The gate lady announced his Tallahassee flight. He had
the row to himself. He stretched out and slept, he’d been
up all night, and when he woke on the plane he picked up
his argument with himself over betrayal. Millie had
changed everything for him. Unbent him from who he had
been. He betrayed her. And he had betrayed Elwood by
handing over that letter. He should have burned it and
talked him out of that fool plan instead of giving him
silence. Silence was all the boy ever got. He says, “I’m
going to take a stand,” and the world remains silent.
Elwood and his fine moral imperatives and his very fine
ideas about the capacity of human beings to improve.
About the capacity of the world to right itself. He had saved
Elwood from those two iron rings out back, from the secret
graveyard. They put him in Boot Hill instead.
He should have burned that letter.
From what he read in Nickel articles the last few years,
they buried dead boys quick to head off any investigation,
not even a word to their families—but then who had the
money to bring them home and rebury them? Not Harriet.
Turner found her obituary in the online archive of a
Tallahassee paper. She died a year after Elwood, survived
by her daughter, Evelyn. It didn’t mention if the daughter
had shown up for the funeral. Turner had the money now to
bury his friend properly, but any redress was on hold. Like
with what he’d say to Millie to show her who he was—he
couldn’t see anything past his return to Nickel.
In the taxi line outside the Tallahassee airport Turner
wanted to bum a cigarette from the desperate smoker
lighting up after being cooped up in the plane. Millie’s
stern face warned him off and he whistled “No Particular
Place to Go” to distract himself. Once he was on the way to
the Radisson, he checked the piece from the Tampa Bay
Times again. He’d looked at it so often that his fingers
smudged the printout—he had to complain to Yvette about
the toner or whatnot when he got back, whenever that was.
Ace Moving had a future, or it didn’t.
The press conference was at eleven a.m. According to
the paper, the sheriff of Eleanor was going to give an
update on the investigation of the grave sites and an
archaeology professor from the University of South Florida
would speak on the forensic examinations of the dead boys.
And some of the White House boys were going to be there
to testify. He’d kept tabs on them through their website the
last couple of years—the reunions, the stories of their life
at the school and after, their attempts to be recognized.
They wanted a memorial and an apology from the state.
They wanted to be heard. He’d thought them pathetic,
moaning about what happened forty, fifty years ago, but
recognized now it was his own pitiable state that revolted
him, how scared he got seeing the name of the place and
the pictures. No matter the front he put up, nowadays and
back then, his bravado in front of Elwood and other boys.
He’d been scared all the time. He was scared still. The
state of Florida closed the school three years ago and now
it was all coming out, as if everyone, all the boys, had to
wait for it to be dead before they told the tale. It couldn’t
hurt them now, snatch them up at midnight and brutalize
them. It could only hurt them in the old familiar ways.
All the men on the website were white. Who spoke for
the black boys? It was time someone did.
Seeing the grounds and the haunted buildings on the
nightly news, he had to go back. To speak about Elwood’s
story, no matter what happened to him. Was he a wanted
man? Turner didn’t know the law but he had never
underestimated the crookedness of the system. Not then,
not now. What happens will happen. He’ll find Elwood’s
grave and tell his friend of his life after he was cut down in
that pasture. How that moment grew in Turner and
changed his life’s course. Tell the sheriff who he was, share
Elwood’s story and what they did to him when he tried to
put a stop to their crimes.
Tell the White House boys that he was one of them, and
he survived, like them. Tell anyone who cared that he used
to live there.
The Radisson sat on a downtown corner of Monroe
Street. It was an old hotel they’d added a bunch of floors
to. The dark modern windows and brown metal siding of
the new parts clashed with the red brick of the bottom
three stories, but it was better than demolishing the place
and starting anew. There was too much of that these days,
especially in Harlem. All those buildings that had seen so
much, and they go ahead and raze them. The old hotel
made for a good foundation. It had been a long time since
he’d seen that Southern architecture of his youth, with the
open porches and white balconies running around the
floors like ticker tape.
Turner checked into his room. His stomach growled after
he opened his suitcase and he went back down to the hotel
restaurant. It was an in-between time and the place was
empty. The server slouched by the wait station, a pale
teenage girl with dyed-black hair. She wore the T-shirt of a
band he never heard of, black with a laughing green skull
overlaid. Some heavy metal thing. She put down her
magazine and said, “Sit anywhere you like.”
The chain had redone the dining room in contemporary
hotel style, with a lot of wipeable green plastic. Three tilted
television sets nattered the same cable news station at
different angles, the news was bad and ever was, and a pop
song from the ’80s blipped from hidden speakers, an
instrumental version with the synthesizers out front. He
looked the menu over and decided on a burger. The name
of the restaurant—Blondie’s!—poured forth on the front of
the menu in puffy gold script, and below that was a brief
paragraph on the history of the place. Formerly the
Richmond Hotel, it was a Tallahassee landmark and great
care, they said, had gone into preserving the spirit of the
grand old establishment. The shop by reception sold
postcards.
If he had been less tired he might have recognized the
name from a story he heard once when he was young,
about a boy who liked to read adventure stories in the
kitchen, but it eluded him. He was hungry and they served
all day, and that was enough.
OceanofPDF.com
ACKNOWLEDGMENTS
This book is fiction and all the characters are
my own, but it was inspired by the story of the Dozier
School for Boys in Marianna, Florida. I first heard of the
place in the summer of 2014 and discovered Ben
Montgomery’s exhaustive reporting in the Tampa Bay
Times. Check out the newspaper’s archive for a firsthand
look. Mr.  Montgomery’s articles led me to Dr.  Erin
Kimmerle and her archaeology students at the University of
South Florida. Their forensic studies of the grave sites
were invaluable and are collected in their Report on the
Investigation into the Deaths and Burials at the Former
Arthur G. Dozier School for Boys in Marianna, Florida. It is
available at the university’s website. When Elwood reads
the school pamphlet in the infirmary, I quote from their
report on the school’s day-to-day functions.
Officialwhitehouseboys.org is the website of Dozier
survivors, and you can go there for the stories of former
students in their own words. I quote White House Boy Jack
Townsley in chapter four, when Spencer is describing his
attitude toward discipline. Roger Dean Kiser’s memoir, The
White House Boys: An American Tragedy, and Robin Gaby
Fisher’s The Boys of the Dark: A Story of Betrayal and
Redemption in the Deep South (written with Michael
O’McCarthy and Robert W. Straley) are excellent accounts.
Nathaniel Penn’s GQ article “Buried Alive: Stories From
Inside Solitary Confinement” contains an interview with an
inmate named Danny Johnson in which he says, “The worst
thing that’s ever happened to me in solitary confinement
happens to me every day. It’s when I wake up.” Mr. Johnson
spent twenty-seven years in solitary confinement; I have
recast that quote in chapter sixteen. Former prison warden
Tom Murton wrote about the Arkansas prison system in his
book with Joe Hyams called Accomplices to the Crime: The
Arkansas Prison Scandal. It provides a ground’s-eye view of
prison corruption and was the basis of the movie Brubaker,
which you should see if you haven’t. Julianne Hare’s
Historic Frenchtown: Heart and Heritage in Tallahassee is
a wonderful history of that African-American community
over the years.
I quote the Reverend Martin Luther King Jr. a bunch; it
was energizing to hear his voice in my head. Elwood cites
his “Speech Before the Youth March for Integrated
Schools” (1959); the 1962 LP Martin Luther King at Zion
Hill, specifically the “Fun Town” section; his “Letter from
Birmingham Jail”; and his 1962 speech at Cornell College.
The “Negroes are Americans” James Baldwin quote is from
“Many Thousands Gone” in Notes of a Native Son.
I was trying to see what was on TV on July 3, 1975. The
New York Times archive has the TV listings for that night,
and I found a good nugget.
This is my ninth book with Doubleday. Many, many
thanks to Bill Thomas, my excellent and exalted editor and
publisher, and to Michael Goldsmith, Todd Doughty,
Suzanne Herz, Oliver Munday, and Margo Shickmanter for
their abundant support, hard work, and faith over the
years. Thanks to Nicole Aragi, agent extraordinaire,
without whom I am just another writer bum, and to Grace
Dietsche and to all the Aragi crew. Thanks to the nice
people at the Book Group for their encouraging words. And
much gratitude and love to my family—Julie, Maddie, and
Beckett. Lucky is the man to have these people in his life.
OceanofPDF.com
ABOUT THE AUTHOR
Colson Whitehead is the author of nine books of
fiction and nonfiction, including The
Underground Railroad, which was a number
one New York Times bestseller and won the
Pulitzer Prize and the National Book Award. A
recipient of MacArthur and Guggenheim
Fellowships, he lives in New York City.
OceanofPDF.com
Wat’s next on
your reading list?
Discover your next
great read!
Get personalized book picks and up-to-date news about this author.
Sign up now.
OceanofPDF.com
